y First Painful Encounters with Prices 
 My fi rst life lessons on the power, importance, and effects of price were emotional 
and left a permanent imprint. But they didn’t come in the university classrooms or 
corporate boardrooms where I spent much of my adult life as a professor or a 
consultant. 
 No, the setting was one of the oldest forms of commerce known to mankind: 
a rural farmer’s market. 
 I grew up on small livestock farm shortly after World War II. When our hogs 
were ready for slaughter, my father would bring them to the local wholesale market, 
where they would be auctioned off to butchers or traders. The sheer number of 
farmers who brought their hogs to market, matched by the large number of butchers 
and traders on the “buy” side, meant that no individual buyer or seller had a direct 
infl uence on the price of the hogs. We were at the mercy of the local cooperative, 
which cleared the transactions. They would tell my father the price he would 
receive, and thus determine how much money he could take home to our family. 
 The same applied to milk, which we would deliver to the local dairy. We had 
absolutely no infl uence on the price. The dairy, again part of a cooperative, told us 
what the price would be. The milk price would fl uctuate based on supply and 
demand . In times of an oversupply , prices would plunge. We never had hard numbers on supply and demand, only the impressions we gained from observing the 
market itself. Who else delivered milk? How much did they have? 
 In every market my father went to, we were “price takers.” We had to accept the 
set price, whether we liked it or not. It was an extremely uncomfortable position. As 
anyone with a similar experience will attest, money is tight on a farm; these sales 
were our only source of income. 
 I absorbed all these impressions as a young boy and I must admit, I didn’t like 
them. Decades later, I would explain in interviews that these lessons taught me 
something which has guided me in running my own business and helping others 
2
improve theirs: never run a business in which you have no infl uence on the prices 
you charge. 1
 I won’t claim I articulated those thoughts exactly that way in the 1950s as a 
young boy. But I have that same visceral feeling today whenever I think about the 
price of pork or buy a gallon of milk. I am rather certain that these childhood experiences shaped my opinions about how businesses operate. To this day, I don’t think 
much of a business that doesn’t make money. 
 Prices determine how much money you make. That much is clear. Yet how much 
infl uence can you exert on prices, so that money isn’t tight and you don’t need to 
live month to month or quarter to quarter? And if you have that infl uence, what is 
the best way to wield it? Out of my childhood experiences came a lifelong passion 
to get better answers to those two questions. I was hooked. Pricing would become 
my lifelong companion. But the journey from the small farm to global pricing expert 
was anything but straightforward. 
 Pricing Student: The Journey Begins 
 In college I was fascinated by lectures on pricing theories. They were mathematically elegant and often very complex. These challenging lessons gave me a solid set 
of ways to think about price problems, structure them, and solve them. They would 
become one more essential building block to my understanding of how pricing 
works. 
 But the farmer’s son in me noticed something right away: the professors and 
their students rarely talked about how any of these theories applied to real life. 
At the time I had no idea that one could eventually apply these concepts to realworld problems. Only years later would I understand that the math also matters, and 
that it can provide companies a strong competitive edge when combined with other 
aspects of pricing. 
 Pricing became an emotional experience again when I met Professor Reinhard 
Selten, who would go on to win the Nobel Prize in Economics in 1994 for his work 
on game theory . Professor Selten conducted a pricing experiment in class with real 
money at stake. He offered a prize of $100. One “A” player and four “B” players 
could divide this money up among themselves if they could form a coalition that 
lasted at least 10 minutes. 
 Imagine now that you are the A player, which was my role. What would you do? 
What principles would you follow? What are your motivations? Keep those thoughts 
in mind as you read further. Toward the end of this chapter, I’ll reveal how the 
experiment turned out. What I will say now, though, is that the results of this 
experiment cemented the word “value” in my vocabulary. They taught me fi rst hand 
that pricing is about how people divide up value. 
1
 “Hier ist meine Seele vergraben” (Here my soul is buried), interview with Hermann Simon Welt
 am Sonntag , November 9, 2008, p. 37. 
1 My First Painful Encounters with Prices
3
 Back in the 1970s, at the time I completed my master’s degree in economics, no 
one in the business world thought of pricing as a discipline unto itself. That left me 
with only one practical option if I wanted to continue exploring my passion for pricing. I needed to stay in academia. The next major milestone came with my doctoral 
dissertation “Pricing Strategies for New Products.” During my time as a teaching 
assistant I had the chance to work on several expert opinion papers which addressed 
questions about pricing policies. These papers gave me my fi rst glimpse of how 
large companies priced their products. I do recall a strong feeling that their processes and policies had considerable room for improvement, but at that time I lacked 
specifi c solutions. 
 The next stop on my journey came in January 1979, during my time as a postdoc 
fellow at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology . Within a matter of a few days, 
I would meet three people who would not only infl uence my own career path, but 
who would also lay the groundwork for pricing to grow from an academic topic for 
a few passionate professors to a vital corporate function and a powerful marketing 
tool. 
 First I visited Professor Philip Kotler at Northwestern University . Kotler had 
become a marketing guru at a relatively young age, and I was eager to show him my 
research results on how a buyer’s price sensitivity changes over the course of a 
product’s life cycle. This is a topic all shoppers around the world experience nowadays, whether they are looking at high-tech gadgets in an online store or eyeing a 
basket of very ripe fruit at a local market: the value we perceive changes as the 
product ages. I wanted to know how that translated into opportunities for smart 
pricing. 
 In 1978 I had published a paper in Management Science , the leading journal at 
that time, which showed that one of Kotler’s models on the dynamics of price s during a product’s life cycle had implications which were nonsensical. My own empirical research on the dynamics of price elasticity over the product life cycle also 
contradicted the prevailing conventional wisdom. 
 Full of self-confi dence, I told Professor Kotler that I wanted to conduct unconventional research into pricing. I wanted to go outside the realm of sophisticated 
functions and elegant theories and actually produce something that a manager or 
salesperson could understand and apply to his or her own business decisions. 
 He quickly burst my bubble. 
 “Most scientifi c marketing researchers want to uncover something that is relevant for day-to-day business,” Kotler told me. “Few succeed.” 
 I knew that Kotler was correct. Most of the science around pricing came from 
microeconomics. If pricing remained limited to the boundaries and shifts in microeconomics, its real-world relevance would be marginal at best. 
 Kotler did offer me one bit of encouragement, though. He knew someone who 
called himself a “price consultant,” someone who apparently made a decent living 
by helping companies with pricing problems. The term “price consultant” sounds 
intuitive now, but it struck me as unimaginable when I fi rst heard it. How did he do 
that? What did he recommend to his clients? I fi led the term away and vowed to 
track down this “price consultant” after my trip and learn more about his work. 
Pricing Student: The Journey Begins
4
 The same trip to Northwestern took me several miles south along Lake Michigan 
to the South Side campus of the University of Chicago , where I had appointments 
with assistant professors Robert J. Dolan and Thomas T. Nagle the next day. 
 I arrived in the evening and walked about four blocks through the biting cold and 
wind from the Illinois Central train station to the University guesthouse. When I 
met my hosts at the business school the next morning and told them that I walked in 
the night from the train station to the guesthouse, they were horrifi ed. 
 “How could you be so careless!” they said. “This is a high crime area. You were 
really lucky you didn’t get mugged.” 
 Weather and crime risks aside, the University of Chicago was the place for me, 
as a quantitatively educated economist. It was something like visiting the Vatican. 
The business school had young professors who focused on the same research areas 
I did, namely Dolan and Nagle, at a time when so many new, exciting ideas started 
to percolate: empirical measurements of price elasticity and demand curve s, nonlinear pricing , price bundling , dynamic modeling , the effect of price on the diffusion 
of new products, and many others. I stood out as a controversial fi gure, the unknown 
from Germany who had dared to attack the great Philip Kotler. Though Kotler himself took the criticisms in stride (the two of us remain friends to this day), many 
others viewed my comments as an insult. These feelings faded into the background 
though. As young professors focused on pricing research, we had plenty to discuss. 
Nagle left UChicago several years later and founded the Strategic Pricing Group , 
which concentrated on pricing training. He would also write Strategies and Tactics 
of Pricing , which would become one of the best-selling books on the topic. Nagle 
and I would usually meet when I visited Boston over the years. 
 Dolan and I, however, forged a lifelong friendship among ourselves and our 
families. He would later switch to Harvard Business School , where I was a MarvinBower- Fellow 2
 for the 1988/1989 academic year. Dolan and I began an intensive 
cooperation and started publishing jointly, culminating in the book Power Pricing
in 1996. 3
 A little later in 1979, I did indeed follow up on the referral Kotler gave me. I 
contacted Dan Nimer, the man who called himself a price consultant. He sent me 
some of his articles, and the differences between his publications and the theoretical 
papers I’d read and written in my academic career could not be more striking. The 
scientifi c papers on price in the academic world were long on theory but devoid of 
practical advice. Nimer’s papers were the exact opposite, chock full of simple but 
useful insights. He had a very good intuitive feel for pricing tricks and tactics, without exploring or perhaps even knowing their theoretical underpinnings. For instance, 
he had recommended price bundling a couple of years before a Stanford professor 
presented the theory and showed why price bundling can be optimal. 
2
 Marvin Bower (1903–2003) is the co-founder of McKinsey & Company. He also was very interested in my pricing work. 
3
 Dolan RJ, Simon H (1996) Power pricing – how managing price transforms the bottom line. Free 
Press, New York. 
1 My First Painful Encounters with Prices
5
 Nimer was the practice-oriented consultant who had a toolbox, before this 
 toolbox was proven by academia. His enthusiasm for price consulting was contagious; it certainly infected me. And he was interested in what we young guys were 
doing. When people who are older, more experienced, and more famous than you 
are taking an interest in your work, it provides a tremendous motivation. 
 I would see Nimer on occasion in the ensuing years. Into his 90s, his enthusiasm 
did not wane. He still lectured on pricing and advised clients. In 2012, members of 
the pricing community honored this visionary of pricing with a voluminous book of 
almost 400 pages for his 90th birthday. 4
 I had the honor to contribute a chapter titled 
“How Price Consulting is Coming of Age” to Nimer’s anniversary publication. 
 All of these encounters and relationships made 1979 a watershed year in my 
understanding of pricing and its future. It would still take me six years, though, 
before I would fi nd a way to weave all of these strands together—emotion, incentives, theory, math, value, and research—to offer companies the support I knew 
deep down inside that they needed. Between 1979 and 1985, I continued within 
academia to raise awareness about the importance of pricing and the fascinating 
areas of study within it. 
 Pricing Professor: Academia Was Still My Only Option 
 In the fall of 1979, I started teaching business administration at various universities 
and business schools. My research focused primarily on pricing. This culminated in 
the publication of my fi rst book, Preismanagement in 1982. The English title Price 
Management under which I published a book in 1989 5
 may seem very simple, but I 
thought long and hard about what to call the book. The idea of managing prices was 
not in the mainstream back then. If any terms had common usage, they were “price 
theory” or “price policy.” The former dealt with the highly quantitative concepts I 
fi rst encountered in my studies of economics. Prices must ultimately be quantitative. We express them in numbers. The latter term, “price policy,” described what 
businesspeople actually did. It was highly qualitative, a sort of oral or written history passed on from one generation to the next at a company. 
 With the term “ price management ” I wanted to integrate these seemingly incompatible worlds in a way that would serve the managers, salespeople, and the fi nance 
teams that make price decisions every day. In other words, I tried to take the quantitative, theoretical concepts and make them accessible and useful so that these businesspeople could make better pricing decisions at their own companies. 
 During my tenure as a university professor, I regularly gave speeches and seminars on price management to businesspeople. I also sponsored numerous master’s 
theses and dissertations on the topic. Many of these papers raised as many new 
questions as they answered. They combined with other research to expand and 
4
 Smith GE (ed) Visionary pricing: refl ections and advances in honor of Dan Nimer. Emerald 
Publishing Group, Bingley. 
5
 Simon H (1989) Price management. Elsevier, New York. 
Pricing Professor: Academia Was Still My Only Option
6
deepen the body of knowledge on price management. That helps explain why the 
second edition of the book Price Management , published in 1992, swelled to 740 
pages. This growth in knowledge met a demand for more insights into pricing. 
 Pricing Consultant: We Take Theory into the Real World 
 Since 1975 I had been teaching in a 3-week management seminar for “high potentials” for Hoechst , a large chemical company and the world’s largest pharmaceutical fi rm at the time. I extended my teaching activities to business schools around 
the world, through guest professorships at INSEAD , London Business School , 
 Keio University (Tokyo), Stanford, and Harvard. And I started to advise companies. In the beginning it was a small side business and a nice change of pace from 
the academic grind. The time had now come to take the next step and take on the 
job title that Dan Nimer had coined in the 1970s. I dared to call myself a “price 
consultant.” 
 My very fi rst consulting project was for the chemical giant BASF . The BASF 
management told me that they needed to reconsider their market segmentation in 
the industrial paint business, and asked for our support. We also received projects 
from Hoechst , which became our biggest client in those early years. By 1985, I was 
well known in German and European industry and earned an appointment as director of the German Management Institute , which almost all large German companies 
belong to. Within a very short time, I got to know the top brass of German 
industry. 
 We soon realized that the only way to do all this work professionally was to form 
a consulting fi rm. So in 1985 I founded a fi rm together with my fi rst two doctoral 
students, Eckhard Kucher and Karl-Heinz Sebastian. Similar to the motivation 
behind the book Price Management , we wanted to apply the methods and theories 
of academic research to actual business problems. Eckhard and Karl-Heinz ran the 
fl edgling company, taking advantage of my industry connections before developing 
their own. With three additional employees, we achieved $400,000 in revenue in the 
fi rst year. In 1989 the fi rm had 13 employees and $2.2 million in sales . The growth 
continued slowly but steadily, as we gained more and more confi dence that we had 
tapped an unmet need for businesses. 
 As I said about Dan Nimer: when people who are older, more experienced, and 
more famous than you are taking an interest in your work, it provides a tremendous 
motivation. Around this time we received further support and inspiration from the 
world-renowned management thinker Peter Drucker. He and I had many interesting 
discussions about pricing, and he always encouraged me to pursue the goal of fi nding practical applications for pricing theory and research. 
 “I am impressed by your emphasis on pricing,” he told me during a visit to his 
home in Claremont, California, adding that it is the “most neglected area of marketing.” Drucker saw a clear link between pricing and profi t and also sensed the same 
improvement potential I fi rst noticed in my doctoral research. 
1 My First Painful Encounters with Prices
7
 Pricing intrigued Drucker from an economics and also from an ethical perspective. 
He understood profi t to be the “cost of survival” and suffi ciently high prices to be a 
“means for survival,” two points which resonated deeply with me. In the 21st century, 
the word “profi t” has become a magnet for protests and negative headlines. Drucker 
always tried to strike a clear ethical balance. He warned against the abuses of market 
power. He commented on price transparency , and advocated fair behavior. At the 
same time, he understood the importance of making money, and described it very 
eloquently in an opinion piece in The Wall Street Journal in 1975:
 It is not the business that earns a profi t adequate to its genuine costs of capital, to the risks 
of tomorrow and to the needs of tomorrow’s worker and pensioner, that ‘rips off’ society. It 
is the business that fails to do so. 
 “Pricing policy today is basically guess work,” he told me in the early 2000s. 
“What you are doing is pioneering work. And I think that it will be quite some time 
before any of the competitors catch on.” 6
 Shortly before his death in 2005, he provided a testimonial for Manage for Profi t , not for Market Share , a book which I 
co-wrote with two colleagues: “Market share and profi tability have to be balanced 
and profi tability has often been neglected. This book is therefore a greatly needed 
correction.” 7
 By 1995, our little consulting fi rm had 35 employees and revenues of $7.9 million. At that point, I decided to stop serving two masters. I ended my academic 
career and devoted myself full time to the fi rm and its emphasis on price management . In 1995, I became the full-time CEO of Simon-Kucher & Partners and fulfi lled that role until 2009. Since then I have served as the fi rm’s chairman. 
 In 2015, Simon-Kucher & Partners achieves revenue of $235 million. At the end 
of 2015, the fi rm had more than 850 employees working out of 30 offi ces in 24 
countries around the world. Simon-Kucher & Partners is now widely considered to 
be the global market leader in the specialized area of price consulting . 
 From that fi rst visit to a farmer’s market to my latest trip to give a speech in China, 
I have encountered prices in thousands of forms. This challenging lifelong journey to 
understand prices—where they come from, why they work, and how they work—has 
been immense fun at times, especially during those “Eureka” moments when my 
colleagues and I unlocked another secret with the real-world relevance which 
Professor Philip Kotler said was so elusive. You will read about many of those 
moments in this book. But I have also experienced frustration, confusion, and occasional helplessness. You will read about some of those moments as well. 
6
 Personal letter from Peter Drucker, July 7, 2003. 
7
 Personal letter from Doris Drucker, the wife of Peter Drucker, on November 2, 2005. She wrote: 
“I am sorry to tell you that Peter is very ill. Before his collapse he dictated a letter to you. The 
secretary just brought it here for his signature.” This note was followed by his testimonial for the 
book. He and I were scheduled to meet on November 12, 2005, at his house in Claremont, 
CA. The evening before the meeting, I called from Mexico City to confi rm. Mrs. Drucker 
answered the phone and said, “Peter died this morning.” I was shocked. 
Price Consultant: We Take Theory into the Real World
8
 The biggest pricing triumphs came when we helped companies create and launch 
new pricing approaches that resulted in a big win for consumers and the company. 
In 1992, we introduced a discount card with an upfront fee for the huge German 
Railroad Corporation . Consumers loved it, because it made travel planning much 
simpler and provided unprecedented price transparency . The company loved it, 
because they would have a steady income stream from the card fees and earned 
higher revenue as more people saw the train as a practical, affordable option. 
 I was also proud that we helped Daimler implement a relatively high price when 
it launched the revolutionary Mercedes A-Class. Our teams have helped Porsche 
launch new models and have helped most major Internet companies use better pricing to turn their breakthrough ideas into sustainable, successful businesses. 
 A critical part of these triumphs is the ability to anticipate future trends and estimate their impact. In some industries, such as petroleum exploration, events may 
take years to unfold. A few times, though, the world changed in a matter of minutes. 
We developed new pricing for TUI , the world’s largest tour operator, and we were 
on target to launch the system with them on October 1, 2001. The terrorist attacks 
on September 11 rendered every assumption, every analysis, and every recommendation behind that system obsolete. Nonetheless, it was comforting to receive an 
e-mail from TUI’s top management a year later which explained that the work on 
the new pricing system was not for naught. They said that the company would have 
been much worse off if they had kept the previous system in place. 
 You might call Professor Selten’s game the fi rst pricing triumph I ever had, 
because it taught me about the importance of value, incentives, and communication. 
Unlike the experiences at the farmer’s market, I had an opportunity to infl uence the 
amount of money I would take away from a negotiation. What were your thoughts 
about being Player A? When I had that role that afternoon long ago, the B players 
and I had a lot of back-and-forth negotiations before a coalition fi nally stood for the 
required 10 minutes. Two of the B players took home $20, and I left with $60, a lot 
of money for a student at that time, 20 % above the expected value. 8
 Pricing is 
always a refl ection of how people divide up value. This experiment was one of the 
highlights of my studies. 
 Naturally, I have experienced some fl ops as a pricing consultant, either because 
the client couldn’t implement our price recommendation or because the price 
change did not yield the anticipated effects in the market. Fortunately these fl ops 
were few and far between. I have also had many intense discussions with clients 
who resisted our recommendations. In hindsight it is still hard to tell sometimes 
which party was right. A business team may have many viable options, but can 
choose only one. These decisions involve so many factors and face so many market 
dynamics that black-and-white certainty is rare. 
 Everyone creates and consumes value. We are constantly making decisions about 
whether something is worth our money, or trying to convince others to part with 
their money. That is the essence of pricing. Please join me in this book on a journey 
through that amazing world. Enjoy the confessions of the pricing man! 
8
 Since the A player has double the weight of the B players the expected distribution is $50 for the 
A player and $25 for two B players. But any other outcome is possible. It depends all on the 
negotiations. 
1 My First Painful Encounters with Prices
© Springer International Publishing Switzerland 2015 9
H. Simon, Confessions of the Pricing Man, DOI 10.1007/978-3-319-20400-0_2
 2 Everything Revolves Around Price 
 Prices are the central hinges of a market economy. Think about it: every dollar of 
revenue and profi t that a company generates is the direct or indirect result of a price 
decision. Each expenditure in your personal budget gets you something in return, 
which means you paid a price each time. Everything revolves around prices. Yet 
despite this pervasiveness—and the thousands of books and millions of articles 
dedicated to pricing—so many people still know precious little about prices, where 
they come from, and what effects they have. In 2014, former Microsoft CEO Steve 
Ballmer stressed this point in a talk with entrepreneurs:
 [T]his thing called ‘price’ is really, really important. I still think that a lot of people underthink it through. You have a lot of companies that start and the only difference between the 
ones that succeed and fail is that one fi gured out how to make money, because they were 
deep-in thinking through the revenue, price, and business model . I think that’s underattended to generally. 1
 What comes to mind when you think about the word “price”? Of course, you can 
type “price” into Wikipedia and get a summary of theory not too far removed from 
what many of us saw in our college days. Flip open any economics textbook and 
you see that prices help balance supply and demand . In highly competitive markets, 
price is a manager’s weapon of choice, the most frequently used form of aggression. 
The common notion among managers is that no other marketing instrument is better 
suited to increase sales volume s quickly and effectively than price cuts. That’s why 
 price war s are the rule rather than the exception in many markets, often with devastating effects on profi ts. 
 Managers tend to have fear of prices, especially when they need to increase 
them. The fear has one legitimate source: one can never know with absolute certainty how customers will react to a price change . If we raise prices, will customers 
remain loyal or will they run in droves to the competition? Will they really buy 
more, if we cut prices? 
1
 Be all-in, or all-out: Steve Ballmer’s advice for start-ups. The Next Web, March 4, 2014. 
10
 Special discounts and price promotion s—two standard forms of price cuts—are 
an everyday occurrence in retail , but they seem to occur with increasing frequency 
and depth. In recent years, promotions accounted for 50 % of beer sales in one of 
the world’s largest beer markets. 2
 Just two years later, some 70 % of all beer sales at 
the retail level came on special offer, with discounts as high as 50 %. 3
 Whether 
driven by opportunity or perceived necessity, this is clear evidence that managers 
think that aggressive prices help their business. But is this really true? 
 To appreciate this uncertainty, you need only to listen to the simple explanation 
offered by Best Buy CEO Hubert Joly after his company suffered disappointing 
 sales during the 2013 holiday season in the USA: “The highly promotional environment has not led to higher industry demand.” In fact, The Wall Street Journal
reported that Best Buy’s aggressive discounting “appeared to do nothing to persuade shoppers to buy more electronics. Instead, they just reduced the price of what 
was sold.” 
 Price changes are high-stakes decisions with dramatic consequences when they 
go wrong. Shares in Best Buy fell by almost 30 % the day after the news about the 
holiday sales broke. This catastrophic, nationwide effect on customer and shareholder opinion is why managers will keep their hands off the pricing lever if they 
have doubt, turning their attention to something more tangible and more certain: 
 cost management . Cost management involves internal matters and supplier relationships, which managers generally feel are less sensitive and easier to handle than 
their customer relations . 
 Yes, uncertainty and mystery surround pricing. As with any branch of science, 
the deeper we dig and the more we learn, the more questions we get. But over the 
last 30 years, we have made enormous progress in understanding and applying pricing actions, strategies, tactics, and tricks. Classical economics has developed new 
 price structure s such as nonlinear pricing , bundling , and multi-person pricing . The 
beginning of the 21st century saw a surge in interest and research into behavioral 
economics , revealing many phenomena that classic economics cannot explain. We 
will touch on more of these fascinating behavioral fi ndings in Chap. 3. But fi rst, let’s 
take a closer look into prices, where they come from, and the effects they have. 
 What Does “Price” Actually Mean? 
 Most people probably think of “price” in its simplest form: it is the number of monetary units you need to pay for a good or service. Keeping things rough and round, 
a gallon of gas costs around $4, a large regular coffee costs around $2, and a ticket 
to a movie can run you $10. Most products and services we encounter day to day 
have that characteristic. Or do they? 
2
 Kapalschinski C (2013) Bierbrauer kämpfen um höhere Preise. Handelsblatt, January 23, 2013, 
p. 18. The beer market in this case is Germany. 
3
 Brauereien beklagen Rabattschlachten im Handel. Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, April 20, 
2013, p. 12. 
2 Everything Revolves Around Price
11
 If you fi ll up your tank, you may get a discount on a car wash. Combine your 
coffee with a donut or bagel, and you may get a discount. Stop at the concession 
stand at the movies, and you will probably notice the bundles (large drink, large 
popcorn) before you ever see their individual prices . 
 It gets even more complicated. Try to answer these questions quickly: How much 
does one minute cost on your mobile phone plan? How much do you pay for 1 kWh 
of electricity? How much does your daily commute cost you? It is hard to answer 
these questions spontaneously, because for many goods and services, prices have 
many dimensions. That makes it hard for you to tease out the real, relevant number. 
 Even when prices have just one dimension, the “how much?” question can 
depend on many different variables, as Fig. 2.1 shows.
 Prices, in terms of what you actually pay, are the by-product of this complexity. 
Few can make sense of the pricing structures of telecom companies, banks, airlines , 
or utilities. The Internet has increased price transparency , but the sheer volume of 
available information plus the overwhelming number of products and sellers often 
neutralize that advantage. Prices often change from minute to minute or hour to 
hour, which can also make any advantage fl eeting. You remain confused, just to a 
greater extent. 
 The price list of a bank typically has hundreds of line items. Wholesalers carry 
tens of thousands of products, each with its own pricing quirks. Carmakers and 
heavy machinery makers need hundreds of thousands of spare part s, meaning they 
need hundreds of thousands of prices. And if there is a grand prize in this escalation, 
it probably goes to major airlines , who make millions of price change s every year. 
 How do customers cope with this jumble of prices, price variable s, and price 
change s? At a workshop in Dubai, I asked a manager from Emirates , one of the 
world’s largest airlines , to explain how the pricing works for their New York-Dubai 
stretch. 
 “That is a diffi cult question,” he responded with a resigned smile. 
 “Yes it is,” I agreed. “But millions of travelers need to fi gure out questions like 
that every day.” 
Base price 
Discounts, bonuses, rebates, conditions, special offers
Differentiated prices by package size or product variant
Differentiated prices based on customer segment (e.g. child, senior), time of day, 
location, or phase of the product cycle
Prices for complementary products (razors and blades; smartphones and data 
plans) 
Prices for special or additional services
Prices with two or more dimensions (e.g. upfront charge and a usage fee)
Bundles
Prices based on personal negotiations
Wholesale, retail, and manufacturers‘ suggested retail prices (MSRP)
 Fig. 2.1 The many dimensions of prices 
 What Does “Price” Actually Mean?
12
 Doing that task manually would be almost impossible. Price comparison sites 
like kayak.com make the task somewhat easier for customers, who still need to trust 
the level of price transparency and the quality of the comparisons. But how does this 
work within the company itself, if managers have a hard time explaining their pricing? How well do they understand the effects of their decisions on volume , revenue, 
and profi t? 
 I am not trying to single out Emirates or the airline industry. Many industries 
share this same challenge. The complexity and the many dimensions of pricing create opportunities which can be very lucrative if you make the right decision, but that 
same complexity also increases the downside risk if you make a mistake. There is 
always one “right” price or price structure and a multitude of “wrong” ones. The 
Russians have a saying which sums this up: “In every market there are two kinds of 
fools. One charges too much, the other charges too little.” Consumers face a similar 
challenge. Everyone can recall that euphoric feeling when your research and efforts 
yielded a deal which saved you a lot of money. But at one time or another, all of us 
have also been burned. Whether you are a manager or a consumer, a seller or a 
buyer, you need to strike the right balance between value and money. 
 You will never make perfect decisions all the time, as a buyer or seller. But my 
decades of experience have taught me that an adequate level of “ pricing wisdom ” 
goes a long way. The more we understand about prices and become aware of how 
they work, the greater our chances of using pricing to build a more successful business or sort through the tsunami of price information to fi nd better deals. 
 “Price” Goes by Many Aliases 
 Normal goods and services have a “price” or a “price tag.” But that term is too crude 
for other industries. Insurance companies do not talk about prices; they talk about 
their “premiums,” a more genteel and harmless term. Lawyers, consultants, and architects have fees or receive an honorarium. Private schools charge tuitions. Governments 
and public authorities have fees and taxes and sometimes surcharges and surtaxes, to 
cover everything from trash removal to schools to driver’s licenses and inspections. 
Highways, bridges, and tunnels frequently require tolls. Apartment dwellers pay rent. 
Brokers charge commissions. An English private bank didn’t send me a price list for 
its services, but they happily made their “schedule of charges” available. 
 The price you see on the list or the sign, however, isn’t always the fi nal price. In 
 business-to-business transactions, where most prices are negotiated, suppliers and 
middlemen see “price” as a battle on many fronts. Using the list price at best as 
guidance or starting point, they negotiate intensely over terms and conditions, such 
as discounts, payment terms, order minimums, and on-invoice and off-invoice 
rebates. Some cultures still use barter for business or personal transactions. 
 “Compensation” is another term that clouds the nature of a transaction and the 
prices within it. At your last performance review, it probably never crossed your 
mind to talk about the price you charge for your contribution to your company. 
Instead you used terms like salary, wage, bonus , or stipend. 
2 Everything Revolves Around Price
13
 No matter what you call it, though, price is price. We are constantly making 
 decisions about whether something is worth our money, or trying to convince others 
to part with their money. That is the essence of pricing, regardless of what we call 
the money or the means by which the parties close the transaction. Everything has 
a price. 
 Price = Value 
 People have asked me thousands of times to name the most important aspect of 
 pricing. I answer with one word: “value.” 
 When asked to elaborate, I will use the term “value to customer.” The price a 
customer is willing to pay, and therefore the price a company can achieve, is always 
a refl ection of the perceived value of the product or service in the customer’s eyes. 
If the customer perceives a higher value, his or her willingness to pay rises. The 
converse is equally true: if the customer perceives a lower value relative to competitive products, willingness to pay drops. 
 “Perceive” is the operative word. When a company tries to fi gure out the price it 
can achieve, only the subjective (perceived) value of the customer matters. The 
objective value of the product or other measures of value, such as the Marxian theory that value is defi ned by the human labor time invested, do not matter intrinsically. They matter only to the degree that the customer thinks they matter and is 
willing to a pay a price in return. 
 The Romans understood this connection so well that they incorporated it into 
their language. In Latin the word “pretium” means both price and value. Literally 
speaking, price and value are one and the same. This is a good guideline for businesses to follow when they make their price decisions. It leaves managers with three 
tasks:
– Create value : The quality of materials, performance, and design all drive the 
 perceived value of customers. This is also where innovation comes into play. 
– Communicate value : This is how you infl uence customers’ perception. It includes 
how you describe the product, your selling proposition, and last but not least the 
 brand . Value communication also covers packaging, product performance, and 
shelf or online placement. 
– Retain value: What happens post-purchase is decisive in shaping a lasting, positive perception. Expectations about how the value lasts will have a decisive infl uence on a customer’s willingness to pay for luxury goods, consumer durables, 
and cars. 
 The process of price setting begins at the conception of the product idea. A company must think about prices as early and often as possible in the development 
process, not just after a product is ready to launch. Customers and consumers also 
have homework to do. The age-old maxims of “buyer beware” and “you get what 
you pay for” are appropriate warnings. As a customer you have to make sure that 
 Price = Value
14
you understand the value the product or service offers you, and then decide how 
much you are willing to pay for it. This knowledge of value is your best protection 
prior to purchase, in order to avoid regretting the decision. 
 I have to confess that I learned this lesson the hard way. The farms in my home 
village were so small that two or three farmers needed to share a reaping-andbinding machine. That also meant that we all needed to help each other with our 
harvests. When I was 16, I had had enough of this time-consuming routine and 
decided to do something about it. My family would become independent. Without 
asking my father, I spent $600 on a second-hand reaping-and-binding machine. The 
price seemed very reasonable, and I was proud to have found such a bargain! Then 
we used it for the next harvest and quickly made a frustrating discovery. The 
machine used a new and unfamiliar system, which proved unreliable in practice. 
The damn thing kept breaking down. So much for my bargain! The frustration 
dogged us for two years, before we scrapped the machine for good. I had learned my 
lesson. As the French say, “le prix s’oublie, la qualité reste.” Loosely translated, 
that means that the quality you bought endures long after you have forgotten the 
price. 
 The famous Spanish philosopher Baltasar Gracian (1601–1658), whose wise 
words I would not encounter until many years after that episode with the harvesting 
machine, summed up the same sentiment this way: “That is the worst and yet easiest 
error. Better be cheated in the price than in the quality of goods.” 4
 I wonder sometimes whether public authorities or corporations take that into account when they 
insist on choosing the lowest bidder for a job. 
 Yes, it is very frustrating to pay more than you should have. But the anger over 
this form of “rip-off” fades if the product still gets the job done. Worse is the situation when the product is fl awed. The frustration stays with you until you fi nally use 
up the product or get rid of it. The moral here is that one should not lose sight of 
quality in pursuit of a better deal. Admittedly, that is easier said than done. 
 This reminds me of my fi rst encounter with an international tax advisor. The fi rst 
time I had a complex tax issue, he took about 30 minutes to answer it. Then he sent 
me a bill for $1,500. This amount was so outrageously high that it had to be an honest mistake. So I called him up. 
 “Don’t you think that amount is a bit too high for a half hour of work?” I asked. 
 “Look at this way, Mr. Simon,” he explained. “You could have asked a normal 
tax consultant. They would have probably taken three days to answer your question, 
and their answer may still have been sub-optimal. I understood your problem within 
15 minutes, and then needed 15 more to come up with the optimal solution for you.” 
 He was right. When I look back now, his answer was indeed the optimal one for 
me. I learned that good advice is not expensive. It is quite affordable, if you can 
recognize its value. The challenge, of course, is that we tend to appreciate the value 
of advice only with the benefi t of hindsight. Paying that kind of money requires trust 
and sometimes a leap of faith. The time spent on the solution often has little correlation with its quality. 
4
 Gracian B (1991) The art of worldly wisdom. Doubleday, New York, p. 68. 
2 Everything Revolves Around Price
15
 Price is often ephemeral and quickly forgotten. Consumer research and 
 behavioral studies show time and again that we struggle to remember prices, even 
for products we just purchased. But quality, good or bad, stays with us. Every one 
of us has quickly seen a deal, bought a product, and then realized that the product 
didn’t live up to even our most modest expectations. Many of us have also paid a 
price that seemed too high, but ended up surprised by the exceptional quality of the 
product. When my mother bought her fi rst washing machine in 1964 she chose a 
 Miele . The price was outrageously high for a poor farming family, but she never 
regretted this purchase. The machine lasted until she passed away in 2003. 
 Creating and Communicating Value 
 Offering true value is a necessary but by no means suffi cient condition for success. 
Far too often I have heard managers claim that if you make a good product, it will 
sell itself. This is especially common among managers with a background in engineering or sciences. A board member of a major carmaker believed this wholeheartedly. “If we build good cars, we won’t have to worry about our sales fi gures,” he 
told me in the mid-1980s. Today this company is in big trouble. 
 What a mistake! 
 Fortunately, managers nowadays strike a much different tone. Martin 
Winterkorn, the CEO of Volkswagen Group , the largest car company in the 
world in 2014, said at a recent workshop that “we need to build excellent cars, 
but the brand is just as important as the product.” 5
 That is an impressive statement for someone trained as an engineer, and the kind of statement one would 
not have heard a couple of decades ago. 
 What has changed in the meantime? Managers have become keenly aware that 
value alone does you little good unless you can communicate it successfully. That 
means that customers understand and appreciate what they are buying. Remember, 
the only fundamental driver of willingness to pay is the perceived value in the eyes 
of the customer. 
 Nonetheless, the struggles continue. What makes the understanding of value to 
customer so complicated is that this value is often inextricably linked to outcomes 
which managers fail to truly understand and quantify: second-order effect s and 
 intangible benefi t s. 
 To understand the power of second-order effect s, imagine that you work in the 
air-conditioner business. Your company designs special air conditioners for heavy 
trucks, the kind that logistics companies use for long-haul traffi c. If I asked you 
about the quality of your product—what makes it good —you could pull out a spec 
sheet and tell me how fast it cools, how intuitive it is to use, and how quiet it is. But 
5
 Workshop on the implementation of multibrand strategies within pricing, Wolfsburg, Germany, 
March 5, 2009. 
 Creating and Communicating Value
16
if I asked you to tell what really determines the value of your product to your customer, 
the trucking company, and how much that value is, what would you say? 
 Don’t worry if you just shook your head or shrugged your shoulders. I got the 
exact same response when I posed that question to a company that really does make 
those products. To fi nd out the answer, they commissioned an occupational health 
and safety study which documented two things that determined the value of the airconditioning devices: they reduced the number of accidents and the number of sick 
days. This is a common example of a second-order effect . By keeping the drivers 
cool and comfortable (fi rst order) the product showed its true value by keeping them 
safer and keeping them healthy and on the job (second-order effect). Noticing the 
subjective improvement in driver comfort was easy, but this soft factor is hard to 
quantify. What a logistics company can measure, though, is its savings from fewer 
accidents and sick days. These hard benefi ts far outweighed the costs of equipping 
their trucks with the air-conditioning units. The manufacturer used the study to support its value communication in its negotiations with customers. 
 The card for the rail service in Chap. 1 shows the power of intangible benefi t s. 
As you might recall, my team helped the German Railroad Corporation launch a 
 discount card with an upfront fee. The promise of a 50 % discount on each ticket 
convinced millions of people to sign up and take the train more often. But the company noticed that many cardholders, even those who renewed from year to year, did 
not fully amortize their cards. In other words, their savings were less than the fee for 
the card. 
 That makes no economic sense unless you take the intangible benefi t s into 
account. Two of the most powerful intangible benefi ts we willingly pay for every 
day are convenience and peace of mind. Rail passengers saved a lot of time and 
frustration because they could purchase a ticket on any stretch at any time at a discount of 50 %, knowing that they have likely chosen the least expensive way to get 
to their destination. By adding this intangible value, the rail service justifi ed the 
price of the card in the mind of the customer, even when consumers didn’t ride 
enough to cover the card’s fee. 
 Modern methods allow market researchers to put a monetary value on intangible factors such as brand , design , and service friendliness. Armed with this 
knowledge, companies can design quality products without over-engineering 
them, and offer those products at prices which have a better chance of resonating 
with customers. 
 For many products, especially industrial goods, the most effective way to communicate value is to express it in terms of money. Witness the table below which 
 General Electric , often a pioneer in better pricing, included in its 2012 annual report. 
Figure 2.2 shows in dollar terms the dramatic impact of energy savings. The time 
frame is 15 years, because the products GE sells require a signifi cant investment 
and are expected to last at least that long.
 Whenever possible, you should try to communicate value using hard data, especially in a business-to-business situation. This is of course a bigger challenge for 
 consumer products . As advertising guru David Ogilvy once wrote, Coke doesn’t try 
2 Everything Revolves Around Price
17
to beat Pepsi by saying how many more cola berries it uses in its mix. 6
 Prestige, 
quality, and design are harder to put numbers on. The appliance maker Miele has 
found a way around this, though, by regularly communicating that its machines last 
for 20 years. The washing machine my mother bought actually lasted almost 
40 years. Consumers are free to do their own extrapolations on what that means in 
terms of reliability, peace of mind, and convenience. But the bottom line is that the 
claim is true and Miele customers know it. That explains why the company has a 
repeat purchase rate of almost 100 % in spite of its high prices. Only perceived 
value creates willingness to pay . 
 What Smart Pricing Can Achieve: The 2012 London Olympics 
 Pricing played a decisive role in the spectacular success of the 2012 Olympic Games 
in London. Paul Williamson, who was responsible for managing the ticket program, 
used prices not only as an effective revenue and profi t driver but in addition as a 
powerful communications tool. 7
 The digits of the prices themselves were designed 
to send a message without any additional commentary. The lowest standard price 
was £20.12, and the most expensive was £2,012. The number “2012” appeared over 
and over again in the price points, and everyone knew immediately that such price 
points referred to the Olympic Games. 
 For children under 18, the motto was “Pay Your Age”; a 6-year-old would pay 
£6, and a 16-year-old £16. This price structure generated an extremely positive resonance; the media reported on it thousands of times. Even the Queen and the Prime 
Minister publicly praised the “Pay Your Age” tactic. These prices were not only an 
effective means of communication, but also perceived as very fair. Seniors could 
also purchase lower price tickets. 
6
 Ogilvy D (1985) Ogilvy on advertising . Vintage Books, New York. 
7
 Vgl. Williamson P (2012) Pricing for the London Olympics 2012. Speech at World Meeting of 
 Simon-Kucher & Partners , Bonn, 14 Dezember 2012. 
 Fig. 2.2 Value communication by General Electric 
 What Smart Pricing Can Achieve: The 2012 London Olympics
18
 Another important feature of the price structure : there were absolutely no discounts. The management of the London Olympics remained fi rm about this policy, 
even when certain events did not sell out. This sent the clear signal about value: the 
tickets and the events were worth their price. The team also decided not to offer any 
bundles, a common practice in sports under which a team combines attractive and 
less attractive games or events into a single package. Local public transportation, 
however, was bundled together with the tickets. 
 The organization relied very heavily on the Internet both for communications 
and sales . Approximately 99 % of tickets were sold online. The goal prior to the 
Olympic Games was ticket revenues of £376 million ($625 million). With his ingenious price structure and communication campaign, Williamson and his organization blew that target away, generating ticket revenues of £660 million ($1.1 billion). 
That was 75 % more than anticipated, and more ticket revenue than from the preceding three Olympic Games (Beijing, Athens, and Sydney) combined. The London 
ticket team’s work demonstrated that the powerful combination of high perceived 
value and excellent communication can drive higher willingness to pay . The following case is even more spectacular. 
 What Smart Pricing Can Achieve: The BahnCard 
 A new price system can have revolutionary impact. In the early 1990s, the German 
Railroad Corporation Deutsche Bahn (DB for short) was in deep trouble. More and 
more people switched to driving and shunned the train. The price of a train ticket 
was one big cause of that: it was almost twice the price of gasoline for a car trip of 
the same distance. 
 In the fall of 1991, Hemjö Klein, DB’s CEO for passenger traffi c at the time, 
issued us a challenge: fi nd a way to make travel by rail more price competitive with 
travel by car. Our research revealed that when drivers compare the costs for rail and 
car travel, they tend to consider only the cost of gasoline, their so-called out-ofpocket costs. At that time, the price for a second-class ticket on DB was the equivalent of about 16 US cents per kilometer, while the cost for gas for a typical 
mass-market car such as a Volkswagen Golf was only about 10 US cents per kilometer. That meant that a trip of 500 km would cost about $80 on the rails, while the 
cost of gas for a drive of identical distance would be only about $50. With this kind 
of price disadvantage, the chances for DB looked dismal. An outright cut in the 
price of a train ticket to below 10 cents per kilometer, in order to compete better 
against car travel, was out of the question. 
 If an outright price cut wouldn’t work, what would? The breakthrough came 
when we realized that the true cost of a car trip has two components: the variable 
costs we notice every day (gas) and the fi xed costs that go largely unnoticed on a 
daily basis (e.g., insurance, depreciation, excise taxes). Was it possible to split the 
costs of a train trip into fi xed costs and variable costs as well? 
 Yes, it was. The BahnCard was born. 
2 Everything Revolves Around Price
19
 Instead of one single price for a train trip, the price now had two components: the 
price of the ticket (variable) and the price of the BahnCard (fi xed). The fi rst 
BahnCard was launched on October 1, 1992, for second-class tickets at an annual 
price of roughly $140 per year, and the fi rst-class version followed a few weeks 
later at an annual price of $280 per year. Seniors and students paid half-price for 
their cards. Whoever had a BahnCard could purchase tickets at a discount of 50 % 
off the regular price. This reduced the variable cost for a train trip to 8 cents per 
kilometer, noticeably below the 10 cents per kilometer for the typical car trip. 
 The BahnCard 50 (so named because of its discount ) became an immediate hit. 
Within four months, DB had sold over one million cards. And the number grew year 
by year to four million around the year 2000, when Hartmut Mehdorn took over as 
 CEO of DB. He had a strong affi nity to the airline business and is known as one of 
the toughest managers in Germany. He called in airline consultants, who killed the 
BahnCard 50 in 2002 and introduced a new system which required passengers to 
reserve in advance, similar to air travel. But Mehdorn’s calculations took neither the 
individual consumer nor the general public into account. In the spring of 2003, 
Germany stood on the verge of a consumer revolt, because the DB had killed off the 
beloved BahnCard 50. At the beginning of May, I met Mehdorn at a conference in 
Frankfurt and asked him why he scrapped the BahnCard. 
 “It didn’t fi t into the system anymore,” he replied. “And I’m not about to let 
people ride at half-price on Friday afternoon or Sunday evening, which are our peak 
times!” 
 “You’re missing the point,” I replied. “These people have already paid several 
hundred Euros before they even got their fi rst discount . Their real discount for a trip 
is actually much less than 50 percent.” I must confess that I didn’t know the true average discount BahnCard holders got at that time. The amount is hard to calculate. 
 A few days later Mehdorn called me. On Sunday, May 18, 2003, I met him in 
Berlin’s most famous hotel, the Adlon. I was accompanied by Georg Tacke, who 
had written his doctoral dissertation on two-dimensional price schemes and had also 
played a key role in the development of the initial BahnCard 50 ten years earlier. 
Just two days later, we started on a fresh revision to the railroad’s price system. We 
worked day and night. We turned over each stone of the “airline” system. Every 
Tuesday at 6 p.m. we presented to the DB Board. I still remember the heated discussions, especially with the super-tough Hartmut Mehdorn ( nomen est omen : Hartmut 
literally means “hard courage” in German). Eventually we convinced him and his 
colleagues. On July 2, 2003, only six weeks after we had started the project, DB 
announced at a major press conference that it would reintroduce the BahnCard 50 
on August 1. In the meantime, another version of the card, the BahnCard 25 (giving 
a discount of 25 %) had been introduced. And we added a new card, the BahnCard 
100, which allows its holder to ride free of charge for an entire year after paying the 
(high) upfront fee (100 stands for 100 % discount). DB later fi red the “airline” managers who had been responsible for the disaster. 
 Today about fi ve million people have a BahnCard. The annual fee s range from 
61 Euros (roughly $80) for the BahnCard 25 in second class up to $8,900 for the 
BahnCard 100 in fi rst class. The BahnCard 50 costs 249 Euros (roughly $325) in 
 What Smart Pricing Can Achieve: The BahnCard
20
second class and 498 Euros (around $650) in fi rst class. There are also business versions of the card with additional services. As Fig. 2.3 shows, the variants of the 
BahnCard offer very different levels of savings against the regular ticket prices. 
The data are for the second-class versions on the card. The percentage savings for 
the fi rst-class BahnCards are roughly similar.
 For every BahnCard variant, the effective discount off the regular prices increases, 
the more the cardholder uses the card. This gives cardholders a strong incentive to 
“earn back” their investment in the card. In this way, the BahnCard becomes a very 
effective customer retention instrument. 
 The project in 2003 revealed an intriguing insight. The BahnCard 50 customers 
saved on average just under 30 % off regular prices. But in the customers’ perception the savings is 50 % on every ticket. In other words, DB’s customers feel that 
they have gained an advantage of 50 %, but it only cost the company a little less 
than 30 % to create that impression. Not a bad deal! 
 The BahnCard opens up opportunities for DB, but it is not without risks. One 
critical aspect is how many BahnCard cardholders travel by train instead of by car 
after they have made their investment in a BahnCard. One well-known economist 
told me that he purchased the BahnCard 100 to force himself to travel by train and 
give up his car entirely. DB would sacrifi ce a tremendous amount of revenue, if the 
only ones who bought BahnCards were already heavy users. Such customers pay 
considerably less with the BahnCard than they would have without it. In contrast, 
the company earns more than before from BahnCard customers who before didn’t 
travel by train frequently. Only a small number of customers know the exact breakeven points between the different BahnCard variants. Quite a few of the BahnCard 
50 holders are unlikely to reach their break-even point, but they still enjoy getting a 
 discount of 50 % each time they buy a ticket. 
 The BahnCard 100 deserves special mention. DB had offered a personalized 
annual “network pass” for ages, but in an awkward form. One had to fi ll out a kind 
of “application.” DB did not actively promote the network pass; few people knew of 
its existence. It sold less than 1,000 passes per year. The inclusion of the BahnCard 
 Fig. 2.3 Savings with the BahnCard (second class) 
2 Everything Revolves Around Price
21
100 into the BahnCard system caused sales to multiply, despite a slight price 
increase . Today 42,000 people have a BahnCard 100. This card has an unbeatable 
convenience advantage. Its holders never need to buy a ticket. They can simply 
board any train they want and go as far as they want. 
 Today the revenues from the BahnCard and the associated ticket sales run into 
the billions. BahnCard customers account for the lion’s share of DB’s revenues 
from long-distance passenger traffi c. The BahnCard is by far the most popular product of DB. And it is also DB’s most effective loyalty instrument. 
 Two-dimensional price systems of the BahnCard type are still quite rare. We 
once developed a similar system for a major airline under the working title “Fly & 
Save.” The card, which gave a discount on all tickets for the continent (not the 
world), would have had a price of around $7,000. The risk was higher here, because 
there was a substantial number of heavy travelers who would have saved a lot of 
money with the “Fly & Save” card. But the ultimate reason the airline did not launch 
the card was antitrust . It would have created such a strong preference for this airline 
on the part of the cardholders, because each customer who bought such a card would 
use only this airline if at all possible. The lawyers concluded, probably rightly so, 
that the antitrust authorities would prohibit the scheme. The “Fly & Save Card” 
project was shelved. I wonder whether it will return some day. The dilemma here is 
that an airline with a high market share runs into antitrust problems. For an airline 
with a weak market position and a smaller network, such a card would not be as 
effective, and people’s willingness to pay for it is most likely substantially lower. 
 Yes, I confess that I am still proud today to have contributed to the BahnCard, 
both in its initial launch in 1992 and its resurrection in 2003. I am convinced that we 
will see more of these two-dimensional price schemes. The success of the BahnCard 
and also Amazon ’s Prime, another popular two-dimensional pricing scheme, make 
me believe that this concept can be fruitful in many other industries. But their introduction requires a deep understanding of the economic, psychological, and in some 
cases legal factors involved. They are not without risk. 
 Supply and Demand 
 In economic terms, the most important role price plays is in creating a balance 
between supply and demand . Higher prices mean that supply increases. The supply 
curve has an upward (positive) slope. Higher prices also mean that demand goes 
down. The demand curve , therefore, has a downward (negative) slope. The point 
where the two curves intersect is known as the market-clearing price , the only price 
at which supply and demand are in equilibrium . 
 Equilibrium means that every supplier willing to sell at that price can sell his or 
her desired volume , and likewise every buyer can fi nd his or her desired volume at 
that same price. In a market with free supply and free demand, a market-clearing 
price always emerges. If the government intervenes through regulation, taxation, or 
other barriers, the result is almost always an imbalance between supply and demand . 
Supply and Demand
22
 Scarcity and Boom-and-Bust Cycles 
 Price is the most powerful indicator of a good’s scarcity . A rising price is an indicator that the supply for the good will soon grow. Higher prices tend to yield higher 
profi ts for producers, leading them to expand their production volumes. This expansion diverts resources away from less scarce goods, allowing the company to produce more of the scarce good faster. The opposite happens when prices decline. 
Lower prices indicate an oversupply , if not a glut, and suppliers cut back on production. The lower prices eventually encourage more consumers to buy, thus creating 
an equilibrium . 
 In one of the fi rst economics lectures I attended in college, I asked the professor 
why it always seemed to work out, more or less, that the right volume of product 
ended up in a marketplace. He simply stared me down, aghast that someone would 
ask such a stupid question which had nothing to do with the formulas and theories 
up on the board. Yet the question is central to any functioning market economy. In 
a controlled and short-term manner, we see it in action every time we see the word 
“clearance” in an advertisement or on a sign in a store window. Sometimes it takes 
many years for these cycles to run their course, and as they do they exert an 
extremely strong infl uence on national economies and their policy making. 
 Changes in prices often have a delayed effect, which is sometimes referred to as 
a “boom-and-bust cycle” or “ hog cycle .” When hogs are in short supply, prices for 
hogs rise. This encourages farmers to raise more hogs for the next season. When this 
increased supply hits the market after a few months it causes prices to drop. This 
encourages farmers to raise fewer hogs the next time … and the cycle continues on 
and on. 
 In some markets, such as petroleum exploration and production, these price 
cycles may take 10–15 years to unfold. In 1997 my team conducted a global survey 
for Deminex , a large oil and gas exploration company. We interviewed all major oil 
companies in the world. We wanted to gather long-term forecasts for the crude oil 
price, which stood at around $20 per barrel at that time. Most of the forecasts clustered around $15 per barrel, and by the beginning of 1999 the price had actually 
plunged to $12 per barrel. 
 The expectations of a downward price trend had already manifested themselves 
in investment decisions. They would later become the underlying cause for the high 
crude oil prices in recent years, peaking at more than ten times the prices of 1999. 
That may sound like a paradox until you look more closely at how this “ hog cycle ” 
unfolded. Overall investment in new exploration projects fell sharply during the 
period of low oil prices. Only the most promising projects received funding. Fewer 
projects meant less oil as those new fi elds came online and older fi elds matured. 
That factor, combined with rising demand for oil in China and emerging markets , 
led to a wide and enduring gulf between demand and supply. 
 Price changes refl ected this differential. In July 2008, the oil price reached 
$147.90 per barrel, an all-time high. That 10-year period, not coincidentally, coincides with the amount of time it can take for a development project to go from initial 
exploration to full production. This decade-long run-up in price encouraged 
2 Everything Revolves Around Price
23
companies to invest more in exploration and also to scale up new sources and methods of production, which were impossible to fund at $12 per barrel but could turn a 
nice profi t with oil over $100 per barrel. Demand from emerging markets , heightened sensitivity to environmental impacts, and more effi cient uses for fuel are wild 
cards in the equation and make an exact forecast impossible. An increase in supply 
is inevitable, even if it takes a few more years to come online. The lesson—whether 
from oil or hogs—is that price cycles are natural occurrences, much more likely 
than sustained upward or downward trends in prices. One part of the world experiencing the “boom” part of the cycle right now is the state of North Dakota, where 
new discoveries and extraction technology have boosted oil production so rapidly 
that the state now trails only Texas in terms of output in the USA. 8
 The side effect is 
a boom in other parts of the North Dakota economy. The most expensive rents 
(again, prices!) in the USA in early 2014 were not in Manhattan or Silicon Valley. 
They were in the town of Williston, North Dakota. 9
 But this didn’t last. In 2015 the 
oil price dropped below $50 per barrel. 
 Price and Government 
 Imbalances occur whenever price mechanisms get disrupted. And the biggest disrupter of all, across the globe and throughout history, is government , which intervenes in pricing in many ways. This intervention can cause oversupply , whether it 
is mountains of butter or oceans of milk. It can also cause undersupply, which some 
of you might know of from rent control or from conditions in former socialist or 
communist countries. 
 You can get a better sense for my viewpoint when you look at how the government sets prices. Under names such as tolls, fees, and taxes instead of prices, the 
government actually does a lot of price setting. Your utilities, the cost of a passport, 
the price to register a business, and the cost of a subway ride can come directly from 
government entities or government oversight. The problem is that governments 
rarely rely on market signals to set these prices. These “prices” are political decisions, not economic ones. 
 American readers are familiar with the current fi nancial performance of Amtrak 
and the postal service, but older readers will recall the monopoly that AT&T had in 
phone services through 1984 and the effects of airline and rail regulation which 
lasted until the 1970s. The situation was even more extreme in Europe in the decades 
after World War II, as large parts of Western European economies came under the 
control of government -sponsored monopolies or market-dominating companies. 
The sectors ranged from telephony, television, utilities, and postal services to trains 
and airlines . Many of these monopolies endure until today. 
 The lesson here is that to the greatest extent possible, one should leave price setting to markets themselves and let events run their course. I understand that this 
8
 Data from the US Energy Information Administration for January 2014. 
9
 North Dakota wants you: Seeks to fi ll 20,000 jobs. CNN Money, March 14, 2014. 
 Price and Government
24
stance is controversial, especially to those who feel that the government should 
intervene to prevent price gouging , or, in broader context, feel that greater regulation may have prevented events which helped trigger the Great Recession in 2008. 
 Nonetheless, some types of government involvement do ensure that competition 
and price mechanisms operate smoothly and fairly. In the USA, the Department of 
Justice and the Federal Trade Commission have this watchdog role. In Europe, the 
responsibility falls to national antitrust authorities and the European Commission. 
All these authorities and agencies have become far stricter and vigilant over the last 
decade. One of these authorities’ mandates is to break up cartels, which occur when 
companies explicitly or tacitly agree to divide up markets in terms of prices, conditions, or volumes. When they do bust a cartel , they levy fi nes which often total in 
the billions of dollars. In December 2012, the European Commission fi ned seven 
manufacturers of tubes for televisions and computers a total of $1.9 billion. In 
December 2013, the European Commission struck again. It fi ned six fi nancial institutions a total of $2.3 billion for an alleged interest rate cartel in the derivatives 
industry. 
 The largest punishment against an individual European company came in 2008, 
when the EU fi ned St. Gobain roughly $1.2 billion for its role in a cartel for automotive glass. In the USA the “largest price fi xing investigation ever” has targeted automotive suppliers and has resulted in prison time for 12 managers so far and fi nes of 
over $1 billion. 10
 Tighter antitrust regulation contributes to better price competition . It is one of the 
rare examples of government intervention which actually allows pricing mechanisms in markets to function more freely. 
 Price and Power 
 “The single most important business decision in evaluating a business is pricing 
power ,” investor Warren Buffett said. “And if you need a prayer session before raising price, then you’ve got a terrible business.” 11 Here is a case of true pricing power: 
In a Fortune interview media mogul Rupert Murdoch talks about the business of 
Michael Bloomberg. Murdoch said that Bloomberg created a great company, and 
then “he kept pushing it. And now those who use it buy it at a huge price—can’t live 
without it. When their costs go up a bit, they put the prices up, and no one cancels.” 12
Wouldn’t each company love to have such pricing power? 
 Pricing power is indeed critical. Pricing power determines whether a supplier 
can achieve his or her desired price s. It also determines the degree to which a brand 
can earn a premium price . The fl ipside of pricing power is buying power : to what 
extent can a buyer get the desired prices from his or her suppliers ? In some 
10 Probe Pops Car-Part Keiretsu. The Wall Street Journal Europe, February 18, 2013, p. 22. 
11 Interview with Warren Buffett before the Financial Crisis Inquiry Commission (FCIC) on May 
26, 2010. 
12 Sellers P (2014) Rupert Murdoch - The Fortune Interview. Fortune, April 28, 2014, pp. 52–58. 
2 Everything Revolves Around Price
25
industries, such as car manufacturing, purchasing power is high and buyers wield 
signifi cant buying power over suppliers. Likewise, retailers can exert their buying 
power over suppliers when market concentration is high. 
 One unusual interpretation of pricing and power goes back to the French sociologist Gabriel Tarde (1843–1904), who considered every agreement on a price, wage, 
and interest rate to be equivalent to military truce. 13 Price negotiations are similar to 
war, eventually ending in a truce. You have this sense often after wage negotiations 
between unions and employers. The peace lasts only until the next round of fi ghting 
begins. In a business-to-business negotiation, the agreement on a price refl ects a 
power struggle between supplier and customer. Fortunately it is not a zero-sum 
game. But price plays a pivotal role in how a pool of money gets divided up between 
a supplier and a customer. 
 In reality, the pricing power of most companies is relatively modest. SimonKucher & Partners interviewed over 2,700 managers in 50 countries for its “Global 
Pricing Study” 14 and found that only 33 % of respondents felt that their companies 
had a high level of pricing power. The remaining two-thirds admitted that their 
companies are not able to implement their desired price s in the market, which puts 
their profi tability at risk. 
 The study’s insights into the sources of pricing power offer guidance for those 
fi rms looking for an edge. Pricing power was 35 % higher in companies if top management was involved in setting the framework for pricing decisions instead of 
delegating that authority. Companies with dedicated pricing departments had 24 % 
more pricing power than companies without such departments. The key lesson is 
that it pays for top managers to make a strong and serious commitment to better 
pricing and to invest time and energy into this endeavor. This sparks a positive spiral, as higher pricing power leads to sustainably higher prices and higher profi ts. 
 Pricing Pushes Its Boundaries 
 For centuries, certain goods and services had no prices. The use of streets was free, 
going to school cost nothing, and many services came with an all-inclusive price. 
Governments, churches, or charities delivered goods and services at no charge, 
because it would help others or because charging a price would be considered 
immoral or taboo. But that is changing quickly. 
 In his book What Money Can’t Buy: The Moral Limits of Markets , Harvard philosopher Michael J. Sandel reports that prices are creeping into all realms of our 
lives. 15 The airline Easy Jet charges passengers $16 to be among the fi rst to board 
the aircraft. It costs a foreigner $14 to enter the USA. That is the cost of an entry into 
13 Tarde G (1902) Psychologie économique, 2 volumes. Alcan, Paris. 
14 The study was conducted in 2012. 
15 Sandel MJ (2012) What money can’t buy: the moral limits of markets. Farrar, Straus and Giroux, 
New York. 
 Pricing Pushes Its Boundaries
26
ESTA (Electronic System for Travel Authorization). In some countries you can pay 
extra during rush hour to travel in exclusive lanes, with the prices dependent on the 
current traffi c. For a fee of $1,500 per year, some doctors in the USA offer a dedicated cell phone access number and 24/7 availability. In Afghanistan and other war 
zones, private companies paid mercenaries between $250 and $1,000 per day, with 
the price based on qualifi cations, experience, and the mercenary’s country of origin. 
In Iraq and Afghanistan, these private security and military companies had more 
people on the ground than the US armed forces did. 16
 Moving further along the moral spectrum, one can pay a surrogate mother in 
India $6,250 to carry a baby to full term. If you want to immigrate to the USA, you 
can purchase that right for $500,000. 
 Someday many more things will have a price tag attached to it, as more and more 
of our lives and routines come under market and pricing mechanisms. This creep 
across moral and ethical boundaries is one of the most signifi cant economic trends 
of our time. 
 Sandel commented on this development. “When we decide that certain goods 
may be bought and sold, then we decide—at least implicitly—that it is appropriate 
to treat them as commodities, as instruments of profi t and use. But not all goods are 
properly valued in this way. The most obvious example is human beings.” 17
 In my childhood on the farm I experienced an entirely different world. Despite 
my remarks about prices for our hogs and our milk, money played a secondary role 
in our lives. Self-suffi ciency was the priority; neighbors helped neighbors without 
any formal “price” mechanism in effect. The money-based part of our economy was 
small. Nowadays, prices are pervasive. They are inescapable. You see them everywhere, sometimes in unexpected or troubling roles. An important question we all 
wrestle with is how much more these market forces—and with them, prices—will 
take over our lives. This makes it all the more important for us to understand how 
prices and pricing mechanisms work. 
16 Christian Miller T (2007) Contractors Outnumber Troops in Iraq. Los Angeles Times, July 4, 
2007 and Glanz J (2009) Contractors Outnumber U.S. Troops in Afghanistan. New York Times , 2. 
17 Sandel MJ (2012) What money can’t buy: the moral limits of markets. Farrar, Straus and Giroux, 
New York; see also Kay J (2013) Low-cost fl ights and the limits of what money can buy. Financial 
Times, January 23, 2013, p. 9. 
2 Everything Revolves Around Price
© Springer International Publishing Switzerland 2015 27
H. Simon, Confessions of the Pricing Man, DOI 10.1007/978-3-319-20400-0_3
 3 The Strange Psychology of Pricing 
 The principles of classical economics assume that buyers and sellers act rationally. 
Suppliers try to maximize their profi ts, while buyers try to maximize their value, or 
their “utility” in the vernacular of the economist. Under these principles, all parties 
have complete information. The sellers know how the buyer will respond to different prices, which means that they know their demand curve s. The buyers know all 
available alternatives and their prices, and can make qualifi ed judgments on the 
utility that each alternative provides, independent of its price. 
 Nobel Prize winners Paul Samuelson (1970) and Milton Friedman (1976) are 
prominent advocates of this view. Friedman said that buyers behave rationally, even 
though they don’t explicitly make their decisions using clever mathematics or elegant economic theories. Gary Becker (Nobel Prize, 1992) extended the idea of utility optimization or maximization to other aspects of life, such as crime, drug dealing, 
and family relationships. In his models, all parties likewise act rationally by seeking 
to maximize their gains and their utilities. 
 These assumptions about rationality and information fi rst came into doubt 
through the work of Herbert A. Simon 1
 ( Nobel Prize , 1978). In his view, people 
have only limited capacity to absorb and process information. For that reason, they 
do not strive to maximize their profi t and their utility. Instead, they content themselves with a “satisfactory” outcome. He coined the term “satisfi cing” to describe 
this behavior. 
 Akin to this initial doubt, psychologists Daniel Kahneman and Amos Tversky 
published their groundbreaking paper on “ prospect theory ” in 1979 and gave rise to 
a new school of thought called behavioral economics . 2
 Kahneman won the 2002 
 Nobel Prize . 3
 The number of authors and publications devoted to behavioral economics has exploded since then. Research in this direction—noteworthy that it was 
1
 Herbert Simon and I are not related. 
2
 Kahneman D, Tversky A (1979) Prospect theory: an analysis of decision under risk. Econometrica: 
pp. 263–291. 
3
 Tversky (1937–1996) had passed away by that time. 
28
initiated largely by noneconomists—may permanently alter economic theory. Price 
plays a central role in behavioral economics, with surprising and often counterintuitive outcomes and, thus, consequences for price management . The entire fi eld of 
behavioral economics is too complex and comprehensive to cover here. For now, 
we focus on the basic elements of behavioral pricing. If you would like a deeper 
treatment of behavioral economics, I would recommended Daniel Kahneman’s 
best-selling book Thinking Fast and Slow . 
 The Prestige Effect of Price 
 In classical economics, price plays a role in a purchase decision only because of its 
impact on the customer’s budget. The demand curve has a negative slope, which 
means the higher the price, the less the customer buys. There are exceptions to this 
situation, however, which give rise to apparently irrational consequences. 
 In his classic The Theory of the Leisure Class , the American economist and sociologist Thorstein Veblen revealed way back in 1898 that prices signal status and 
social prestige and therefore offer the buyer an additional level of psychosocial utility. This is known as the Veblen or “snob” effect. The price itself becomes an indicator for the quality and exclusivity of luxury products. A Ferrari wouldn’t be a Ferrari 
if it costs only $100,000. The demand curve for such products—at least within a 
certain range—has an upward (positive) slope, not a downward (negative) one. That 
means that a price increase leads to higher sales . This increases profi ts not only 
because of the higher unit margin s, but also because of higher unit sales . This powerful combination results in a veritable profi t explosion if the price is raised. 
 Such cases do indeed exist in real life. Delvaux , a Belgian manufacturer of 
exclusive handbags, raised prices massively in conjunction with a repositioning of 
the brand . Unit sales rose sharply, as consumers now viewed the product as a viable 
alternative to Louis Vuitton handbags. Sales of the famous whiskey brand Chivas 
Regal were in the doldrums in the 1970s. In order to reposition the brand, the company developed a label with a more high-end look and raised the price by 20 %. The 
whiskey itself remained exactly the same. In spite of the price increase , sales rose 
signifi cantly. 4
 MediaShop Group, one of the leading direct-response TV networks in Europe, 
introduced a new cosmetic accessory at a price of 29.90 Euros. Sales were sluggish, 
and management pulled the product, in order to free up valuable airtime for betterselling products. A few weeks later, they relaunched it with a new sales offensive 
and a new price: 39.90 Euros, a hefty increase of 33 %. This time, management 
apparently found the sweet spot for the price. Sales skyrocketed in a matter of days, 
leading to temporary supply shortages. The product became one of MediaShop’s 
top sellers, not in spite of its higher price, but because of it! 
4
 Müller K-M (2012) NeuroPricing. Haufe-Lexware, Freiburg. 
3 The Strange Psychology of Pricing
29
 For premium and luxury goods, one needs to know whether such prestige effect s 
exist and whether the demand curve has a part which slopes upward. If it does, the 
 optimal price never lies in that portion of the demand curve. It always lies higher, in 
the part where the curve slopes downward again. This reinforces a key lesson in this 
book: you need to know what your demand curve looks like, the more precisely, the 
better. When companies do not know their demand curves—especially in the case 
of premium and luxury goods—they will be poking around in the dark searching for 
the optimal price to charge. 
 If some uncertainty remains, I recommend feeling your way along by gradually 
raising prices toward that higher range. It is also often wise—as the cases of Delvaux 
and Chivas Regal show—to combine the higher price positioning with an enhanced 
 design or a packaging upgrade. 
 Price as an Indicator of Quality 
 An effect similar to the prestige phenomenon occurs when consumers use the price 
as an indicator of the product’s quality. A lower price can prompt a consumer to forgo 
a purchase, because the price raises concerns about the quality. Many customers act 
according to the motto “you get what you pay for” and steer clear of low- priced 
products. But the fl ipside of that statement is also valid for many customers. For 
them, the simple equation “higher price = higher quality” becomes a handy rule of 
thumb. In such cases, a price increase can lead to higher unit sales . How does price 
end up serving as an indicator of quality? I have several plausible explanations:
– Experience : A high price is seen as more likely to guarantee better quality than a 
low price, if a consumer has had a positive experience with a high-priced product 
before. 
– Ease of comparison : Consumers can use price to compare products immediately 
and objectively. This is especially true in situations—such as most consumer 
products —when the price is fi xed and nonnegotiable. In situations where prices 
are negotiated, such as industrial goods or at a bazaar, prices rarely serve as quality indicators. 
– A “ cost-plus ” mentality : In the minds of many customers, the price is closely 
related to the seller’s costs. In other words, consumers have a “cost-plus” mindset. They think that sellers base their prices on costs such as raw materials, manufacturing, and shipping. 
 When do consumers assess a product primarily or solely based on its price? Price 
is likely to serve as an indicator of quality when buyers are uncertain about a product’s underlying quality. This happens when they are confronted with a product that 
is entirely new to them or one which they rarely buy. Consumers are also prone to 
make such price-based judgments when the absolute price of the product is not very 
high, when they have little transparency on prices for alternatives, or when they are 
under time pressure. 
Price as an Indicator of Quality
30
 There are countless empirical observations of the role of price as a quality indicator and the related upward slope on a portion of the demand curve . It has occurred 
for products as diverse as furniture, carpet, shampoo, toothpaste, coffee, jams and 
jellies, and radios. Researchers have reported that unit sales rose after a price 
increase for nasal spray, panty hose, ink, and electrical goods. For one electric razor, 
 sales increased by a factor of four after the company raised prices sharply in order 
to come closer to the prices of Braun, the market leader. The price difference was 
still suffi cient to offer a purchase incentive, but no longer so large that consumers 
would start to doubt the razor’s quality. 
 I have observed similar effects in the service sector, particularly in restaurants and 
hotels. It also occurs in the business-to-business world. A software fi rm offered cloud 
software for businesses at an extremely low monthly fee of $19.90 per workstation. 
The price for the comparable competitive product stood at more than $100. Several 
months after the launch, the company’s CEO told me that “small businesses are really 
excited about our prices. For the fi rst time, they can afford this kind of software. But 
larger companies think our price point is so low that they have no faith in our product. 
Our extremely low price becomes a barrier to sales rather than an advantage.” 
 The solution lay in product and price differentiation . The company loaded up its 
product with additional features, and then offered the new package to larger companies at a signifi cantly higher fee per month. The package was still rather inexpensive, but it now fi t better into a more conventional price-value framework. Through 
this adaptation, the fi rm succeeded in getting rid of the negative image the previously low price had created. 
 The Placebo Effect of Price 
 The effect of price as a quality indicator sometimes goes beyond the mere level of 
perception and creates a true placebo effect . A placebo effect is therapeutic improvement in a patient who has received a treatment of no real medicinal value. In one 
test, study participants received a pain reliever at different prices. One group saw a 
tag with a high price, and the other group saw a low price. Without exception, the 
participants in the high-price group claimed that the pain reliever was very effective. In the low-price group, only half of the participants made that claim. 5
 In both 
cases, however, the pain reliever was actually a vitamin C placebo, which has no 
objective ability to relieve pain. The only difference between the two groups was 
the price the participants in each group saw. 
 Another fi nding: after consuming a power drink priced at $2.89, a group of athletes reported signifi cantly better training results than a group which drank the exact 
same power drink priced at 89 cents. The most surprising result, though, came in a 
study on intellectual skills among two groups: “Participants who consumed an 
5
 Ariely D (2010) Predictably irrational. Harper Perennial Edition, New York. 
3 The Strange Psychology of Pricing
31
energy drink they purchased at a discount price performed worse on a puzzlesolving task than did equivalent participants who purchased the same drink at its 
regular price.” 6
 Price differences really can create signifi cant placebo effect s. 
 Price as a Defused Weapon 
 If prestige, quality, or placebo effect s are present in a market, this has a major impact 
on both price positioning and price communication. These effects defuse price as a 
competitive weapon. If a supplier wants to increase its market share through aggressive pricing, the attempt will fail. One cannot rule out that both unit sales and market 
share will actually drop rather than increase. These effects make it very diffi cult for 
an unknown supplier or an unknown brand to break into a market where these phenomena exist. Attempts to win over customers through lower prices don’t work. 
These effects also explain why discounts on no-name products or weaker brands also 
fail to work: customers associate the reduced price with lower quality or with low 
prestige. According to automotive experts, Volkswagen’s Phaeton is a good luxury 
car, objectively in the same category as BMW , Mercedes , and Audi . Yet the Phaeton 
doesn’t sell well in Germany, because it lacks suffi cient prestige. The VW brand—
which is very strong in the company’s mass market segment—does not have the 
power to carry a product in the premium/luxury segment. As a result, even the offer 
of very low prices and leasing rates had little effect on sales of the Phaeton. If you 
offer those kinds of low prices on a strong brand, though, sales will explode, because 
high prices have already established the quality judgments about strong brands. 
 What should a company do when it can’t use price as a competitive weapon? The 
best method may be to position the product in a price range which corresponds to its 
true quality and accept lower sales initially. This may require considerable patience 
until customers actually learn and appreciate the product’s quality and its pricevalue relationship . Audi had this problem in the 1980s, and it took 20 years to get 
the brand to the price and prestige position it deserved. 
 Price Anchor Effects 
 What does a buyer do when he or she has neither the knowledge or means to make a 
qualifi ed assessment of a product’s quality, nor the information about the price range 
for this product category? One method is to do thorough research to reduce the information gaps by looking online, reading test reports, or asking friends. This time-consuming approach may make sense for a major purchase, such as a new car. But what 
does a buyer do when it is something of much lesser value, and this intensive research 
is not worth the investment? Buyers look for reference points or “anchors.” 
6
 Shiv B, Carrnon Z, Ariely D (2005) Placebo effects of marketing actions: consumer may get what 
they pay for. Journal of Marketing Research, pp. 383–393, November 2005, here p. 391. 
Price Anchor Effects
32
 Here is an old story about such a price anchor effect. 7
 The brothers Sid and Harry 
ran a clothing store in New York in the 1930s. Sid was the salesman, and Harry the 
tailor. If Sid noticed that a customer liked a suit, he would play dumb. If the customer asked about the price, Sid would call out to Harry back in the tailor shop. 
 “Harry, how much does this suit cost?” 
 “That nice suit? $42,” Harry would yell back. 
 Sid would act as if he didn’t understand. 
 “How much?” 
 “$42!” Harry would say again. 
 Sid would then turn to the customer and say that the suit’s price is $22. The customer didn’t hesitate, immediately putting $22 on the counter and leaving with the 
suit. The brothers’ price anchor had worked as planned. 
 This approach can also work for bigger ticket purchases, especially when combined with a premium or prestige effect . Two young construction workers became 
frustrated in their attempts to join a local union in California, so they decided to 
form their own company. Instead of describing themselves as masons, they claimed 
to be “European bricklayers. Experts in marble and stone.” To underscore this positioning, one of them would make the measurements at a prospective job site in 
meters and centimeters, and then show them to his colleague. The two of them 
would argue in German until the customer came over and asked what was going on. 
 “I don’t get why he thinks this patio will cost $8,000,” the one who took the 
measurements explained, pulling the customer aside. “Between you and me, I think 
we can build it for $7,000.” After some discussion with the customer and a little 
more arguing in German, the customer accepted the $7,000 bid. 
 The two immigrants built a solid business in this manner, before one of them left 
to pursue another career path. The one who took the measurements at the job site 
was a young Austrian bodybuilder named Arnold Schwarzenegger. 8
 The most diverse information sources can end up serving as price anchor s. This 
process of anchoring doesn’t even have to be a conscious one. As consumers and 
buyers we often use price anchors subconsciously. Price anchors also work effectively on professionals, not just on consumers. In one study, car experts were asked 
to assess the value of a used car. Someone stood next to the car, apparently just by 
chance, and remarked unprompted that the car is worth “x.” In one study with 60 
 automotive experts, the participants assessed the value of the car at $3,563 after the 
neutral observer gave $3,800 as the price anchor. But when the neutral person gave 
$2,800 as the anchor price, the experts’ average estimate came to $2,520. 9
 The casual 
remark by a random person had created a price anchor which altered the price perception of the experts by $1,043 for the identical car. Based on the average anchor 
7
 Cialdini RB (1993) Infl uence: science and practice. Harper Collins, New York. 
8
 Schwarzenegger A (2013) Total recall: my unbelievably true life story. Simon & Schuster, 
New York, p. 119. 
9
 Mussweiler T, Strack F, Pfeiffer T (2000) Overcoming the inevitable anchoring effect: considering the opposite compensates for selective accessibility. Personality and Social Psychology 
Bulletin, pp. 1142–1150. 
3 The Strange Psychology of Pricing
33
price of $3,300 across the two studies, this is a shift of 32 %. Similar anchor effects 
have occurred in many other studies. The researchers concluded that “anchoring is 
an exceptionally robust phenomenon that is diffi cult to avoid.” 10
 The Magic of the Middle, or the Story of the Padlock 
 Another interesting effect of price anchor s is the “magic of the middle.” How a 
price looks in relation to other prices can have a strong infl uence on a consumer’s 
behavior. An identical price of $10 can trigger widely different reactions, depending 
on whether it is the highest, lowest, or middle price in an assortment. Likewise, the 
number of alternatives in an assortment can exert a strong infl uence on customers’ 
choices. 
 I once needed a padlock for a barn door on my farm (the one where we raised 
hogs in the 1950s). When was the last time I had purchased a padlock? I had no idea. 
Nor did I have any clue about how much a padlock costs. So I went to the home 
improvement store and found a large assortment of locks, priced in a range of 
$4–$12. What did I do? On the one hand, I didn’t require a high level of security 
which would warrant the purchase of one of the expensive locks. On the other hand, 
I didn’t trust the quality of the cheaper locks. So I chose one from the middle of the 
range, priced at $8. 
 What does this teach us? When buyers know neither the price range of a product 
category nor have any special requirements (e.g., high quality, low price), they 
gravitate toward a price in the middle of the range. What does this mean for sellers? 
Quite simply, it means that a seller can use the price range in his assortment to steer 
customers toward certain price level s and away from others. If the price range for 
the locks at the home improvement store was $4–$16, I would have probably spent 
$10 on a new padlock. That would have generated 25 % more revenue for the store, 
and higher profi t margin s as well. 
 Neither the Cheapest nor the Most Expensive Wine 
 We observe the same behavior at restaurants when guests select a wine. After looking at the wine list, most guests order a wine with a price in the middle of the list. 
Only a few guests opt for the most expensive or least expensive wine. The middle 
has a magical allure. The same effect occurs with the food menu. Let’s assume that 
a restaurant offers its entrées in a price range from $10 to $20, and 20 % of the 
demand goes to the dish priced at $18. If the restaurant then adds an entrée at $25, 
the share of the $18 entrée is very likely to increase. Analogously, if the restaurant 
adds an entrée which is less expensive than the previously least expensive entrée, 
 sales for the latter option will likely increase, even though few customers ever 
10 ibidem, p. 1143. 
Neither the Cheapest nor the Most Expensive Wine
34
bought it in the past. The explanation is simple. The price of the formerly least 
expensive entrée has now moved closer to the middle of the price range. 11
 The less a buyer knows objectively about the quality of the products and prices 
in an assortment, the stronger the pull of the “magic of the middle” will be. One 
could even argue that this purchase behavior is rational, as the buyer tries to make 
the best possible decision with very limited information. By selecting a product 
from the middle of the price range, buyers simultaneously reduce the risk that they 
buy something of poor quality and the risk that they overspend. Sellers should not 
go to extremes to take advantage of this, however. They should be cautious setting 
 price anchor s at extremely high or extremely low levels. An extremely high price 
may scare off buyers who don’t want to spend that much, whereas an extremely low 
price may scare off buyers who become suspicious of the quality. 
 A Profit-Generating Product No One Ever Buys 
 Price anchor effects can make it worthwhile to carry a product in an assortment even 
though no customer ever buys it. The next case illustrates this. A customer enters a 
luggage store to purchase a new suitcase. The saleswomen asks how much he is 
willing to spend. 
 “I was thinking about $200,” the customer said. 
 “You can get a good suitcase for that amount,” the saleswoman responded. 
 “But before we take a closer look at the suitcases in that range, may I show you 
one of our fi ner pieces?” she asked. “I’m not trying to upsell you to a more expensive suitcase. I just want to inform you about our whole product range.” 
 The saleswoman then brings out a suitcase for $900. She emphasizes that in 
terms of quality, design , and brand name, it is truly a top-of-the-line model. Then 
she returns to the products in the customer’s desired price range, but also calls his 
attention to some models with slightly higher prices, between $250 and $300. How 
will the customer react? It is highly likely that he buys a model in the $250–$300 
price range and not something near his original target price of $200. The anchor 
effect created by the $900 model drew the buyer’s willingness to pay upward. Even 
if the store never sells even one $900 suitcase, it makes sense to keep it in the assortment, purely because of the anchor effect it creates. 
 Creating Scarcity 
 One of the cleverest tricks to boost sales is to create the perception of scarcity . The 
impression of consumers that a product is available only in limited supply can create a stronger urge to buy. In an in-store test in the USA, one group of shoppers was 
shown a sign for Campbell’s Soup which said “Limit of 12 per person.” The other 
11 Huber J, Puto C (1983) Market boundaries and product choice: illustrating attraction and substitution effects. Journal of Consumer Research 10: pp. 31–44. 
3 The Strange Psychology of Pricing
35
group was confronted with a display sign which read “No Limit per Person.” 
Shoppers in the fi rst group bought seven cans on average, and the shoppers in the 
latter group only half as many. At play here is not only an anchor effect—the sign 
suggests that buying 12 cans is normal—but also a hoarding effect. Buyers interpret 
such a sign as a signal that some kind of scarcity is looming. Similar reactions result 
when long lines form at the gas pump or at the cinema. In former socialist economies, scarcity was an everyday occurrence. Lines were everywhere. People bought 
whatever they could get their hands on. One never knew what might happen. 
 Selling More by Offering Additional Alternatives 
 At Simon-Kucher & Partners we have observed time and again that the introduction 
of additional alternatives can signifi cantly increase sales and shift demand toward 
higher priced products. This fi nding is one of the most astounding in behavioral 
pricing research. 12 Figure 3.1 shows the results of a study with two sets of alternatives. In Test A, respondents saw a checking account for $1 per month and a checking account plus credit card for $2.50 per month. 13 In test group A, 59 % selected the 
combination, while 41 % chose the checking-only alternative.
 In test group B the credit card was included as a stand-alone option at the same 
price as the combination (checking account and credit card). Only 2 % of respondents chose the stand-alone option for the credit card; the share of respondents 
selecting the combination jumped from 59 to 81 %. The average monthly revenue 
per customer rose from $1.89 to $2.42, an increase of 28 % … without implementing a price increase ! The only thing that changed was the structure of the offering 
itself. Banks serve a large number of customers. If the bank in Fig. 3.1 has one million customers, the additional revenue works out to $530,000 per month, or $6.36 
million per year, revenue essentially created out of nowhere. 
 Fig. 3.1 Banking products with two and three alternatives 
12 Trevisan E (2013) The irrational consumer: applying behavioural economics to your business 
strategy. Gower Publishing, Farnham Surrey (UK). 
13 Trevisan E (2012) The impact of behavioral pricing. Presentation at the Simon-Kucher University, 
August 14, 2012, Bonn. 
Selling More by Offering Additional Alternatives
36
 In terms of rational, classical economics, this result makes no sense. The addition 
of one alternative—which hardly anyone wanted—caused the share of respondents’ 
choosing the combination to rise sharply. What explains such a shift in purchase 
behavior? One possible explanation is the “magic of zero.” Setting the credit-cardonly option and the combination at the same price means that the customer receives 
added value with the combination at no extra charge. This temptation is too much 
for many customers to resist, so they choose the combination. The anchoring argument can also play a role here. Test B has two of its three alternatives set at $2.50, 
which pulls the overall price anchor upwards, and, thus, creates higher willingness 
to pay . 
 The following case comes from telecommunications . 14 In the fi rst test, respondents could choose between two plans, one with a basic monthly price of $25 and 
one with a fee of $60. Some 78 % of the respondents chose the less expensive plan, 
while the remainder selected the more expensive one. The average revenue per user 
(ARPU) from this test came to $32.80. In the second test, the respondents could 
choose among three plans priced at $25, $50, and $60. The highest and lowest 
prices remained the same; the only difference is the $50 plan inserted in between 
them. As you might now expect, the shift similar to the bank case occurred here as 
well. In the second test, only 44 % of respondents chose the cheapest plan, compared with 78 % in the fi rst test. Almost as many (42 %) went for the new $50 plan, 
and the remaining 14 % chose the most expensive plan. The ARPU increased to 
$40.50, or 23 % more than in the fi rst test, an enormous amount of additional revenue. What are the possible explanations for selecting the middle option in this case? 
Here are four hypotheses:
– Uncertainty : Customers don’t have a good estimate of their monthly usage, so 
they fall back on the “magic of the middle.” 
– Quality expectations : The customer thinks: “If the basic fee is so low, the service 
probably isn’t all that good.” 
– Peace of mind/risk avoidance : “If I end up making a lot of calls, it can get really 
expensive with the low base fee and high variable charges.” 
– Status : “I can afford it.” 
 In reality, these motivations don’t manifest themselves in their pure forms, but 
rather work in concert. These two cases demonstrate clearly that psychological 
effects are extremely important and relevant for price setting and assortment planning. Small changes in the assortment or price structure can have a dramatic impact 
on revenue and profi t, without any increases in costs. 
14 Simon-Kucher & Partners project from 2011, led by Dr. Philip Biermann. 
3 The Strange Psychology of Pricing
37
 Price Thresholds and Odd Prices 
 A section on pricing psychology would not be complete without some mention of 
 price threshold s and pricing on the 9s. A price threshold is a price point which triggers a pronounced change in sales whenever it is crossed. You might think of a price 
threshold as a kink in the demand curve . This price-threshold effect normally happens at round price points, such as $1, $5, $10, or $100. That is why many prices lie 
just under those thresholds, very often ending in a 9. 
 Eckhard Kucher, one of the co-founders of Simon-Kucher & Partners , examined 
18,096 prices of fast-moving consumer goods and found that 43.5 % of them ended 
in a 9. 15 No prices in his sample ended in a zero. Another study found that 25.9 % of 
the prices ended in 9. 16 At the gas pump, almost all prices end in 9, but go one step 
further: they are posted in tenths of a cent rather than in full cents, i.e., 0.1 cent 
under a full cent. If you fi ll a 20-gallon tank at a price of $3.599 per gallon, you pay 
$71.98. If the price were $3.60, you would pay $72.00, an absurdly small difference 
of just two cents. 
 The most important argument for the existence of odd prices is that customers 
perceive the digits in a price with decreasing intensity as they read from left to right. 
The fi rst digit in a price has the strongest infl uence on perception; that is, a price of 
$9.99 comes across as $9 plus something rather than $10. Neuropsychologists have 
confi rmed that the further to the right a digit is, the less infl uence it has on price 
perception . According to this hypothesis, customers underestimate prices which lie 
just under round numbers. 
 Another hypothesis claims that customers tend to associate prices ending in 9 
with promotions or special offers. Reducing a price from $1.00 to 99 cents sometimes results in a sharp jump in sales . Should one attribute this sales increase to its 
appearance as a special offer, rather than to the price reduction of a mere 1 %? The 
question of cause and effect remains open. 
 The fact—or rather the belief—that price threshold s exist has led to the widespread 
practice of using odd prices , which are prices not ending in zero. When consumers 
grow accustomed to these odd prices, they can show heightened sensitivity to prices 
and price increase s which breach nearby thresholds. The comparison of price increases 
in three brands of sparkling wine—Mumm, Kupferberg , and Fürst von Metternich —
indicates the presence of a price-threshold effect, as Fig. 3.2 shows. 17
15 Kucher E (1985) Scannerdaten und Preissensitivität bei Konsumgütern. Gabler-Verlag, 
Wiesbaden. 
16 Diller H, Brambach G Die Entwicklung der Preise und Preisfi guren nach der Euro-Einführung 
im Konsumgüter-Einzelhandel. In Handel im Fokus: Mitteilungen des Instituts für Handelsforschung 
an der Universität zu Köln 54(2): pp. 228–238. 
17 Rotkäppchen-Mumm steigert Absatz. LZnet, April 26, 2005; Rotkäppchen will nach Rekordjahr 
Preise erhöhen; Jeder dritte Sekt stammt aus dem ostdeutschen Konzern; Neuer Rosé; Mumm 
verliert weiter. Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, April 26, 2006, p. 23; and Sekt löst Turbulenzen 
aus. LZnet, November 29, 2007. 
Price Thresholds and Odd Prices
38
 The only price which crossed a price threshold was Mumm’s, which went above 
5 Euros. The volume decline for Mumm was much greater than what Kupferberg 
and Fürst von Metternich experienced, when we look at it from the perspective of 
 price elasticity . The price elasticity—which we will explore in greater detail in 
Chaps. 5 and 6—is defi ned as the percentage change in volume, divided by the 
percentage change in price. 18 Mumm’s price elasticity of 3.64 is signifi cantly higher 
than Kupferberg’s. It means that for Mumm, a price increase of 1 % would cause 
volume to drop by 3.64 %. It is hard to say precisely how much of the volume 
decline resulted from the price-threshold effect and how much from the normal 
effects of a price increase. If we make a rough approximation of 50:50, the pricethreshold elasticity would be 1.82. 
 Despite the frequency of reported cases such as these, convincing scientifi c 
evidence for a general price-threshold effect is still lacking. Columbia University 
professor Eli Ginzberg investigated the price-threshold effect as far back as 1936. 19
In 1951, business economist Joel Dean reported on a mail-order company’s experiment, in which the company systematically varied prices around various thresholds. 
“The results are shockingly variable […] sometimes moving a price from $2.98 to 
$3.00 dollars greatly increased sales , and sometimes it lowered them. There was no 
clear evidence of concentration of sales response at any fi gure.” 20 Eckhard Kucher 
was also unable to isolate systematic effects when prices crossed thresholds. 21 In 
another study on women’s clothing, a store tested three prices for the same item: 
$34, $39, and $44. The results were surprising. The highest sales came at the price 
of $39. Sales at $34 and $44 were each 20 % lower. 22 That indicates, as already 
mentioned above, that a price ending in 9 can signal a particularly favorable price. 
 Fig. 3.2 Price increases and their effects for three brands of sparkling wine 
18 Price elasticity is usually a negative number, because normally volume rises when prices falls 
and vice versa. But for simplicity’s sake, we generally leave off the negative sign and just write the 
absolute value. 
19 Ginzberg E (1936) Customary prices. American Economic Review (2): pp. 296. 
20 Dean J (1951) Managerial economics. Prentice Hall, Englewood Cliffs, NJ, p. 490 f. 
21 Kucher E (1985) Scannerdaten und Preissensitivität bei Konsumgütern. Gabler, Wiesbaden, p. 40. 
22 Anderson ET, Simester DI (2003) Effects of $9 price endings on retail sales , evidence from fi eld 
experiment s. Quantitative Marketing and Economics (1): pp. 93–110. 
3 The Strange Psychology of Pricing
39
These overall unclear fi ndings speak in favor of the hypothesis that economist Clive 
Granger ( Nobel Prize , 2003) and Professor Andre Gabor put forward in 1964, 
namely, that the belief in the price-threshold effect is a consequence of predominant 
marketing practices 23 ; that is, it must be effective because so many people do it. 
 Price thresholds—real or theoretical—can prove problematic when infl ation hits. 
At some point, a company needs to exceed a price threshold , which can lead to a 
sharp decline in sales . Another—sometimes admittedly problematic—way to get 
around a price increase is to change the package size in order to stay on the favorable side of a price threshold. The idea is that the average consumer will not notice 
if the new package they buy has slightly fewer units or fewer ounces than the package they used to buy, as long as the price is the same. This tactic caused an uproar 
after the fi nancial crisis hit in 2008. Skippy peanut butter gained nationwide attention when its manufacturer introduced a new jar with an indentation in the bottom. 
Outwardly a consumer noticed no difference at the shelf, but the jar contained less 
peanut butter. 24 In 2009, Häagen-Dazs reduced the size of its standard ice cream 
container to 14 from 16 ounces, yet still called the container a “pint.” This prompted 
its archrival, Ben and Jerry’s , to issue this statement:
 One of our competitors (think funny-sounding European name) recently announced they 
will be downsizing their pints from 16 to 14 ounces to cover increased ingredient and manufacturing costs and help improve their bottom line. We understand that in today’s hard economic times businesses are feeling the pinch. We also understand that many of you are also 
feeling the same, and think now more than ever you deserve your full pint of ice cream. 25
 Believing in the price-threshold effect can also result in missed opportunities, as 
the papers from several contemporary economics and psychology researchers 
show. One study demonstrated that clinging to prices that end in 9 can lead to considerable profi t sacrifi ces if there is no proof that the price threshold exists. 26 Other 
authors argued that misconceptions about price thresholds can have negative consequences. 27 Resellers (retailers, distributors, wholesalers) often have a return on sales 
of just 1 %. An across-the-board price increase from 99 cents to $1.00 would double 
their profi ts, assuming no change in volume . 28 Even if volume dropped signifi -
cantly—say by 10 %—the price increase would still have a positive effect on profi t. 
23 Gabor A, Granger CWJ (1964) Price sensitivity of the consumer. Journal of Advertising Research 
(4): pp. 40–44. 
24 Hirsch J (2009) Objects in store are smaller than they appear. Los Angeles Times, November 9, 
2008. 
25 Ben and Jerry’s Calls Out Haagen-Dazs on Shrinkage. Advertising Age, March 9, 2009. 
26 Diller H, Brielmaier A (1996) Die Wirkung gebrochener und runder Preise: Ergebnisse eines 
Feldexperiments im Drogeriewarensektor. Schmalenbachs Zeitschrift für betriebswirtschaftliche 
Forschung, July/August, pp. 695–710. 
27 Gedenk K, Sattler H (1999) Preisschwellen und Deckungsbeitrag – Verschenkt der Handel große 
Potentiale? Schmalenbachs Zeitschrift für betriebswirtschaftliche Forschung, January, pp. 33–59. 
28 Müller-Hagedorn L, Wierich R (2005) Preisschwellen bei auf 9-endenden Preisen? Eine Analyse 
des Preisgünstigkeitsurteils. Arbeitspapier Nr. 15, Universtität zu Köln, Seminar für Allgemeine 
Betriebswirtschaftslehre, Handel und Distribution, Köln, p. 5. 
Price Thresholds and Odd Prices
40
My own fi ndings show that it makes no sense to set prices at $9.90 or $9.95. If you 
want to remain below a price threshold, then you should set your price as close to 
the threshold as possible, which means $9.99 in this case. 
 Prospect Theory 
 The law of declining marginal utility was fi rst formulated in 1854. It has become 
one of the most widely known economic principles. It says that the marginal utility 
of a product declines with each additional unit that one consumes. This law makes 
no distinction, however, between positive and negative marginal utility. Kahneman 
and Tversky suggested that positive and negative marginal utility may be asymmetrical. Figure 3.3 shows the basic concept which they called “ prospect theory .” In 
the upper right quadrant, we see the positive portion of the utility curve, which corresponds to the traditional law from 1854. The perceived utility of a gain increases 
steadily, but at a diminishing rate. In other words, the utility of the fi rst $100 you 
win or earn is greater than your utility from the next incremental $100.
 Prospect theory differentiates between positive marginal utility (from gains) and 
a negative marginal utility (from losses). Perhaps a more fi tting term for the negative utility would be “marginal harm.” The curve for marginal harm is shown in the 
lower left quadrant. Similar to the pattern for gains, the marginal harm gets smaller 
as the size of the overall loss increases. That is not surprising. The real breakthrough 
message from prospect theory is this: for any absolute gain or loss of identical size, 
the negative utility from the loss is greater than the corresponding positive utility 
 Fig. 3.3 The prospect theory from Kahneman and Tversky 
3 The Strange Psychology of Pricing
41
from the gain. In other words, the pain we feel from a loss is greater than the happiness 
we feel from a gain, even if the magnitude of the loss and gain themselves is equal. 
This leads to some surprising consequences with real-life relevance. One such consequence: prospect theory shows that it is not only the net utility that matters to an 
individual, but how that net utility comes about. 
 What is the simplest way to explain this? Imagine someone who has entered a 
lottery. The sponsor calls him to say that he has just won $1 million. Then one hour 
later, the sponsor calls back to say: “Sorry. Tonight’s drawing was not valid. You 
didn’t win.” Suddenly the “winner” has experienced an extreme loss. His presumptive gain has been taken away. On a net basis, nothing changed. He wasn’t a millionaire before the fi rst call, nor was he a millionaire after the second one. But we 
can safely assume that his net utility from the entire experience was very negative, 
requiring days if not weeks to overcome the disappointment. 
 Prospect Theory and Price 
 What does prospect theory have to do with price? The theory is vitally important to 
pricing, even though the term “pricing” appears just twice in Kahneman’s seminal 
book. Paying a price generates negative utility . The amount that an individual parts 
with is a sacrifi ce, a loss. The purchase and use of a product or service, in contrast, 
represents a gain and generates positive utility . The asymmetry between the utility 
from gains and losses can cause some unusual effects. One is known as the endowment effect , which you can see in an experiment that Kahneman conducted with his 
students. The students in one group received mugs bearing the university’s logo. 
They were worth about $6 each. The students in the other group received nothing, 
but they could buy the mugs from the students in the other group. How would you 
expect the potential buyer s and sellers to behave? 
 The average asking price for the mugs was $7.12. The students who could buy 
the mugs offered on average only $2.87, a big difference. Because the students were 
split randomly into two groups, we should assume that each group would have the 
same price expectations. Classical economics cannot explain the large discrepancy 
between the two prices. But prospect theory can. The negative utility of giving up 
something we already own is signifi cantly greater than the positive utility we get 
from a good that we fi rst need to buy. We are all reluctant to part with what we have. 
 Business or Economy? 
 Prospect theory can also explain my own occasionally peculiar behavior. On 
October 27, 2011, I was scheduled to fl y back to Frankfurt from the Chinese city of 
Guangzhou. When I went to Lufthansa ’s business-class counter to check in, the 
agent informed me that business class was overbooked. He wanted to know if I 
would be willing to “downgrade” to economy and offered me 500 Euros. I said no. 
Then he immediately increased his offer to 1,500 Euros. That made me think. 
Business or Economy?
42
As reluctant as I am to wedge my 6-ft-5 frame into an economy seat for a long-haul 
fl ight, and to give up the opportunity to get a lot of work done, I had to admit that 
1,500 Euros for 12 hours works out to a decent hourly wage. 
 Something similar happened to me a few years earlier in Boston. The offer to 
switch from business class to economy was $1,000. 
 “For a six-and-a-half hour fl ight, that isn’t bad,” I remarked to my wife, who 
accompanied me on that trip. But she had a more rational view of the situation, and 
also the appropriate response. 
 “That is the exact same amount that you were willing to pay extra to fl y business 
class when you bought the tickets,” she said. “So why didn’t you just book economy 
to begin with and save the $1,000 then?” Of course, she was right. When I originally 
booked our fl ights, I never imagined making this red-eye fl ight in economy class. 
Why was I suddenly willing to accept the offer and the downgrade to economy? 
Prospect theory offers a plausible explanation. The negative utility from the original 
booking—which I paid for via credit card—was less than the positive utility from 
the cash amount that the Lufthansa agent offered. 
 Free or Paid: A Big Difference 
 Prospect theory also explains another phenomenon. Let’s assume you have received 
a ticket for an open-air concert. On the day of the show, it rains. The odds that you 
go to the concert despite the weather are much greater if you paid for the ticket with 
your own money than if you had received the ticket as a gift. Both situations have 
to do with “ sunk costs .” The money is gone, regardless of whether you attend the 
concert. But the urge to “earn back” the price of the ticket is much higher if you paid 
with your own money. In the spirit of prospect theory , the negative utility is greater 
when the ticket cost you something. 
 Better to Pay in Cash 
 Nowadays you can pay with credit cards almost anywhere. It is convenient and fast 
and you also don’t need to carry cash around with you. Nonetheless, some people 
still prefer to pay with cash. Why do people do that? Economists previously thought 
that differences in transaction cost s determined which form of payment someone 
would use. But paying in cash has other characteristics which can prove advantageous to consumers. Prospect theory tells us that it is harder for us to part with cash 
than to pay via credit card, because the negative utility from a cash payment is 
greater. If you want to rein in your spending and resist the temptation to buy things, 
trying to pay in cash as much as possible will better help you achieve that goal. 
 Two economists discovered another effect. In their analysis of 25,500 individual 
transactions, they found that consumers who want to have an overview of their expenditures tend to avoid paying with credit cards. They described this as the “ reminder 
3 The Strange Psychology of Pricing
43
effect ” of cash. 29 When you look into your purse or wallet, you immediately see how 
much you have spent and how much money is left. It is particularly advisable for 
people with limited fi nancial means to use cash payments as a control mechanism. 
According to the researchers, people actually do this; they make two- thirds of their 
purchases in cash. The clear advice of the researchers for anyone who is deep in debt 
or who wants to live within a tight budget: always pay in cash! 
 The Temptation of Credit Cards 
 There are many reasons why paying by credit card is so tempting. Doing so lets us 
consume something several weeks before the bill comes due. In other words, credit 
card payments are a way of postponing the actual separation from our money. We 
also don’t “feel” the payment as much, because we don’t have to reach into our 
pockets, give physical money to a cashier, and watch them put it away. We simply 
sign our names or type in our PIN codes. As a result the negative utility is smaller 
when we pay with plastic. 
 When we receive our monthly statement and see that long list of transactions, the 
effect of any individual transaction gets watered down. This also hurts less. Some 
cards offset the negative utility even more by conferring positive utility , such as 
prestige. This matters, for example, when someone checks into a hotel or pays in a 
place where the type of card is visible to other people. American Express has its 
Centurion Card—informally known as the “black card”—which is accessible only 
to select wealthy individuals for a substantial annual fee . To serve these cardholders 
even better, American Express opened its own exclusive “Centurion” airport 
lounges whose “free amenities set them apart.” The lounge at the Dallas-Fort-Worth 
airport includes a spa, a complimentary buffet featuring food from the chef at 
Dallas’s Ritz- Carlton Hotel, and full-size, fi rst-class showers. 30
 Consumers can also use the credit card as a weapon to achieve slight discounts. 
At some retailers, you can get some fl exibility when you “threaten” to pay with 
credit card, and then offer to pay cash if you can get a discount . Retailers often prefer cash payments, because they receive their money right away and also avoid 
having to pay a transaction fee. 
 “Cash Back” and Other Absurdities 
 Prospect theory also helps to explain some price structure s that would seem absurd if 
you only took the perspective of classical economics. “Cash back” is a common sales 
tactic at car dealerships. You purchase a car for $30,000 and receive $2,000 in cash 
29 von Kalckreuth U, Schmidt T, Stix H (2011) Using cash to monitor liquidity-implications for 
payments, currency demand and withdrawal behavior. Discussion Paper Nr. 22/2011. Deutsche 
Bundesbank, October 2011. 
30 McCartney S (2014) The airport lounge arms race. The Wall Street Journal, March 5, 2014. 
“Cash Back” and Other Absurdities
44
back. How does that make any sense? Prospect theory provides the answer. The payment of $30,000 generates a signifi cant negative utility , balanced out by the positive 
utility of acquiring the new car. Then on top of that comes an additional positive utility 
in the form of $2,000 in cash. This constellation apparently leaves many car buyers 
with a perceived net utility that is higher than if they had just paid $28,000 for the car 
straight up. If the dealership accepts payment via check, transfer, or credit card, the 
positive utility may even be greater. The payment is made in an intangible form. The 
“cash back,” in contrast, comes in the form of physical money. In addition, this cash 
may represent a rare opportunity for heavily indebted consumers to get their hands on 
real money once in a while. Within the context of prospect theory , this access can add 
to make “cash back” an effective tactic. 
 Many discount tactics work along similar lines. Older readers may remember 
collecting S&H Green Stamps. The concept was popular in many countries; I experienced something similar in my childhood. We collected stamps and pasted them 
into an album. For every dollar, we received three stamps, each with a value of one 
penny. This is a discount of 3 %. When we fi lled the album with 150 stamps, we 
could redeem it for $1.50. Why would a retailer or a store owner go through the 
hassle of handing out and redeeming stamps, when they could simply offer the 
direct discount of 3 %? Redeeming the stamp album created a high positive utility , 
especially for children. We perceived it as a much bigger gain than if the store 
owner had offered a 3 % discount, which would have generated only a tiny positive 
utility to offset the negative utility of parting with cash at checkout. The joy of collecting also provided a positive reward, especially for us children, while the store 
owner profi ted from the loyalty effect as we and our parents bought more in an 
effort to get more stamps. 
 Moon Prices 
 In our daily lives we constantly encounter list price s which no one ever pays, socalled moon price s. Is it better for a seller to offer a product at $100 with a discount 
of 25 %, or simply ask for $75? Classical economics cannot answer the question 
because it only looks at the end result: the customer ends up paying $75. 
 Prospect theory has an answer, however. The rebate provides the customer with 
additional positive utility . This means that the net utility is greater when one sees a 
price of $100 and receives a 25 % discount than when one pays $75. This trick is 
typical for car dealers. They have list price s, but they hardly ever sell cars at those 
prices. So why do such moon price s make sense? There are two answers. First, the 
high prices create an opportunity for price differentiation . Not all buyers receive the 
same discount. One role of the seller is to offer the smallest possible discount without losing the customer. The second answer stems from prospect theory . I experienced it myself the last time I bought a car. At fi rst I was pleased with the new car 
(positive utility). But I had also negotiated a large discount, which contributed in no 
small way to my net utility from the transaction. Hardly anyone can deny that a successful price negotiation which results in a discount—even a slight one in absolute 
3 The Strange Psychology of Pricing
45
terms—will trigger such positive feelings. Most of us have experienced that at one 
time or another. 
 The situation with magazine subscriptions is similar. Subscriptions will continue 
only if we renew them, and as the expiration date approaches, the hard sell begins. 
One opens the mailbox or clicks on an e-mail and gets a message similar to this one, 
which I have personally received: “I have authorized our business offi ce to extend 
your subscription for as little as $0.81 per issue. That’s a savings of up to 82 % off 
our cover price.” Who can resist a discount of 82 % off the cover price? And in addition to the extremely large discount, many publishers also throw in a “mystery gift” 
or “an invaluable business tool” or “full unrestricted access” to the magazine’s 
online version. The problem with such offers is that over time, the exaggerated list 
price s lose their credibility. When that happens, they cease to function as proper 
 price anchor s. 
 Price Structures 
 Prospect theory provides concrete guidance on how to set up price structure s. One 
question is the price metric , which is the unit a seller will use to express the price. 
Let’s look at car insurance. The standard way to express the price is an annual premium. So let’s use $600 in this example. Wouldn’t it be wiser to express the price 
on a quarterly or even a monthly basis? The numbers a customer sees would then be 
much smaller—$150 for the quarter or $50 for the month—and may therefore create a more favorable price perception . 31
 When a customer actually pays the premium, however, it can make sense to have 
him or her pay in one lump sum of $600 rather than pay $50 in 12 monthly installments. When you pay monthly, you “hurt yourself” 12 times in a year, and the sum 
of this negative utility is greater than what you experience with the one-off payment . On the fl ipside, incentives or reimbursements may work much better when 
paid out in installments, because they trigger positive feelings in the recipient each 
time. Prospect theory would imply that paying someone a bonus of $100 per month 
for a year would enhance the positive utility of payment versus making a one-off 
payment of $1,200. I suspect, however, that we should be wary of small amounts in 
such situations, because the effects indicated by prospect theory diminish. It’s probably better to pay someone back $10 at once rather than pay them $1 over 10 periods. It can also make more sense for a newspaper to receive a subscription payment 
as a lump sum (say $360) than receive its money in 12 equal payments of $30, each 
of which it needs to process. 
 Likewise, one should avoid making generalizations here. Nor should we rush to 
judgment on whether an approach that works in one context can be transferred to 
another. One study looked at the question of whether a fi tness studio is better off 
31 Schmidt-Gallas D, Orlovska L (2012) Pricing psychology: fi ndings from the insurance industry. 
Journal of Professional Pricing (4): pp. 10–14. 
Price Structures
46
charging an annual fee or 12 monthly installments. 32 Prospect theory would 
presuppose that the one-time payment is better because the customer “feels the 
pain” only once. The fi tness studio also has two advantages from the one-off payment : immediate access to the money, and lower transaction cost s. But fi tness studios are a special case, and the study found another effect. After making a payment, 
the customers want to “earn it back” and visit the studio on a regular basis. The 
frequency of visits starts to decline, though, the further the most recent payment 
recedes into the past. By encouraging monthly payment s, the studio restores the 
customers’ incentive to get their money’s worth back. With monthly payments, 
the usage intensity remains strong over time and—most importantly for the studio—
the renewal rates are signifi cantly higher. The clear recommendation is to ask for 
monthly payments, a contradiction to prospect theory . 
 Mental Accounting 
 University of Chicago professor Richard Thaler developed the theory of mental 
accounting, which claims that consumers allocate their transactions into different 
mental accounts. How easily or carefully they spend their money depends on which 
account the money is in. 33 These accounts may be based on different criteria or needs 
such as food, vacation, hobby, car, or gift-giving. This kind of categorization helps 
consumers to budget their money, plan expenditures, and monitor their spending. 
Each account is subject to different spending behaviors and price sensitivities. Each 
account will have its own negative utility curve, according to prospect theory . 
 I also apparently have my spending for cars and other products in separate 
accounts, each with its own price sensitivities and limits. When I was looking for a 
new offi ce chair, I shopped around and compared prices before settling on a model 
I liked. Around the same time, as I was buying a new car, I invested almost three 
times as much on a special comfort seat without batting an eye. With the possible 
exception of an airline seat, I probably spend more time sitting in my offi ce chair 
and car seat than any others. Yet my behavior in purchasing them, my mental 
accounting, was much different. 
 One famous experiment by Kahneman and Tversky showed the absurd effects of 
false mental accounting. The participants did not distinguish between costs which 
are relevant for their decision making and those which aren’t (such as sunk costs ). 
Assume that a ticket to a play costs $10. Participants were divided into two groups. 
The participants in the fi rst group were informed that they were standing in front of 
32 Gourville JT, Soman D (1998) Payment depreciation: the behavioral effects of temporally separating payments from consumption. Journal of Consumer Research (2): pp. 160-174. 
33 Thaler RH (1999) Mental accounting matters. Journal of Behavioral Decision Making (3): 
p. 119, and Thaler RH (1994) Quasi-rational economics. Russell Sage, New York; see also Thaler 
RH, Sunstein CR (2009) Nudge: improving decisions about health, wealth and happiness. Penguin, 
London. 
3 The Strange Psychology of Pricing
47
the theater and had lost their ticket. The participants in the second group were told 
that they would need to buy a ticket at the window, and that they had just lost $10 
moments earlier. 
 Among those in the group who lost their ticket, 54 % decided to buy a new one. 
Among those in the group who had lost the $10 bill, some 88 % decided to buy a 
ticket. Mental accounting helps explain this discrepancy. The ones who lost the 
ticket booked both the price for their lost one and their new one to the “going to a 
play” account, whose mental price now rose to $20. That price was too expensive 
for 46 % of the participants. The ones who lost the $10 bill, however, booked that 
loss to their “cash” account. Since their mental price for the theater ticket remained 
unaffected at $10, the vast majority of them decided to buy the ticket for $10. In 
other words, the participants allocated their gains and losses to different mental 
accounts. Loss aversion, the desire to avoid or postpone losses, is a strong human 
trait. It helps explain why many people wait too long before getting out of stocks 
when their prices have gone down. 34
 Neuro-Pricing 
 New research into the fi eld of neuro-pricing builds on behavioral pricing and broadens it by measuring physical responses to price stimuli , using modern technologies 
such as magnetic resonance imaging (MRI). 
 “The perception of prices is no different than the perception of other stimuli,” 
says one researcher. 35 This simple revelation means that price perception triggers 
responses in the brain which scientists can now measure with ever-increasing precision. Important emotions in the context of pricing are trust, value, and longing. 
Researchers track these emotions in order to assess the success of a marketing campaign. The most interesting fi nding thus far in neuro-pricing research is that price 
information activates the brain’s pain center . That is not surprising. Associating 
prices with pleasure is probably the rare exception rather than the rule. 
 Neuro-pricing is a form of behavioral research which can yield useful information 
to supplement the existing knowledge. MRIs and other scans allow researchers to 
objectively measure processes that subconsciously infl uence consumers’ decisions, 
without needing to coax a verbal or written answer from their study participants. The 
goal is to understand these subconscious processes better and offer sellers new ways 
to infl uence them. I know what you are now thinking, and you are correct: this kind of 
research gets into ethically sensitive territory. But that is just one problem with neuropricing . The validity of the results is also an issue, and that starts with the sampling 
process. Selecting a sample for this kind of research follows the same principles as 
classical market research. Many potential participants, however, are unwilling to 
34 Tversky A, Kahneman D. The framing of decisions and the psychology of choice. Science 
211(4481): pp. 453–458. 
35 Müller K-M (2012) NeuroPricing. Haufe-Lexware, Freiburg. 
Neuro-Pricing
48
subject their brains to physiological research for marketing purposes. Personally, I 
would also refuse. Neuro-marketing studies require participants to go to special labs, 
which puts even more limitations on how representative the results are. In light of all 
these factors, how well do the study results project to real-life situations? How well 
can they be extrapolated to larger populations? Those questions remain open. 
 Thus far, the research has yielded relatively few fi ndings and insights from which 
someone could derive practical price recommendations. Kai-Markus Müller, a 
 neuro-pricing researcher, reported on a brain study he conducted on Starbucks coffee. His conclusion: “… the willingness to pay for a cup of coffee at Starbucks is 
signifi cantly higher than the company assumes … Starbucks is letting millions of 
dollars in profi ts slip through its fi ngers, because it is not taking its customers’ willingness to pay into account.” 36 Even people with only a passing familiarity with 
Starbucks knows that its prices are already very high. With all due respect to Dr. 
Müller, I must admit I do not think that this fi nding is valid. 
 Brain research has, however, provided some useful insights into how prices are 
displayed and communicated. The standard way of expressing a price—for example 
$16.70—causes a pronounced response in the brain’s pain center . The response is 
weaker, however, when the respondent only sees 16.70 and the dollar sign is omitted. Apparently the brain does not immediately perceive that number to be a price. 
The activation of the pain center is even weaker for a round number, such as 17. 
 This form of price communication has become more common recently in restaurants. The form which results in the least pain, and therefore the least amount of negative utility , is actually the word itself, in this case “seventeen.” It remains to be seen 
whether menus and price list s start to appear with prices displayed in that manner. 
 The research has also yielded insights into the infl uence of colors; for example 
red price tags indicate special offers. Paying by cash, as I implied earlier, activates 
the brain’s pain center to a higher degree than paying by credit card. Marketers 
should also avoid using currency symbols in advertisements, unless the product in 
question can boost the self-image or prestige of the customer. 
 Using brain research for marketing and pricing is still in its infancy. Many of the 
claims from this fi eld should be challenged. But the researchers are learning, and we 
can expect progress and new discoveries in due time. Right now, though, I feel that 
it is premature to speculate on how the fi ndings from brain research will have a 
practical and lasting impact on pricing. 
 In Conclusion: Be Cautious! 
 Behavioral and neural economics are exciting new areas which have yielded surprising and fascinating results. The research in these areas has already changed our 
understanding of economics and will continue to do so. These new approaches can 
explain many phenomena which classical economics cannot. 
36 Ibidem. 
3 The Strange Psychology of Pricing
49
 Having said that, I would still warn you to be cautious with how freely you interpret and try to apply the fi ndings and insights I’ve highlighted in this chapter. I am 
convinced that most transactions still follow the fundamental laws of economics. 
Yes, a higher price may lead to higher unit sales under certain circumstances. But 
that remains an exception, not the rule. It applies in perhaps 5 % of cases. A bigger 
concern, however, is the attempt to generalize these fi ndings. When is it better to 
pay once a year, and when is it better to pay in 4 or 12 installments? There is neither 
a general answer to those questions, nor a set of unequivocal guidance on how to 
answer them. Philip Mirowski, an economic historian and philosopher at the 
 University of Notre Dame , is correct when he says that behavioral economics may 
be “undermining the foundation of rational activity, but it’s putting nothing up in its 
place.” 37 Behavioral economics does not yet offer a complete, unifi ed theory. 
 The test results which support behavioral economics have begun to face increasingly critical challenges. Most of the fi ndings come from laboratory settings, which 
casts doubt on how well the fi ndings transfer to real life. Some of the stimuli were 
presented in a way that could lead participants toward a particular answer. A business writer drew this conclusion: “the theoretical and empirical body of evidence 
against behavioral economics should serve as a warning against throwing the idea 
of the ‘rational human’ completely overboard.” 38 Human beings are not as rational 
as classical economics claims, nor are they as irrational as some behavioral economists claim. What does this mean for pricing? It means that you should take both of 
these research traditions into account, but proceed with caution. 
37 Die Ökonomen haben ihre Erzählung widerrufen. Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung. February 16, 
2013, p 40. 
38 Beck H (2013) Der Mensch ist kein kognitiver Versager. Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung. 
February 11, 2013, p. 18. 
In Conclusion: Be Cautious!
© Springer International Publishing Switzerland 2015 51
H. Simon, Confessions of the Pricing Man, DOI 10.1007/978-3-319-20400-0_4
 4 Price Positioning: High or Low 
 Are high prices or low prices better for the profi t and the survival of a company? 
You should avoid becoming one of the fools in the Russian proverb: neither the one 
whose prices are too high nor the one whose prices are too low. Both fools sacrifi ce 
profi t unnecessarily. The question remains, though: Where is a company’s optimal 
price position? A company must make a conscious decision about price positioning . 
In fact, whether a company selects a high-price or low-price positioning is one of its 
most fundamental strategic decisions. Often the founders of the company make that 
call. For many reasons—as we will see throughout this chapter—a company’s 
chances of changing course later on are limited. 
 The choice of the price position affects the overall business model , the product 
quality , branding , and the company’s innovation activities. It also determines which 
market segments the company will serve and what channels it will use to reach 
them. 
 Success Strategies with Low Prices 
 One can run a successful business with either low prices or high prices; the success 
factors in each case, however, are very different. Let’s begin with the more surprising of the two options: spectacular success stories with low prices. 
 Aldi 
 This deep discounter, which also owns Trader Joe’s , is one of the world’s most successful retailers and has expanded internationally for years. At the end of 2014, Aldi 
operated more than 10,500 stores worldwide, including 1,300 in 32 US states, and 
planned to increase that US footprint by 50 % by 2018. 1
1
 ALDI press release, December 20, 2013. 
52
 While Trader Joe’s competes against higher end food and grocery retailers such 
as Whole Foods , and enjoys a cult following, Aldi ’s core strategy is simple: offer an 
acceptable level of quality at very competitive prices. Its assortment consists almost 
entirely of private-label products whose prices undercut popular brand -name products by 20–40 %. Nonetheless, Aldi achieves signifi cantly higher returns than food 
and grocery chains who command higher price positions. How can that be? Three 
reasons explain why Aldi’s return on sales is more than double the returns of a traditional supermarket: higher effi ciency , lower costs, and capital management . 2
 The 
gross return per square meter of fl oor space is 30.3 % higher in Aldi than in a supermarket. Personnel costs alone save Aldi the equivalent of 8.2 % of sales . Aldi puts 
bar codes on all sides of its packages, so that the cashiers do not need to search for 
the code to scan. Aldi also saves costs in procurement , where its enormous 
 volume —combined with its negotiation skills—enables it to win favorable prices 
from its suppliers . 
 Aldi turns its inventory over almost three times as fast as a traditional supermarket. In other words, goods in their system spend far less time at a warehouse or on 
a store shelf. Aldi gets its money quickly, but pays its suppliers much later, and 
invests this so-called fl oat to earn short-term interest. 
 Taking all these factors into account, Aldi uses a very aggressive low-price strategy to earn consistently higher returns than the rest of the sector. Recent data show 
that Aldi Süd (one of the two Aldi operating units) had a pretax return on sales of 
5.0 % and an after-tax return of 3.7 %. The comparable numbers for its counterpart 
Aldi Nord were 3.5 and 3.0 %. 3
 The profi ts from Aldi have made its founders 
extremely wealthy. For years, Karl Albrecht and his late brother Theo ranked among 
the world’s wealthiest people. They and their descendants had a combined fortune 
estimated at over $44 billion. 
 IKEA 
 This Swedish company is one of the world’s most successful retailers. In 2011 
 IKEA cut its already low prices by another 2.6 %. In 2013 it “continued to lower 
prices on some of its best-selling items” 4
 and it cut prices overall by 0.2 %. 5
 Despite 
this ongoing price-cut strategy, IKEA’s revenue grew by 3.1 % to $36.2 billion in 
2013 and its net profi t likewise by 3.1 % to $4.2 billion. This corresponds to a return 
on sales of 11.6 %, a very high number for a retailer . One analyst commented: 
“A key contributor were aggressive price investments (new lower pricing strategy) 
on top selling products.” IKEA focuses all of its activities on achieving the 
 maximum cost effi ciencies. The company can offer such low prices because of its 
2
 The profi t metric here is Earnings before Interest and Taxes (EBIT); one also uses operating 
profi t. Because Aldi Nord has no debt, the after-tax yield may be even higher. 
3
 Manager-Magazin. April 16, 2012. 
4
 IKEA annual fi nancial report. January 28, 2014. 
5
 IKEA ’s Focus Remains on Its Superstores. The Wall Street Journal, January 28, 2014. 
4 Price Positioning: High or Low
53
extremely high procurement volumes, its use of lower cost materials, and its “do-ityourself” model under which customers pick up and assemble the furniture 
themselves. 
 H&M and Zara 
 The fashion retailers H&M and Zara have a similar cost strategy to IKEA ’s. H&M 
has around 3,000 stores and Zara has 5,500. H&M has revenues of roughly $19.3 
billion and an after-tax profi t of $3.6 billion, which works out to a return on sales of 
about 13.3 %. 6
 Zara’s profi t margin is practically the same. Like IKEA, Aldi , and 
 Walmart , the name of the game at H&M and Zara is “ effi ciency .” These companies 
do nothing unless it is absolutely required by the consumer. All of their activities are 
trimmed and slimmed to achieve the highest effi ciency. This is particularly true for 
their logistics processes, which ensure that the companies can time their new product line s to refl ect prevailing customer tastes, and can order the right amount of 
goods to avoid unsold inventory when tastes shift again. This extreme precision, 
speed, and effi ciency make them very profi table despite low prices. 
 Ryanair 
 The revenue of the Irish no-frills airline Ryanair rose by 21 % to $5.85 billion in its 
fi scal year 2011/2012, but profi t jumped by 50 % to $750 million. That represents a 
 return on sales of 12.8 %, an unusually high number for an airline. In contrast, 
 Lufthansa , Europe’s biggest airline, earned just under $600 million in profi ts in 
2011 on revenue of $38.3 billion, for a return of sales of 1.6 %. Ryanair is much 
more profi table than the American icon of low-cost airlines , Southwest Airlines , 
which generated $17.1 billion in revenue in 2012 and earned a pretax profi t of $685 
million. That is a return on sales of 4.0 %, far below Ryanair’s. 
 How can Ryanair be so profi table despite its famously low prices? The story 
begins with its capacity utilization . Ryanair boasts a load factor of around 80 %. The 
story continues with Ryanair’s passion for focusing on costs in minute detail. Ryanair 
is the epitome of the “no-frills” airline business model . The fl ight attendants go to 
great lengths to make sure that passengers leave nothing behind, not even a newspaper or magazine. This frees up time once the plane arrives at the gate. While a conventional airline would need 15–20 minutes after a fl ight to clean the cabin, Ryanair 
uses that time to board passengers for the next fl ight. Southwest, in service since 
1973 and one of the role models for airlines like Ryanair, takes a similar approach 
and is the record-holder in minimizing an aircraft’s time on the ground. It can turn a 
plane around completely—deplaning and then boarding new passengers—in as little 
as 22 minutes. That gets the plane back in the air faster, and planes generate revenue 
only when they are fl ying. The difference is substantial: a conventional airline might 
6
 H&M Full-Year Report, 2013. 
 Ryanair 
54
have a plane in the air for eight hours a day on average, while the no-frills carriers 
average 11–12 hours per day in fl ight. Their capital productivity is almost 50 % 
higher. Another way in which Ryanair focuses on costs is to serve airports which 
usually lie outside of major city centers and thus have lower landing fees. 
 Ryanair is also a master at inventing and implementing surcharges, a topic we 
will explore in more detail in Chap. 8. The price that Ryanair communicates is often 
extremely low, with a basic ticket sometimes free of charge or for as low as 99 Euro 
cents (roughly $1.30). This kind of price communication plays a major role in the 
airline’s ability to attract passengers, who often end up paying much more than the 
advertised price of the base ticket, because their total fare usually includes a number 
of surcharges. 
 Ryanair apparently achieves very low prices on the procurement side, too. The 
airline supposedly received a discount of 50 % off the list price when it placed a 
major order with Boeing some years ago. According to market rumors, it received a 
similar discount in March 2013 when it ordered another 175 Boeing 737 aircraft. 7
 Dell 
 In November 1988 I heard a 23-year-old entrepreneur named Michael Dell give a 
speech at Harvard Business School . Just four years earlier, he had founded his eponymous computer company in his dorm room at the University of Texas at Austin. 
 “As a student, I worked at a computer store,” Dell said, describing how he came 
up with the idea for his company. 
 “We sold computers, but we ourselves didn’t deliver much value to the customers,” he said. “Yet we still kept 30 % of the purchase price. I thought to myself: I 
could save this margin through a direct- sales model and pass on those savings to 
customers in the form of lower prices. So I started my own fi rm.” 
 From this idea grew what would become the world’s largest seller of personal 
computers. Dell now employs over 100,000 people. In 2012 the company had $57 
billion in revenue and posted an after-tax profi t of $2.37 billion. That is a return on 
sales of just over 4.2 %, an exemplary return in such an intensely competitive sector. 
The margins of Dell’s three biggest competitors were much lower. Hewlett Packard 
has a margin of −10.5 %, Lenovo ’s profi t margin is 1.8 %, and Acer ’s −0.7 %. 
 The entire Dell system is centered on the highest cost effi ciency . Dell became 
famous for its “ confi gure to order ” concept, which meant it built nothing in advance 
to store in a warehouse. It would build a computer only after a customer ordered it. 
That doesn’t just save on warehouse costs; it also reduces the cost of returns and 
increases customer satisfaction . Each customer receives exactly the confi guration 
he or she wants. Eliminating the retailer margin enabled Dell to offer lower prices 
and still make a good profi t. 
7
 Ryanair Orders 175 Jets from Boeing . Financial Times. March 20, 2013, p. 15 and “Ryanair will 
von Boeing 175 Flugzeuge,” Handelsblatt, March 22, 2013, p.17. 
4 Price Positioning: High or Low
55
 Less Expensive Alternatives 
 Many fi rms face the question of whether to respond to competitors by offering a 
cheaper alternative, a so-called less expensive alternative (LEA). Such a low-price 
product is often marketed under a second brand , in order to differentiate it clearly 
from the primary brand and reduce the risk of cannibalization . A world market leader 
in specialty chemicals observed that its unique silicon-based products were losing 
their competitive edge. Low-price imitators had entered the market, posing a major 
threat to the 7,000 products in the market leader’s portfolio. Instead of meeting these 
threats head on by cutting the prices for its primary brand, the market leader introduced an LEA, with a price position around 20 % below the lead brand. The LEA 
offered only minimal service and no customization , and was shipped only by the full 
tank carload. Customers would need to wait between seven and 20 days for delivery. 
 After introducing the LEA, the company started to achieve strong double-digit 
growth. Its revenue rose to $6.4 billion from $2.3 billion within four years, and the 
company swung from an annual loss of $27 million to a profi t of $475 million. The 
LEA became a new growth engine for the company, in part because it complemented rather than cannibalized the primary brand . 
 Amazon and Zalando : Revenue vs. Profit 
 The previous cases prove that one can achieve high profi ts with low prices. I could 
continue with more cases, but not forever. The list of companies who have experienced enduring success with the “low price–high profi t” combination is not very 
long. Far more low-price companies have failed with that strategy than have 
achieved consistently high profi ts. That list includes retailers such as Woolworth ’s, 
the home improvement chain Praktiker (famous for its “20 % off everything!” 
 sales ), and many no-frills airlines . 
 The widely praised online retailer Amazon has still not joined the “low price–
high profi t” club, at least not yet. Amazon reported revenue of $61.1 billion in 2012 
and a net loss of $39 million. In 2013 revenue grew by 22 % to $74 billion and net 
income improved to $274 million. This is much better than the loss in 2012 but still 
only a profi t margin of 0.4 %. The German online retailer Zalando , founded in 2008 
with the same business model as Amazon, also seems stuck consistently in the red 
despite its growth. The company grew by 50 % and topped $2.4 billion in sales in 
2013, but had a negative profi t margin of −6.7 %. 8
 Zalando’s management say that 
they are in no hurry to become profi table. Are Amazon and Zalando betting on lowmargin sales, in order to earn high profi ts later? Or are these fi rms forced to offer 
low prices in order to remain competitive and grow, without any prospects for 
attractive margins down the road? In Amazon’s case, equity markets seem to believe 
the former scenario. Its share price has climbed more or less steadily from $55 in 
8
 Der milliardenchwere Online-Händler. Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, February 16, 2013, 
p. 17. 
 Amazon and Zalando : Revenue vs. Profi t
56
early 2009 to around $400 by the end of 2013. The view is not unanimous. Said one 
critical analyst : “Investors could get tired of this and it could end up imploding 
Amazon’s market capitalization .” 9
 In the course of 2015 Amazon’s share price 
climbed further up to over $500. 
 One obstacle to profi tability for Amazon and Zalando is the massive investments 
in infrastructure and logistics required by their business model s. Other popular 
 e-commerce destinations for consumers—such as eBay or China’s Alibaba —don’t 
have that problem, and it helps explain their profi tability. In 2013, eBay earned 
$2.86 billion on revenues of $16.05 billion, for a return on sales of 17.8 %. Alibaba, 
which executed its initial public offering in 2014, earned $3.52 billion on just $7.95 
billion in revenue, for return on sales of 44.2 %. 10
 Success Factors for a Low-Price Strategy 
 The list of companies who have succeeded with a low-price strategy tends to be 
short, but their strategies share a set of factors which help create and sustain that 
success.
 1. They began with that strategy from day one: All successful low-price companies focused on low prices and high volumes from the very beginning. In many 
cases, they created radically new business model s. I am not aware of any company having made a successful transformation from a high-price or mid-price 
position to a low-price one. 
 2. They are extremely effi cient: All successful low-price companies operate with 
extreme cost and process effi ciency , which enables them to enjoy good margins 
and profi ts even while charging low prices. 
 3. They guarantee adequate and consistent quality: With poor and inconsistent 
quality, success is unlikely, even if you offer low prices. Sustainable success 
requires adequate and consistent quality. 
 4. They have a strong focus on their core products: The term no-frills is often 
applied to airlines , but it could apply to companies such as Aldi or Dell as well. 
They do nothing that isn’t absolutely required by the customer. That saves 
costs, without putting the essential value to customer in jeopardy. 
 5. They have a high-growth, high-revenue focus: This creates economies of scale 
which they exploit to the greatest extent possible. 
 6. They are procurement champions: That means they are tough and forceful in 
their purchasing, but not unfair. 
 7. They have little debt: Only very rarely do they turn to banks or debt markets for 
fi nancing. Instead they rely on self-fi nancing or supplier credit. 
9
 Woo S (2012) Amazon Increases bet on its loyalty program. The Wall Street Journal Europe, 
November 15, 2012, p. 25. 
10 Alibaba fl exes its muscles ahead of U.S. Stock Filing. The Wall Street Journal Europe, April 17, 
2014, pp. 10–11. 
4 Price Positioning: High or Low
57
 8. They control as much as they possibly can: This means they carry only their 
own brands ( Dell , Ryanair , IKEA ); even Aldi ’s assortment is over 90 % private 
label. They also exercise strong control over the entire value chain . 
 9. Their ads focus on price: To the extent they even advertise at all, they focus 
almost exclusively on price ( Aldi , Lidl, Ryanair ). 
 10. They never mix their messages: Almost all of the successful “low price–high 
profi t” companies stick to an “everyday low price” strategy rather than a “hi-lo” 
which relies on frequent temporary promotions. 
 11. They understand their role: Most markets have room for only a small number 
of “low price–high profi t” competitors, often just one or two. 
 Yes, it is absolutely possible for a company to achieve consistently high profi ts 
with low prices. But only a few who try are ever blessed with that kind of success. 
It only happens when a company has a clear, signifi cant, and sustainable cost advantage over its competitors. The skills to pull that off must be anchored in the company and its culture from its very beginning. I doubt that a company with another 
operating style and tradition could make the switch and meet the “low price–high 
profi t” requirements. The key challenge is to establish an acceptable (not a minimal) 
level of value to customer, delivered with the highest cost effi ciency . This category 
of companies also places special demands on executives, entrepreneurs, and managers. Only those with the will and the nerves to be Spartan, thrifty, and stingy day in 
and day out should venture into the realm of low- price positioning . 
 Ultra-low Prices: Can You Go Lower than Low? 
 So far this chapter has focused on prices at the low end of ranges in highly developed, industrialized countries. In recent years, an entirely new “ ultra-low price ” 
segment has coalesced in emerging markets , where prices are as much as 50–70 % 
lower. Two Indian-American professors have anticipated the evolution of this segment for many years. Vijay Mahajan of the University of Texas in Austin referred to 
this segment as the “biggest market opportunity of the 21st century” in his book The 
86 % Solution . 
11 The 86 % in the book’s title refers to the fact that the annual family 
income of 86 % of mankind is below $10,000. People with this income level are 
unable to afford the typical products (everything from personal hygiene products to 
cars) which we take for granted in highly developed countries. 
 In his book The Fortune at the Bottom of the Pyramid , the late C. K. Prahalad, 
formerly a professor at the University of Michigan , took a deeper look at the opportunities in the ultra-low price segment. 12 The ongoing growth in China, India, and 
other emerging economies means that every year millions of consumers acquire 
enough purchasing power to afford mass-produced products for the fi rst time, albeit 
11 Mahajan V (2006) The 86 % Solution—how to succeed in the biggest market opportunity of the 
21st century. Wharton School Publishing, New Jersey. 
12 Prahalad CK (2010) The fortune at the bottom of the pyramid. Pearson, Upper Saddle River, NJ. 
 Ultra-low Prices: Can You Go Lower than Low?
58
at “ultra-low” prices. The ultra-low price position opens up a new, rapidly growing, 
and very large segment of the world’s population to a wide range of consumables 
and durables. Every company needs to decide whether and how it wants to serve 
this segment. However, this requires a radically different approach, if one wants to 
make money. 
 Dacia Logan and Tata Nano 
 The emergence of an “ ultra-low price segment” is not limited to Asia; one has 
already emerged in Eastern Europe. Nor is it limited to consumer categories such as 
personal hygiene, cleaning, or infant care. Taking all makes and models together, 
consumers around the world currently buy 10 million ultra-low price vehicles per 
year. That number is expected to increase to 27 million vehicles over the next 
decade, which means that it is growing more than twice as fast as the overall car 
market. 
 The French car company Renault has enjoyed success with its model Dacia 
Logan, which it assembles in Romania. The car costs around $9,600 and Renault 
has already sold over 1 million units. The price is less than half the price of a typical 
VW Golf. In France, people already speak of a “Loganization” process, similar to 
how the Germans occasionally talk of an “ Aldi zation.” These developments show 
that ultra-low-price products can enter the mainstream of Western markets, and are 
not doomed to be niche or fringe products. 
 Yet the price of cars in the ultra-lowprice segment in developing countries is far 
below the price of a Dacia Logan. The Nano, a car from the Indian manufacturer 
 Tata , garnered considerable attention worldwide. The car has a price of around 
$3,300, and yet it contains a surprising amount of technology from leading Western 
 suppliers . Some German suppliers saw the Nano not only as an opportunity but also 
as a necessity for them, and took on a key role in its launch in 2009. Bosch developed a radically simplifi ed and much less expensive fuel injection system for use in 
the Nano. Bosch components account for more than 10 % of the value of the car. 
But Bosch is not alone. Nine German automotive suppliers have their parts or their 
technologies in the Nano. This demonstrates that companies from a high-priced, 
highly developed country (such as Germany) can hold their own in the ultra-low 
 price segment. But the whole value chain , including R&D, procurement , and manufacturing, must reside in the emerging market. It remains to be seen whether this 
segment can also become a signifi cant source of profi t, not just revenue. 
 Honda Wave 
 Does a huge, global company such as Honda have the capability to outmaneuver 
ultra-low price competitors? Honda is the world market leader in motorcycles. It is 
also the number one global manufacturer of small gas-powered engines, producing 
over 20 million units per year. 
4 Price Positioning: High or Low
59
 Honda used to dominate the motorbike market in Vietnam, with a share of 90 %. 
Its best-selling model, the Honda Dream, sold for the equivalent of around $2,100. 
Chinese competitors then entered the market with ultra-low-price products. Their 
bikes sold for between $550 and $700 each, or between a quarter and a third of the 
price of the Honda Dream. These extremely aggressive prices turned market share s 
upside down. The Chinese manufacturers moved over one million bikes per year, 
while Honda’s volume dwindled from about one million to just 170,000. 
 Most companies would have thrown in the towel at this point, or withdrawn into 
the premium segment of the market. But not Honda . Its initial short-term response 
was to cut the price of the Dream to $1,300 from $2,100. But Honda knew that it 
could not sustain this low price over the long term. And this price was still roughly 
twice the price for a Chinese motorbike. Honda developed a much simpler and 
extremely inexpensive new model which it called the Honda Wave. The new bike 
combined acceptable quality with the lowest possible manufacturing costs. 
 “The Honda Wave has achieved low price, yet high quality and dependability, 
through using cost-reduced locally made parts as well as parts obtained through 
Honda’s global purchasing network,” the company said. The new product entered 
the market with an ultra-low price of $732, which is 65 % less than the former price 
of a Honda Dream. Honda reconquered the Vietnamese motorcycle market so successfully that most of the Chinese manufacturers eventually withdrew. 
 This case proves that premium manufacturer s such as Honda can indeed compete 
against ultra-low price suppliers in emerging markets , but not by selling their existing 
products. Success in the ultra-low price position requires a radical reorientation and 
redesign, massive simplifi cation, local production, and extreme cost consciousness. 
 Ultra-low price Positioning in Other Consumer 
and Industrial Goods 
 Ultra-low price positioning s have begun to permeate many different markets. With 
his “One Laptop per Child” initiative, MIT Professor Nicholas Negroponte proposed a personal computer with a price of $100. Nowadays one can fi nd a laptop 
with acceptable performance for less than $200; slimmed-down devices cost even 
less. So Negroponte’s $100 price position is almost within reach. In 2013 one could 
purchase a very rudimentary PC for $35. 13 If you are wondering what kinds of volumes companies can achieve in markets with ultra-low price s, look no further than 
the market for smartphones. The total number of mobile handsets was expected to 
exceed the world’s population sometime in 2014, and an increasingly larger share of 
them are smartphones. 14 Right now there are more than two billion of them in circulation 15 and shipments of smartphones reached 1.2 billion in 2014. What we now 
13 The Future is Now: The $35 PC. Fortune , March 18, 2013, p. 15. 
14 Number of mobile phones to exceed world population by 2014. Digital Trends, February 28, 2013. 
15 One billion smartphones shipped worldwide in 2013. PCWorld, January 28, 2014. 
 Ultra-low Price Positioning in Other Consumer and Industrial Goods 
60
consider to be an ultra-low price position may become normal in a few years. “Dirtcheap smartphones,” rumored to be available for as low as $35, “will have astonishing implications for the global economy,” according to one report. 16
 More and more companies are trying to pursue an ultra- low price strategy . The 
manufacturers of athletic shoes are considering offering products in emerging markets for under $1.50 per shoe. Consumer product giants such as Nestlé or Procter & 
Gamble sell tiny package sizes for just pennies apiece, so that even consumers with 
the smallest incomes can occasionally afford to buy such a product, such as a singleuse pack of shampoo. Companies used that same approach successfully after World 
War II, as the rebuilding began in Europe. I remember single-use shampoo packets, 
as well as boxes of four cigarettes, sold for the equivalent of 20 cents. Gillette , 
which is part of Procter & Gamble, now sells a razor blade in India for the equivalent of 11 cents, or 75 % below the price for the Mach3, the razor with three blades. 
 Ultra-low prices are by no means limited to consumer products or even durable 
goods such as cars and motorbikes. This price positioning is becoming increasingly 
common for industrial products , too. In the Chinese market for injection molding 
machines, the premium segment comprises roughly 1,000 machines per year, supplied primarily by European manufacturers. The midrange price segment has an 
annual volume of around 5,000 units and is the domain of Japanese manufacturers. 
The Chinese fi rms do battle in the ultra-low price segment, which includes 20,000 
machines per year. In other words, that segment is 20 times larger than the premium 
segment and four times the size of the midrange segment. 
 With that kind of market structure, even a premium supplier cannot restrict itself 
to the premium segment and neglect the ultra-low price segment. This is not a viable, long-term alternative. The premium segment represents just 4 % of the market. 
Even in a market as vast as China’s, that is still too small to warrant a singular focus 
at the expense of other segments. Another risk of an exclusively premium strategy 
is that competitors with acceptable quality at signifi cantly lower prices will attack 
the premium segment from below. 
 “Machinery manufacturers need to radically simplify their product concepts if 
they want to take a large share of growth markets such as China and India,” said a 
study conducted by a European trade association. 17 The manufacturers of high-tech 
and industrial products need to give serious consideration to entering the low-price 
segment. This means building not only a manufacturing base in emerging markets , 
but a research and development department as well. It is an illusion that a company 
can develop ultra-low price products within an advanced economy such as Germany 
or the USA. 18 The only way is for companies to relocate their value chain to the 
emerging markets themselves. Many years ago, the late Nicolas Hayek, who 
invented the Swatch watch and served for many years as CEO of Swatch, warned 
16 Kessler A (2014) The cheap smartphone revolution. The Wall Street Journal Europe, May 14, 
2014, p. 18. 
17 VDI-Nachrichten March 30, 2007, p. 19. 
18 Ernst H (2009) Industrielle Forschung und Entwicklung in Emerging Markets – Motive, 
Erfolgsfaktoren, Best Practice-Beispiele. Gabler, Wiesbaden. 
4 Price Positioning: High or Low
61
against conceding the lower price segments to competitors from low-wage 
 countries. Personally, I would go one step further and raise a provocative 
 question—a serious challenge if you will—for companies in developed countries: 
Why don’t you try to beat the Chinese on costs? 19 The Honda story with the Dream 
and the Wave shows that the question is worth considering. In India, Bangladesh, 
or Vietnam, hundreds of millions of people work for wages which lie well under 
Chinese levels. 
 Vijay Govindarajan and Chris Trimble, both on the faculty of Dartmouth’s Tuck 
School of Business , analyzed this process in their book Reverse Innovation: Create 
Far From Home, Win Everywhere . 
20 An effective defense strategy for the premium 
and midrange segments is to become competitive in the price segments further 
downmarket. The Swiss company Bühler , the world market leader in milling technology, acquired a Chinese company in order to compete in the lower price range in 
China, with an eye toward simplifi cation. Bühler CEO Calvin Grieder said that this 
move enabled the company to achieve a better match between its products and customer expectations, something it could never have done successfully with the highpriced, complex products produced in Switzerland. The company Karl Mayer , the 
world market leader for warp knitting machines with a global market share of 75 %, 
pursues an interesting dual strategy. Its goal is to secure a solid, sustainable market 
position in both the high and the low ends of the market. From a base level of performance and cost, it challenged its developers to create products for the lower 
priced segments which offer constant performance at 25 % lower costs, and at the 
same time create products for the top segment which offers 25 % better performance 
without cost increases. The company met both of these extremely ambitious goals, 
according to CEO Fritz Mayer. By extending its price and performance range both 
upward and downward, Karl Mayer won back the market share it had previously 
lost in China. 
 Ultra-low Price Products Also for Sale in Highly 
Developed Countries? 
 Can the ultra-low price products from emerging markets can penetrate high-income 
countries? That has already started to happen. Renault ’s Dacia Logan, originally 
meant for the Eastern European markets, has proven successful in Western Europe. 
In India, Tata is working on variants of the Nano which meet European and American 
regulatory requirements. 21 Siemens , Philips , and General Electric have developed 
radically simplifi ed medical devices in Asia, conceived for those markets. Yet 
they are now selling those same ultra-low price devices in the USA and Europe. 
19 Podium discussion on “Ultra-Niedrigpreisstrategien” at the 1st Campus for Marketing, WHU 
Koblenz, Vallendar, September 23, 2010. 
20 Vgl. Govindarajan V, Trimble C (2012) Reverse Innovation: Create Far From Home, Win 
Everywhere. Harvard Business Press, Boston. 
21 Talk with Tata Auto CEO Carl-Peter Forster in Bombay on May 11, 2010. 
 Ultra-low Price Products Also for Sale in Highly Developed Countries?
62
These devices do not necessarily cannibalize the much more expensive devices, 
which get used in hospitals or specialty practices. In some cases, the ultra-low price 
products have opened up entirely new segments, such as general practitioners, who 
can now afford these kinds of diagnostic devices and can make some of the simpler 
diagnoses themselves. 22
 Grohe , one of the global leaders in bathroom fi ttings, instantly became one of the 
leading suppliers in China after it acquired the domestic market leader Jouyou . Now 
Grohe is trying to position Jouyou outside of China as a less expensive second 
 brand . Simplifi ed products which still deliver a desirable level of functionality at 
extremely low costs and prices defi nitely have an opportunity to sell well in advanced 
economies. When deciding whether to pursue an ultra-low price position, managers 
should look not only at how attractive that segment is in emerging markets . They 
should also think through the consequences—good and bad—that such a strategy 
could have on the higher price positions in developed countries. 
 Success Factors for an Ultra-low Price Strategy 
 It is still unclear whether companies can sustainably generate adequate profi ts with 
ultra-low price strategies. Nonetheless, the success factors for such a strategy are 
quite clear:
 1. Think “simple yet robust”: A company must strip down a product to the bare 
essentials, but without making it too primitive or rendering it dysfunctional. 
 2. Develop locally: The company must develop the product in emerging markets ; 
that is the only way to guarantee that it meets the customer requirements in the 
ultra-low price segment. 
 3. Lock in lowest cost production: This requires the right design and the ability to 
manufacture in the lowest wage locations which still ensure adequate 
productivity. 
 4. Apply new marketing and sales approaches: These will also require keeping 
costs as low as possible, even if that means forgoing traditional channels and 
approaches. 
 5. “Easy to use, easy to fi x”: These two aspects are of paramount importance, 
because customers may lack the background to understand complicated functionality and service providers may lack the resources to make anything but the 
most basic repairs or adjustments. 
 6. Provide consistent quality: Sustained success is only possible if the quality of 
ultra-low price products is not only adequate, but above all consistent. 
 The key challenge in the ultra-low price segment is to fi nd an acceptable level of 
value to customer which will attract enough buyers and still keep costs at extremely 
low levels. 
22 Talk with Siemens CEO Peter Löscher at the Asia-Pacifi c Conference in Singapore, May 14, 2010. 
4 Price Positioning: High or Low
63
 Success Strategies with High Prices 
 High prices. High margins. High profi ts. Intuitively that trio seems to fi t together 
well, at least at fi rst glance. But the relationship is not quite that simple. If a highprice positioning always guaranteed success, every single company would adopt 
one. 
 At least two other conditions must come into play in order to make this equation 
work. Namely, you need to make sure that the two other drivers of profi t—costs and 
 volume —are managed well. If you have high costs, a high price does not guarantee 
a high profi t margin . A high margin results only in high profi t if you achieve a suffi cient gap between price and costs. That is not a trivial observation. Customers will 
only pay high prices for a product or service when they receive high value in return. 
High value, in turn, often requires high costs to produce and in real life, that is often 
the case: it costs too much to achieve and sustain the level of value needed to support a high price. But even when a company does achieve high margins, it still needs 
to sell enough units to make a high profi t. If the price is so high that volume remains 
very low, the company will struggle on the profi t front. We will now take a look at 
two categories of high-price strategies: premium and luxury . 
 Premium Pricing 
 How much higher are premium price s than “normal” or “average” prices? Of course 
it’s impossible to give a general answer. A 16-ounce package of pistachio ice cream 
from Ben & Jerry’s costs $3.49; this amounts to 22 cents per ounce. A 32-ounce 
package of pistachio ice cream from the regional New England brand Brigham’s 
has a price of $2.99 or 9.3 cents per ounce. That is a price difference per ounce of 
133 %. A box of 24 Crayola crayons costs $1.37, but a box of 24 crayons from CraZ- Art costs just 57 cents, a price difference of 140 %. All-natural peanut butter, a 
product consisting of just two or three ingredients, also shows a wide spread. A jar 
of Skippy has a price of $2.68, while Smucker’s costs $2.98 and a local New 
England brand Teddy’s costs $3.00. But specialty suppliers selling peanut butter 
online charge between $5.59 and $7.79 for a jar. All of these jars are the same size 
(16 ounces), except for Skippy, which is still 15 ounces due to the indentation in the 
bottom, as we explained in the previous chapter. 
 To get a Miele washing machine, you may need to pay roughly twice as much as 
you would for a Maytag or GE model, which means that you pay several hundred 
dollars more. Huge price difference s exist even for industrial goods. The wind turbine company Enercon ’s prices are more than 20 % above the competition, but 
Enercon still holds a market share of over 50 % in its home market. 3M has many 
market-leading industrial products which command premium price s. 
 We aren’t talking about small price difference s here; in both percentage terms 
and absolute terms, we are talking about massive price differences. Nonetheless, it 
is not unusual for a premium product to have a higher market share than cheaper 
alternatives. Often the premium product is the market leader. How is that possible? 
 Premium Pricing
64
And what does it mean for profi t? The answer lies in the higher perceived value or 
utility. This higher level of value to customer is no accident. It derives from excellent product or service performance. Premium pricing means offering higher value 
and demanding a premium price in return. 
 Apple vs. Samsung 
 On September 3, 2001, on a trip to Seoul, I met with Dr. Chang-Gyu Hwang, then 
the CEO of the memory division of Samsung Electronics. Dr. Hwang, who is now 
CEO of KT Korean Telecom, gave me a small device for storing and playing music. 
The quality of the music already stored on the device was superb, the design less so. 
I found the device so cumbersome to use that I wasn’t able to store any additional 
music on it. 
 A few years later I bought an iPod nano. In contrast to Samsung at that time, 
 Apple was already a very strong global brand . The iPod featured a very elegant 
 design ; I could use it right away without consulting a manual. And more importantly Apple’s iTunes system allowed me to load more music onto my iPod. Over 
the last several years I have seen Dr. Hwang often. Every time we meet, the “iPod 
story” inevitably comes up. Together with the late Steve Jobs, Dr. Hwang developed 
the iPod, which at its core is the device he gave me back in September 2001. 
 What did Apple do differently? Its iPod combines four important things: a strong 
 brand , a cool design , user-friendliness, and system integration. That combination 
resulted in much higher customer- perceived value , higher prices, higher volume , 
and astronomical profi ts. Apple has sold more than 350 million iPods. I have already 
described some of the price difference s between premium product s and their noname products or competitors with weaker brands. In Apple’s case, the price for an 
iPod is easily double or triple the price of other MP3 players. Apple followed a 
similar strategy with the iPhone and iPad: innovation , design, strong brand, userfriendliness, and system integration … in other words, higher value to customer 
which supports higher prices. Once again, Apple was extremely successful with that 
strategy. In 2012 Apple earned $41.7 billion as its revenue grew by 45 % to $156.5 
billion. This corresponds to a return on sales of 26.6 %. In light of these numbers, 
Apple moved ahead of Microsoft to become the world’s most valuable company in 
August 2012, when its market capitalization reached $622 billion. Realistically, one 
couldn’t expect Apple to sustain this extraordinary run of success. Only time will 
tell if someone can fi ll the shoes of a genius like Steve Jobs. In August 2015, the 
market capitalization of Apple stood at around $642 billion, a very high number. 
Regardless of what happens, though, Apple has proven that a company can use 
innovation, a strong brand, attractive products, and system integration to generate 
higher value to customer, achieve high prices, and earn astronomical profi ts, all 
founded upon the customers’ higher perceived value. Samsung has learned this 
 lesson, and has tried to catch up in recent years with its own smartphones. 
4 Price Positioning: High or Low
65
 Gillette 
 The global shaving and personal hygiene giant Gillette offers a classic example of 
 premium pricing . The company invested $750 million to develop its Mach3 system, 
the fi rst razor with three blades. As Fig. 4.1 shows, Gillette priced the Mach3 razor 
41 % higher than its previously most expensive product, the Sensor Excel. Gillette 
followed up the Mach3 with a series of innovations, including the Fusion, which has 
fi ve blades. With each new innovation , the company continued to charge higher 
prices. 23 Gillette practices premium pricing of the best kind: creating value through 
innovation, communicating that value, and then extracting it with premium price s. 
Fusion’s price is almost three times the price of the original Sensor. Is Gillette going 
too far?
 Today Gillette has a global market share of almost 70 %, its highest market share 
in 50 years. 24 Its competitors Wilkinson Sword (12.5 %) and BIC (5.2 %) trail by a 
wide margin. Resistance to Gillette’s high prices has, however, been growing in 
recent years. Online competitors have sensed an attractive opportunity. 25
23 Data collected by the London offi ce of Simon-Kucher & Partners . The price per blade is based 
in the largest available pack size. 
24 Annual Report Procter & Gamble 2012. 
25 Newcomer Raises Stakes in Razor War. The Wall Street Journal, April 13, 2012, p. 21. 
 Fig. 4.1 Premium prices for Gillette razor blades 
 Gillette 
66
 Miele 
 I have mentioned the home appliance manufacturer Miele a few times. The value is 
unmistakable: you might recall that my mother’s Miele washing machine lasted for 
40 years. Miele charges at least 20 % more than its competitors. Co-managing 
director Markus Miele explained how they do that: “We are at home in the premium 
segment . Our products are engineered to last for 20 years. In terms of technology 
and ecology, they are among the best you can buy. People are willing to pay higher 
prices for this promise of quality.” 26
 Markus Miele ’s words capture the essence of premium pricing . But even the 
manufacturers of premium product s need to keep their eye on the competition. In 
Miele’s words: “Of course Miele needs to make sure that our price gap to the relevant competitors does not become too big. For that reason, we continuously work 
on our cost structure . We never neglect our company’s motto ‘forever better’. We 
cannot win a battle based on having the lowest price, but we will win when the 
battle is about having the best product.” 27
 In some parts of the world, Miele is viewed as a true luxury good. Said Reinhard 
Zinkann, grandson of one of Miele’s founders and co-managing director: “In Asia 
and Russia, wealthy people want to surround themselves with the best and the most 
expensive products on the market. That is why we positioned Miele as a pure luxury 
 brand in those markets.” 28 In 2012/2013, Miele’s revenue reached a record $4.25 
billion. The company does not publish profi t data. But Miele has a very high equity 
ratio (45.7 %) and no debt on its balance sheet, which proves that it must earn solid 
profi ts year after year. Its motto “Forever Better” hasn’t changed for 100 years; it is 
the core and heart of Miele’s strategy, the cornerstone of its lasting success as a 
premium brand. 
 Porsche 
 Should a company follow established industry practices when it chooses the price 
position of a new product? Not necessarily. More relevant than traditional industry 
practices or rules is the true understanding of a product’s perceived value . The following case of the Porsche Cayman underlines the key role of the value to customer 
for the price positioning . The Cayman S is a coupé based on the Porsche Boxster 
convertible. 29 At what price should Porsche launch the Cayman? The automotive 
industry had its own clear, experience-based answer: the price of the coupé must be 
roughly 10 % below the price of the convertible. At that time, market data showed 
26 “Erfolg ist ein guter Leim, Im Gespräch: Markus Miele und Reinhard Zinkann, die geschäftsführenden Gesellschafter des Hausgeräteherstellers Miele & Cie.”, Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, 
November 13, 2012, p. 15. 
27 Ibidem. 
28 Ididem. 
29 A coupé is a hard-top. 
4 Price Positioning: High or Low
67
that coupés were indeed 7–11 % less expensive than convertibles. Because the 
Boxster’s price was €52,265, standard industry practice would call for the price of 
the Cayman to be around €47,000. 
 The CEO of Porsche at that time, Wendelin Wiedeking, decided to buck that 
industry trend. A big fan of value pricing, Wiedeking wanted to get a deeper understanding of the Cayman’s value to customer. He asked us to do a very thorough 
global study which revealed that Porsche should do the exact opposite of what conventional wisdom said. The higher than expected value of the Cayman was driven 
by a mixture of factors, including the design , a stronger engine, and, of course, the 
Porsche brand . The Cayman’s price should not be 10 % less than the Boxster’s 
price, but rather 10 % higher. Porsche followed our recommendation and launched 
the Cayman at a price of 58,529 Euros. 30 The new model became a big success, 
despite the higher price. Once again, a deep understanding of value to customer 
proved to be the foundation for an appropriate premium pricing strategy. 
 Enercon 
 When introducing many of the concepts in this book, I have repeatedly said that their 
application is by no means limited to consumer products . They apply just as well to 
 industrial products . Premium pricing is no exception. In fact, it may be even a better 
fi t for industrial products, because industrial buyers investigate value more thoroughly and make economically more rational assessments than consumers tend to. 
 Founded in 1984, Enercon is the third largest manufacturer of wind turbines in 
the world. This company holds more than 40 % of all wind power technology patents in the world. The prices for its wind turbines are around 20 % higher than the 
competition’s. If you consider that the average price for wind energy generation 
equipment is around $1.3 million per megawatt, that 20 % works out to a bit more 
than $250,000 per megawatt. For the 3,500 megawatts of capacity which Enercon 
installs each year, the additional revenue amounts to more than $600 million. 
Despite the higher prices, Enercon enjoyed a market share of 55 % in Germany in 
2014; its global market share is around 10 %. 31 Enercon’s premium price position is 
based on hard facts about value to customer. Its wind turbines have no gears, which 
means that they break down less often than competitors’ products. It is, thus, rational for customers to accept a higher price for an Enercon product and the results 
show up in Enercon’s fi nancials. In 2012 Enercon had revenue of $6.6 billion and 
an after-tax profi t of $783 million, for a return on sales of 11.9 %. Enercon was the 
only profi table supplier of wind power technology over the last few years. 
 Enercon also practices a very successful pricing model which involves a new form 
of risk sharing . Under its Enercon Partner Concept (EPC), a customer can sign up for 
maintenance, security services, and repairs at a price which depends on the yield of 
30 A slight modifi cation boosted the Cayman’s engine performance by 10 horsepower. 
31 Enercon doesn’t do business in the USA and in China and it is not in offshore. In spite of these 
confi nements it is the third largest wind technology manufacturer in the world. 
 Enercon 
68
the Enercon turbine. In other words, Enercon reduces its customers’ entrepreneurial 
risks by sharing those risks with the operator of the wind park. Customers have found 
the offer very attractive, and more than 90 % of them sign an EPC contract. 
 As with all risk assumptions and guarantees, the provider needs to consider the 
potential costs. In Enercon ’s case, the costs are manageable because of its superior 
 product quality . The absence of a gear (the number one cause of a breakdown) 
means that Enercon can guarantee its customer uptime of 97 %; competitors typically do not guarantee more than 90 %. In reality, Enercon products achieve 99 % 
uptime. It costs Enercon nothing to guarantee uptime of 97 %. This is an ideal 
example of optimal risk sharing between a supplier and a customer, which can 
noticeably lower a customer’s resistance to buy. Enercon also assumes half of all 
service fees for the fi rst half of the 12-year contract period. This provides substantial 
and much appreciated fi nancial relief for the wind park investor, who is liable to be 
fi nancially strapped in the few years it takes to ramp up a wind park. 
 “Bugs” Burger Bug Killers 
 What does high value mean for a pest control company? The highest possible value 
is quite simple: the pests are not only temporarily eliminated, but also gone for 
good. “Bugs” Burger Bug Killers (BBBK) offers an absolute unconditional 
 Fig. 4.2 The highest possible value through an absolute guarantee 
4 Price Positioning: High or Low
69
guarantee for that kind of service. There are no exceptions or excuses. It is worth 
reading how BBBK expresses it (Fig. 4.2 ).
 It is impossible to top this level of customer value. These kinds of promises make 
the guarantee credible. And what does the fl ipside of that customer value look like? 
BBBK’s price is ten times as high as its competitors’ prices. 32
 Premium Strategies Can Also Backfire 
 Not all attempts to extract higher value succeed. Energy-effi cient light bulbs are an 
example. They were introduced in the early 1990s and offered big savings compared to traditional incandescent bulbs. They required only a fraction of the energy 
and lasted ten times longer. Over the entire lifetime of a bulb, these cost advantage s 
could total as much as $65. Yet the manufacturers did not even come close to 
extracting this added value through correspondingly higher prices. The bulbs were 
priced at around $20 at launch, and the price trend ed downward year after year as 
cheap Chinese imports entered the market. These imports didn’t have the same 
quality, nor did they last as long, but those facts were hard for customers to recognize at the time of purchase. The lower prices for the imported bulbs also served as 
strong anchors. In addition, light bulbs are a low-interest product. Consumers did 
not accept premium price s. 
 Electric motor scooters face a similar problem. They tend to be more expensive 
than gas-powered scooters, because of the additional costs of the battery. The energy 
costs for a traditional scooter are around $8 per 100 km versus just $1 for the 
battery- powered model, for a savings of $7 for per 100 km. If the price difference 
between the two scooters is $1,300, the buyer of an electric scooter reaches the 
 break-even point within a few years, depending on actual usage. As attractive as 
savings of $7 per 100 km might sound, most consumers are not going to make the 
effort to do a break-even analysis. They tend to decide whether the claim seems 
reasonable at face value. This applies generally to most claims about “life cycle 
costs” or “total cost of ownership.” In this case, the actual break-even point for the 
scooter described above is at about 18,000 km. 
 Capitalizing on the added value of innovations is often more successful when a 
company introduces a new price metric . Instead of selling light bulbs, the light bulb 
manufacturer could have offered light per hour and charged a price for that service. 
Instead of selling scooters, the scooter company could have offered transportation 
on a per-kilometer basis. The French tire company Michelin adopted precisely that 
strategy for its tires for trucks and industrial vehicles. Michelin now sells tire performance and charges a price per kilometer. We will take a closer look at this and 
similar pay-per-use schemes in Chap. 8. 
32 Hart CWL (1988) The Power of Unconditional Service Guarantees. Harvard Business Review 
pp. 54–62. 
 Premium Strategies Can Also Backfi re
70
 Success Factors for a Premium Price Strategy 
 What are the common factors behind successful premium pricing strategies? What 
recommendations can I give?
 1. Superior value is a must: Premium pricing will work over time only if a 
 company offers superior value to customer. 
 2. The price-value relationship is the decisive competitive advantage: In contrast to 
 luxury products, which depend heavily on the prestige effect , the successful premium product s derive their true competitive advantage from their high value (in 
objective, absolute terms), translated into an appropriate price-value relationship. 
 3. Innovation is the foundation: In general, innovation provides the foundation for 
a successful, sustainable premium price position. This applies to groundbreaking 
innovations as well as continual improvements, such as Miele ’s under the motto 
“Forever Better.” 
 4. Consistent, high quality is a must: This prerequisite comes up time and again. 
Successful premium supplier s maintain high and very consistent quality levels. 
Their service must also meet the same requirements. 
 5. Premium pricers have strong brands: One function of these strong brands is to 
transform a technological advantage—which is often temporary—into a longlasting image advantage. 
 6. Premium pricers invest heavily in communication: They know that they have to 
make the value and advantages of their products perceptible and understandable 
to consumers. Remember: only perceived value counts. 
 7. Premium pricers shy away from special offers: They are hesitant to offer promotions and special offers. If the promotions they offer are too frequent or too steep, 
these instruments can endanger the premium price position. 
 The key challenge in premium pricing is the balance between value and costs. 
The emphasis here is on high value to customer, which includes not just the core 
product itself, but also the extensive “envelope” of other benefi ts which surrounds 
it. Nonetheless, costs must remain within acceptable levels. 
 Success Strategies for Luxury Goods Pricing 
 Beyond premium lies the land of luxury . There are no clear demarcations which say 
“premium only goes up to here” or “luxury begins here.” 33 But the price scale for 
luxury goods has no upper limits. Some experts even claim that “the price for luxury 
goods can’t be high enough.” The prestige, snob, and Veblen effect s are in full force 
in this product category and are more important than objective product quality , even 
though true luxury goods must nonetheless meet the highest quality standards. 
There is no excuse for poor quality. 
33 For a comprehensive look at pricing for luxury goods, please see Henning Mohr, Der 
Preismanagement-Prozess bei Luxusmarken, Peter Lang-Verlag, Frankfurt, 2013. 
4 Price Positioning: High or Low
71
 How Much Does a Luxury Watch Cost? 
 Global production of wristwatches, including illegal knockoffs, is about 1.3 billion 
units per year. The average price per watch is under $100. But watches are a category in which luxury models play a special role. Fig. 4.3 shows a selection of watch 
models and prices shown at the 2013 Geneva Watch Salon (Salon Internationale de 
la Haute Horlogérie).
 Is the Chronograph Racer, priced at €5,000 ($6,500), already a luxury watch? 
The answer depends on whom you ask. The Grand Complication from A. Lange & 
Söhne , priced at €1.92 million ($2.56 million), turned the most heads at the Geneva 
Salon. 34 It costs 384 times as much as the Chronograph Racer. This gigantic difference illustrates how much pricing latitude is available to producers of luxury goods. 
The Grand Complication reveals another fundamental characteristic of luxury 
goods: as price rises into the stratosphere, the number of units available also seems 
to disappear into ever-thinner air. A. Lange & Söhne only manufactured six units of 
the Grand Complication. 
 One key secret to the art of pricing luxury goods is mastering “ limited edition s.” 
The supplier must strictly abide by its own limit; otherwise it risks losing its credibility and reputation. The limited number of units determines the scarcity and thus 
the value of the luxury good. A prerequisite for successful luxury goods pricing is 
the skill to simultaneously set both the price and volume ex ante . 
 I use the words “prerequisite” and “skill” here, because attempts to do this can 
fail miserably, as the following story shows. At the watch trade fair Baselworld 35 a 
manufacturer displayed a redesigned model. Its predecessor was priced at $21,300. 
Because the watch was very popular, the manufacturer raised the price of the new 
model by 50 % to $32,000. Volume would be limited to 1,000 pieces, refl ecting the 
34 The Grand Complication is not the world’s most expensive watch. That title belongs to a watch 
from Hublot, presented at Baselworld 2012 and priced at $5 million. 
35 Baselworld is the world’s largest trade fair for watches, with 1,800 exhibitors and over 100,000 
visitors. The Geneva Watch Salon positions itself is more exclusive. It has only 16 exhibitors and 
12,500 visitors. 
 Fig. 4.3 Selected luxury watches and their prices 
 How Much Does a Luxury Watch Cost?
72
maximum capacity the manufacturer had available. At Baselworld, the manufacturer 
received 3,500 orders for the watch. The price should have been much higher; the 
foregone profi t is enormous. Had the manufacturer sold the 1,000 pieces at $40,000 
instead of $32,000, it would have cleared an additional $8 million in profi t. 
 Swiss Watches 
 Luxury watches are a useful category for showing the difference between “ volume ” and “value.” Watches manufactured in Switzerland represent just 2 % of the 
world’s annual watch production. Yet on the back of this tiny volume, the Swiss 
watches altogether account for an incredible 53 % of the global watch market on a 
value basis. 36 The difference between their volume-based market share (2 %) and 
their value-based market share (53 %) is dramatic. The average export price of a 
Swiss watch is around $2,400 and the average end-consumer price is around 
$6,000. 37 Swiss watchmakers generated export revenues of $23.2 billion in 2012. 
Watchmaking ranks as the third largest industry in Switzerland behind pharmaceuticals/chemicals and machine tools. Rolex has annual revenues of around $4.8 billion, Cartier roughly $2 billion, and Omega $1.9 billion. These numbers show the 
potential that the production of luxury goods holds. 
 LVMH and Richemont 
 The luxury segment has experienced strong growth in the last two decades. Even 
the global recession put only a temporary dent in the ability of major luxury goods 
companies to grow and achieve enviously high profi ts. The recent fi nancial performance from some of the world’s leading groups reinforces this point. The global 
market leader, France’s Louis Vuitton Moët Hennessy (LVMH), saw its revenue rise 
by 17 % in 2011 and again by 19 % to $36.0 billion in 2012. It earned an after-tax 
profi t of $5.0 billion, for a return on sales of 13.9 %. Revenue increased by 29 % to 
$11.9 billion for Switzerland’s Richemont Group in the 2011/2012 fi scal year. 
Richemont posted an after-tax profi t of $2 billion, for a return on sales of 17.4 %. 
 Hermès , another important player in the luxury goods market, showed even stronger profi tability . Its revenue rose by 23 % to $4.7 million and its net profi t came to 
$987 million, for an eye-popping net return on sales of 21.3 %. 
 It makes sense for companies with strong brands and a reputation for high quality to take a closer look at the luxury segment. People have begun to accumulate 
tremendous wealth in countries such as Russia, China, and India. These nouveau 
36 Große Pläne mit kleinen Pretiosen. Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung March 12, 2012, p. 14. 
37 Revill J (2013). For Swatch , Time is Nearing for Change,” The Wall Street Journal Europe, April 
11, 2013, p. 21. The data on this question are contradictory. Another report placed the average 
price for a Swiss watch at 430 Euros, while the CEO of a Swiss watchmaker put the average price 
at around 1,700 Euros. 
4 Price Positioning: High or Low
73
riche are channeling a large portion of their enormous purchasing power toward 
luxury goods, and many industries now offer a good jumping-off point for luxury 
goods and services. American Express sells its luxury Centurion card in the USA 
for $2,500 per year, after a one-time in initiation fee of $7,500. In Germany the 
 annual fee is $2,600, and in Switzerland it is around $4,600. In Los Angeles, you 
can rent a Bentley convertible for $900 per day. In the Burj Al Arab Hotel in Dubai, 
a one-bedroom suite costs $1,930 per night, plus 10 % for tax and another 10 % for 
service. The Ritz Carlton in Dallas has created a new 5,500-square-foot “privacy 
wing” to accommodate VIP entourages which may include a nanny, a chef, and a 
security team. The price: $7,500 per night. 38 The price per hour for a fl ight in a private jet ranges from $2,400 in a Citation Mustang to $8,700 in a Gulfstream G550. 39
In other words: there is plenty of supply and demand for luxury goods. 
 Stumbling Blocks in Luxury Goods Marketing 
 The previous cases may lead you to assume that luxury goods offer the ultimate 
path to price nirvana. Even when you “get it wrong” like the Swiss watchmaker 
prior to the Baselworld trade fair, you are still in pretty good shape. After all, after 
the price increase of 50 % that company’s misjudgment of supply and demand still 
left it with a much higher profi t. 
 That assumption about price nirvana is wrong, as the following case shows. 
 Maybach 
 It is fl attering but very frustrating when a company offers an exclusive limited edition , and demand outstrips supply. In the world of luxury goods, it is not just frustrating, but also very unpleasant when the opposite happens: a company offers a 
luxury product, and hardly anyone buys it. 
 That was the fate suffered by Maybach, a Mercedes luxury car, which sold for 
around $650,000. After record sales of 244 cars in 2004, the number of vehicles 
sold dropped steadily to two-digit levels in 2010 and 2011. In contrast, Rolls Royce 
sold 3,575 cars in 2011. The last Maybach rolled off the Mercedes assembly line on 
December 17, 2012. 
 I once had the pleasure of riding in a Maybach. Liang Wengen, the wealthiest 
man in China and the founder of the construction machine manufacturer Sany , sent 
one to pick me up. At the time of my visit he owned four Maybachs and would 
eventually own nine of them. Unfortunately, Maybach found far too few customers 
such as Mr. Liang. 
38 Boom time ahead for luxury suites. The Wall Street Journal, March 21-23, 2014. 
39 See Aviation-Broker.com. 
 Maybach
74
 Was the price the problem? Or is a car such as the Maybach simply a relic from 
a bygone era? Volkswagen avoided a similar failure with the Bugatti Veyron, which 
it sold for a little over $1.7 million, because it limited production from the outset to 
300 vehicles. And Volkswagen actually sold them all. The Veyron didn’t make any 
money, but that was also not the objective. This “rocket” got worldwide attention 
and thus contributed to the fame of Bugatti and, indirectly, of its parent Volkswagen. 
 One wonders whether it would have made sense to continue producing the 
Maybach as the fl agship of Mercedes . The Maybach’s halo effect on the primary 
brand (in this case Mercedes) could have a lot of value. But there is another aspect 
of luxury goods that poses a problem on the cost side: their buyers expect not only 
products of extraordinary quality, but also service at the same level. The costs of 
providing exceptional service worldwide for a limited-edition automobile are far 
more than any company will reasonably bear. One should keep that in mind before 
bringing a service-intensive luxury product to market. For a luxury watch, providing service is not a big problem. For a luxury car, providing service is a Herculean 
task that can drive a business deep into the red. 
 The marketing and pricing for luxury goods face a number of obstacles. 
Obviously, luxury goods need to meet the highest expectations and the most stringent standards with no room or excuses for mistakes. That applies to more than just 
 product quality in the narrow sense. It applies equally to service, design , packaging, 
communication, media, and distribution channel s and last but not least to the 
employees who support these activities. The marketing of luxury goods requires a 
very intense level of commitment. 
 Luxury goods manufacturers need to attract highly qualifi ed staff, engage the best 
designers, and invest large sums in communication and distribution . Only when you 
have no weaknesses across that entire performance spectrum will you be in a position to get customers to accept the high prices you want to charge. This makes luxury 
goods a high-stakes game. The barrier to entry is enormous, and once you are in, the 
slightest sustained weakness can cause irreversible damage and cost you the game. 
 Luxury goods companies also need to resort to all kinds of marketing “tricks” 
you might expect from more mainstream companies. In luxury watches, some models are in high demand, and others less coveted. In the diamond market, De Beers, 
the global market leader, has stones of better and lesser quality. What does one do 
in that situation? De Beers’ answer was to offer a bundle of desirable and less desirable stones, rather than offering each stone individually. Customers used to have no 
choice in this matter: they could accept or refuse the bundle. If a customer refused, 
however, De Beers would not invite that customer to the next auction . In the meantime, De Beers’ de facto monopoly in the diamond market has started to crumble. 
It can no longer employ such hardball tactics. 
 This kind of bundling also occurs in the luxury watch market. Dealers occasionally need to buy a bundle which includes models that are hard to resell. These 
models often end up in gray-market channels, where original watches get sold at 
steep discounts. This kind of price erosion is toxic for luxury goods. A customer 
who has paid $25,000 for a watch does not like to see the same watch offered elsewhere for $15,000. 
4 Price Positioning: High or Low
75
 The luxury goods manufacturers go to great lengths to shut down these gray 
market s, even tracing individual items. They contract with special agencies who 
conduct mystery shopping to fi nd out what products sell for what prices in different 
stores. This chronic problem in monitoring channels, which results in part from the 
high reseller margins, has motivated luxury goods companies to take distribution 
in-house. The number of company-owned specialty store s in airports, hotels, and 
exclusive shopping malls has risen sharply in the last few years. 
 Owning its own stores gives a company complete control over prices, but this 
approach also has a dangerous downside. It takes what used to be variable costs —
the commissions formerly paid to dealers and resellers—and converts them into 
 fi xed costs for rent and store personnel. This can drive up the break-even threshold. 
In a downturn that spells trouble for luxury goods companies. 
 In October 2009, at the high point of the global recession , I took a walk through 
the lobby of Singapore’s Raffl es Hotel , where dozens of luxury goods stores line the 
hallways. There was hardly a customer anywhere. I was virtually alone, except for 
the salespeople who stood idle at the store counters. The luxury goods companies 
were very fortunate that the downturn in their industry lasted only a few months. 
 Are There Limits to Prices of Luxury Goods? 
 Cartier ’s Trinity gold bracelet costs $16,300. Is that expensive? Perhaps it is when 
you compare it to $11,000, which was its price fi ve years ago. And that huge price 
increase is nothing compared to a Chanel quilted handbag, whose price has jumped 
by 70 % to $4,900 in the same period. These increases clearly outpace infl ation —
which was close to zero in the recent past—and cannot be entirely explained by 
rising costs. That means they must have another motivation: to continue to tap into 
the wealthy’s willingness to pay for luxuries. 
 In early 2014, some market observers began to feel that these prices have begun 
to “wear thin with Western customers,” especially as competition from more affordable brands increases. 40 Manufacturers also face the risk of turning off some customers if economic growth sputters or stalls. This happened in the depth of the 
 recession , as my walk through the Raffl es Hotel in Singapore showed. And it can 
happen again any time. 
 The Challenge of Creating Enduring Value 
 When a customer pays a very high price for a product, he or she expects that the 
product will hold its value. This makes the creation of enduring value another challenge for luxury goods manufacturers. It also means that a luxury goods company 
cannot resort to special offers or discounts to create short-term growth. Such promotions would tarnish the company’s image and water down the value of the product 
40 Soaring luxury -goods prices test wealthy’s will to pay. The Wall Street Journal, March 4, 2014. 
 The Challenge of Creating Enduring Value
76
in the eyes of previous buyers. Luxury goods companies cannot afford to use price 
as a means to increase volume , even in times of crisis . Wendelin Wiedeking, the 
former CEO of Porsche , repeatedly pointed out that his company’s prices, value, and 
reputation precluded offering high discounts. Doing so would lower the residual 
value of used cars. This is a particularly important argument for Porsche, because 
around 70 % of all Porsche vehicles ever built are still in use. Wiedeking explicitly 
prohibited cashback offers. When the chief of Porsche’s US operations didn’t observe 
this rule, he was fi red. 
 The electric vehicle manufacturer Tesla is offering an interesting residual value 
guarantee on the Model S sedan, which it introduced in 2013. A buyer can sell the 
car back to Tesla after three years at the same relative residual value as a Mercedes 
S class (measured in percentage terms). 41 This price guarantee allows Tesla to project the high image of the Mercedes brand onto its own, in an effort to provide potential buyer s more certainty that the Tesla Model S will retain its value. Managing the 
aftermarket, and occasionally buying back products, can help a company maintain 
the high-perceived residual value of its products. Ferrari takes this approach. 
 Observing Volume Limits 
 Self-control is another challenge which luxury goods companies face. Even when 
business is going well, a luxury goods company must resist the temptation to aim 
for big volumes. The combination “high price–low volume ” (the exact opposite of 
the “low price–high volume” strategy discussed earlier in this chapter) is elementary for luxury goods. Placing upper limits on the volume is the only way to preserve exclusivity. 
 When the American Peter Schutz led Porsche in the 1980s, he liked to say that 
“the second Porsche on the same street is a catastrophe.” Wiedeking, his successor, 
expressed a similar sentiment when he asked us the question: “How many Porsches 
can the world bear?” This was not an easy question to answer. But if a company 
wants to maintain a high-price position, such a number is not very big, and selfcontrol is mandatory, lest the company exceed the feasible volume number and 
jeopardize its luxury position. 
 Ferrari ’s volume reached an all-time high in 2012. It sold 7,318 vehicles, not a 
very large number in the context of the automotive industry. If you divide Ferrari’s 
revenue of $3.24 billion by that number, you get an average price of $442,732 per 
car sold. That gives us a rough idea of the price level for a Ferrari, even though the 
number is not an exact average price. Ferrari also generates revenue from service 
and spare part s, so its total revenue does not come solely from sales of vehicles. 
In any event, the air is very thin when a company charges around $400,000 for a car. 
 Porsche moved 143,096 vehicles in 2012, making it an automotive giant relative to 
Ferrari. 42 The “average price” for a Porsche, based on total company revenue, is just 
41 Tesla misst sich an Mercedes . Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, April 4, 2013, p. 14. 
42 Porsche verkauft so viele Autos wie nie zuvor. Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, March 16, 
2013, p. 16. 
4 Price Positioning: High or Low
77
over $93,000, which is high but still at an entirely different level than where Ferrari 
fi nds its customers. 
 Lacoste may be the most famous example of a once highly prized brand which 
fell victim to “massifi cation,” the degradation of an exclusive brand to mass or 
mainstream status. Something similar happened decades earlier to the shirt brand 
“Schwarze Rose” or “Black Rose.” In the 1950s, Opel , which is part of General 
Motors , had a strong position in the high end of the market with models such as 
Admiral and Kapitän. The gradual decline began when it introduced the massmarket Kadett model in 1962. At the end of the 1980s, Simon-Kucher & Partners 
examined whether Opel could reenter the upper end of the market. The chances did 
not look promising for the Opel brand, so Opel’s parent company General Motors 
followed the recommendation to acquire the Swedish Saab brand, well positioned 
at that time. General Motors was, however, unable to reposition Saab in the highend segment with any sustained success. GM sold Saab in 2010 to a Dutch company, which resold it in 2012 to the Chinese car Company Geely. 
 Success Factors for Luxury Goods Price Strategies 
 As we have done with the other price-positioning concepts, here are my recommendations for pricing luxury goods:
 1. Luxury goods must always deliver the highest level of performance: This applies 
across all dimensions, including materials, product quality , service, communication, and distribution . 
 2. The prestige effect is a big driver: In addition to the dimensions above, luxury 
products need to convey and confer a very high level of prestige. 
 3. Price contributes to the prestige effect and serves as a quality indicator: A 
higher price does not usually come at the expense of volume . In fact, sometimes 
the opposite is the case. 
 4. Volume and market share must remain within strict limits: Observing volume 
and market share limits—especially if limited edition s have been promised—is 
a must in the luxury goods market. Companies have to resist the temptation to go 
for a “bigger” volume or market share, no matter how attractive this may seem in 
the short term. 
 5. Strictly avoid discounts, special offers, and similar actions: They will tarnish a 
product, brand , or company’s image (if not destroy it) and will diminish the 
products’ residual value. 
 6. Top talent is essential: Every employee must meet the highest standards and 
perform on a high level. This applies to the entire value chain , from design and 
production down to the appearance of salespeople. 
 7. Having control of the value chain is advantageous: Luxury goods companies 
should strive to control the value chain, including distribution , to the greatest 
degree possible. 
 8. The primary factor in price setting is the customers’ willingness to pay:
Willingness to pay is decisive, while variable costs play a relatively smaller role 
 Success Factors for Luxury Goods Price Strategies
78
than they do for lower price segments. More problematic are fi xed costs , which 
can rise quickly as a company increases its vertical integration. Higher fi xed 
costs drive up the break-even volume , which runs counter to the exclusivity and 
limited volumes which underpin a luxury price position. 
 What Is the Most Promising Price Strategy to Pursue? 
 If you are now wondering which of the price strategy options explored in this chapter—low, premium, or luxury —is the most promising, I would answer by saying 
that none of them is easy. As we have seen, a company can become a tremendous 
success or a miserable failure with any of the three price positions. There is generally no right or wrong strategy. 
 The price positioning s we have discussed refl ect the different mix of buyers in a 
specifi c market. In every market you will fi nd customers who have seemingly limitless purchasing power and at the same time demand the highest standards. If a 
product meets these standards, those customers are willing to pay a very high price. 
The “middle-class” customers weigh the trade-offs between value to customer and 
price. They have demanding standards and can afford premium product s, but not 
 luxury goods. At the low end of the price scale, you fi nd customers who must be 
extremely frugal and careful in how they spend their money. These customers are 
satisfi ed with acceptable, consistent quality and look for the lowest prices, so that 
they can stay within their fi nancial means. Purchasing power is even more limited 
in the world’s poorer countries. Here the challenge lies in offering the lowest acceptable product performance at ultra-low price s. 
 Of course, customers do not always fall into such nice, neat segments in every 
market. So-called hybrid consumer s are supposedly becoming more common. 
These consumers buy their food and groceries at the deep discounters, so that they 
can afford to go out to dinner at a three-star restaurant. In order to fi nd the right 
place within the highs and lows of pricing, a company also needs to understand 
these kinds of consumers, to the extent that they really exist in relevant numbers. 
 Selling to each of these segments places different demands on managers and 
requires different skill sets. The skill set and personality that work well for a company 
in one price segment can actually become an impediment in another. Luxury goods 
companies need the highest levels of competence in design , quality, and service, and 
the ability to maintain a consistent image and set of standards across all parts of the 
business. That in turn demands a certain kind of corporate culture . The skills and ability to control costs, in contrast, are not a success factor in that segment. 
 A premium price position moves the trade-off between cost and value to the 
forefront. A company needs to offer high-quality products, but without letting costs 
run amok. Success with a low-price position and especially an ultra-low price position requires the skills and abilities to keep costs as low as possible throughout the 
entire value chain . The corporate culture in those companies is often just as relentless and unforgiving as a luxury goods culture, but with the opposite focus. In contrast to the world of luxury goods, the culture of the low-price companies must be 
4 Price Positioning: High or Low
79
modest and frugal, if not outright stingy. This kind of working environment isn’t for 
everyone. But even in low and ultra-low price segments, a company needs sophisticated marketing know-how and needs to attract the right talent. Companies in these 
price segments must know precisely what they can leave out without causing the 
customer to refuse the product or switch to a competitor . 
 These brief thoughts should suffi ce to show how diffi cult it is to execute both a 
high-price and a low-price strategy within the same company. The cultural requirements are radically different, though a company might overcome them if it can 
achieve a decentralized corporate structure. A company that pulls off that diffi cult 
trick is Swatch . One observer notes: “Swatch is well-positioned, because its brands 
range from inexpensive Swatch watches to the ultra-expensive Breguet and 
Blancpain lines.” 43
 We can also try to answer the “what is the most promising price strategy ?” from 
a more quantitative perspective. Michael Raynor and Mumtaz Ahmed recently 
undertook that challenge, analyzing more than 25,000 companies which were listed 
on US stock exchanges between 1966 and 2010 and thus needed to make comprehensive fi nancial data available publicly. 44 The two researchers used return on assets 
(ROA) as their measure of success. To make it into the top category, which the 
authors referred to as the “Miracle Workers,” a company needed to rank among the 
top 10 % in ROA in every single year it was publicly listed. Only 174 of the more 
than 25,000 companies, or 0.7 %, qualifi ed. The second category, the “Long 
Runners,” needed to be among the best 20–40 % performers in ROA in every single 
year. They found even fewer of these companies, a mere 170. The rest of the companies ended up in the category “Average Joe.” 
 The authors then compared one Miracle Worker, one Long Runner, and one 
Average Joe from nine different industries. Their research revealed two success 
guidelines, which they referred to as “better before cheaper” and “revenue before 
cost.” “Miracle Workers compete on differentiators other than price and typically 
rely much more on gross margins than on lower costs for their profi tability advantage,” the authors explained. “Long Runners are as likely to depend on a cost advantage as on a gross-margin advantage.” 
 These interesting fi ndings imply that the share of companies which are successful with a premium price strategy is greater than the share of companies which have 
achieved sustained success with low-price strategies. As we have seen, the business 
world has some extremely successful companies with low-price strategies, but they 
are few and far between. This must be the case, simply because most markets have 
room for one and at the very most two successful “low price–high volume ” companies. This is also consistent with another fi nding of Raynor and Ahmed: “Very 
rarely is cost leadership a driver of superior profi tability .” 
 In contrast, most markets can support a larger number of premium-price 
 companies who achieve sustained success. All in all, I consider the results of Raynor 
43 Revill J (2013) Swatch boosts profi t, forecasts more growth. The Wall Street Journal Europe, 
February 5, 2013, p. 22. 
44 Raynor ME, Ahmed M (2013) Three rules for making a company truly great. Harvard Business 
Review online, April 11, 2013. 
 What Is the Most Promising Price Strategy to Pursue?
80
and Ahmed’s to be both plausible and valid. After 40 years in the pricing game I am 
convinced that only very few companies will achieve long-term success with a lowprice strategy . These companies must become very large and extremely cost competitive. Many more companies can achieve sustainable success with differentiated 
offerings and premium-price positions, but they will not grow to the size of the 
low-price contenders. For luxury goods we see again a relatively low number of 
successful companies, and they are the smallest of the three categories. 
 In the fi rst four chapters of this book, we have learned that everything in the 
economy revolves around prices, that the strange psychology of prices plays a key 
role with amazing new fi ndings, and that different price positions can lead to sustained profi ts. After this bird’s eye view on pricing, we will look more closely at the 
inner mechanics of pricing in the next three chapters. 
4 Price Positioning: High or Low
© Springer International Publishing Switzerland 2015 81
H. Simon, Confessions of the Pricing Man, DOI 10.1007/978-3-319-20400-0_5
 5 Prices and Profits 
 It amazes me how often small business owners show an iron-clad grasp of prices 
and profi ts that seems to elude managers at large companies. 
 A couple of years ago I hired a gardener to do some work in my backyard. I told 
him that if he gave me an additional discount of 3 %, I would pay the entire bill 
immediately. These kinds of “early payment discounts” are common terms in many 
business contracts. 
 “No way,” he said with calm self-assurance. 
 Surprised and curious, I asked him to explain. 
 “My net profi t margin is about 6 %,” he said. “If you pay me immediately, that 
will obviously help my cash fl ow . But if I give you that 3 % discount , I’ll need to 
hire twice as many people and do twice as much work to make the same amount of 
money. That’s why I can’t agree to your offer.” 
 I was speechless. Rarely I have seen managers and executives explain a price 
decision so succinctly and so correctly. Perhaps that understanding comes from the 
fact that those dollars are all his. He has the same visceral connection to earning a 
living that I felt at the farmers’ market in my childhood. 
 How much profi t do you think the average company really earns? Think of it in 
terms of a percentage like the gardener does. For every $100 in sales , how much 
remains on average in a company’s coffers as profi t? 
 Consumers tend to come up with some pretty wild estimates if you ask them to 
give a quick top-of-mind answer. In one study, US consumers estimated these profi t 
margin s or return-on- sales numbers at 46 %. In a similar study in Germany, the 
estimated margin was 33 %. The truth lies much closer to what my gardener earns 
than what people generally think. 
 Wholesalers and many retailers are happy when their margins are between 1 and 
3 %. In its 2012/2013 fi scal year, Walmart ’s consolidated net income as a percentage of total revenues was 3.8 %. 1
 An industrial company with a margin at 10 % 
would be above average. 
1
 Walmart 10-K fi led March 2013. 
82
 Of course, exceptions to this rule do exist. For its 2014 fi scal year, Apple ’s net 
margin stood at 21.6 %. 2
 Let’s put that in context. If the average company were as 
profi table as Apple, we would all live in an entirely different world, a utopia beyond 
our ability to imagine. But we can leave that world to the philosophers and sciencefi ction writers. In the 21st century, where single-digit margins are the norm, businesses must care about their pricing. Every percentage point change in prices can 
have a stunning impact on profi tability . The lower your margins, the greater the 
need for caution. If a company has a margin of just 1 % and wants to cut prices to 
grow market share , managers must realize that they are very likely to sacrifi ce all of 
their profi ts if they proceed. 
 The pursuit of profi t is both a driver of excellent pricing and an outcome of it; 
there is no way to separate the two topics. Profi t is ultimately the only valid metric 
for guiding your company. The rationale is simple: profi t is the only metric which 
takes both the revenue side and the cost side of a business into account. A company 
which wants to maximize its sales neglects the cost side. A company which wants 
to maximize its market share can distort its business in many ways. After all, the 
easiest way to maximize market share is to set one’s price at zero. 
 The example of Best Buy in Chap. 2 shows what happens when a company takes 
its eye off profi t and focuses instead on one of those secondary goals, such as market share . But that example is mild compared to the fate that television makers 
recently suffered. The big, fl at-screen TV is becoming a fi xture in our living rooms, 
and we marvel at what these impressive and valuable devices can do. But in 2012, 
their manufacturers collectively lost $13 billion. How can this happen? The trade 
association’s president attributed it to “too many companies focusing on market 
share instead of profi table results.” 3
 Unfortunately, the word “profi t” raises a red fl ag for many people. Hollywood 
movies over the last 30 years link profi t and money making to excess and selfindulgence. I can’t deny that these situations occur. After all, many of those movies 
are based on real people or composites of them. In my opinion, however, defending 
“profi t” is not tantamount to defending greed and excess. It is a defense of corporate 
survival and growth. Let’s remember the comment by Peter Drucker, one of the 
most respected and widely followed management experts of our time: “Profi t is a 
condition of survival. It is the cost of the future, the cost of staying in business.” 4
 Or 
as the esteemed German economist Erich Gutenberg once remarked, “no business 
has ever died from turning a profi t.” 
 Profi t transcends other corporate goals because it ensures a company’s survival. 
Businesses cannot afford to treat profi t as a “nice to have” or a “pleasant surprise” 
at the end of the year. Put another way: if the company you work for makes no 
profi t—or takes actions which puts profi ts in grave danger—your own job is at risk. 
It is only a matter of time before the cuts come. My favorite example for this is 
 Motorola at the end of 2006. The handset maker described its sales in the fourth 
2
 Apple 10-K, fi led September 2014. 
3
 TV-Hersteller machen 10 Milliarden Verlust. Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, April 20, 2013, p. 15. 
4
 Drucker PF (2001) The Essential Drucker. Harper Business, New York, p. 38. 
5 Prices and Profi ts
83
quarter of 2006 as its best quarter ever after it made steep cuts in the price of its Razr 
phone. That comment was a weak and ultimately unsuccessful attempt to distract 
from a cascade of bad news. Profi ts plunged by 48 % in that quarter. Market capitalization shrank by billions of dollars. And a few weeks after this news broke, 
Motorola announced that it would lay off 3,500 people. 5
 Because profi t is an indispensable condition of survival, it follows that excellent 
pricing is a means of survival. Companies need to take prices into their calculations 
with the same intensity and rigor they apply to costs. For as many negative examples of poor pricing decisions presented in this book, there are also success stories 
which all followed another path: they created valuable products and services, and 
then priced them at levels which ensured both healthy sales and healthy profi ts. 
 Chasing the Wrong Goals? 
 Countries show signifi cant differences in how profi table their companies are. I have 
tracked data on this topic for many years, and attribute some of the results to cultural 
norms. Figure 5.1 compares the average profi t margin s for companies in 22 countries. 6
 US companies are in the middle of the pack at 6.2 %. German companies 
have an average after-tax profi t of 4.2 %, placing them in the lower half despite their 
improved performance in the recent past. Japanese companies have assumed their 
5
 Motorola Plans to Lay Off 3,500. Associated Press, January 20, 2007. 
6
 Data from the Institut der Deutschen Wirtschaft, 2013. 
 Fig. 5.1 After-tax profi t (percentage of revenue ) for private and publicly traded companies 
Greece
Japan
Italy
Finland
Austria
Portugal
Germany
France
Netherlands
China
Spain
USA
India
Denmark
Belgium
Sweden
Canada
United Kingdom
Switzerland
Norway
Brazil
Russia 12.5%
10.2%
8.4%
8.3%
8.1%
7.6%
6.7%
6.5%
6.5%
6.2%
6.2%
5.5%
5.2%
4.9%
4.3%
4.2%
3.9%
3.7%
3.0%
2.2%
2.0%
1.4% Source: Institut der Deutschen Wirtschaft, 2013
 Chasing the Wrong Goals?
84
customary place near the bottom, with a meager 2.0 %. The average across all countries works out to 6.0 %.
 What causes these sharp differences? To a large degree it is a matter of having the 
wrong goals. While I wouldn’t say these numbers are completely self-fulfi lling prophecies, they do refl ect the priorities that companies set. Too many companies have 
given higher priority to goals other than profi t. In the midst of one Simon- Kucher & 
Partners project, a top manager of one of the leading global automotive companies 
summed up the prevailing attitude nicely: “Let’s be honest. Offi cially, yes, profi t is our 
corporate goal. But in reality, if profi t goes down by 20 %, no one really cares. If we 
lose even a tenth of a point of market share , though, heads will roll.” 
 The executive vice president of a major international bank managed to express 
the same sentiment without actually using the term “ market share .” He wanted to 
use pricing for the express goal of increasing profi ts, but with one nonnegotiable 
condition: “We can’t lose any customers. Not a single one.” 
 For many years I served on the board of an engineering company which made a 
habit of signing large contracts which made them no money. One executive proudly 
announced one day that he had just received an order for $10 million from a large 
customer. Eager to hear more about a deal of that size in such a competitive marketplace, I asked what concessions he needed to make after the initial bid. 
 “We needed to give them an additional discount of 17 %,” he said. 
 “And what was your original margin calculation?” I asked. 
 “Fourteen percent,” he responded, without even being aware of the simple arithmetic which would tell him how much that concession would cost the company. 
 Deals such as this one were common in this company, despite my appeals to 
reconsider or even walk away from unprofi table business. Their dominant concern 
was always to have enough work for their people. Profi t never governed their thinking and their actions. This was a shame because this company employed so many 
talented engineers with great ideas on how to improve their customers’ operations. 
Eventually I resigned my board membership. The words of Peter Drucker turned 
out to be prophetic: the company’s attitude toward unprofi table business sealed its 
fate, and it didn’t survive. It fi led for bankruptcy fi ve years later. 
 In my decades as an academic, businessman, and consultant I have heard such 
statements and witnessed such actions often enough to know that these are not isolated cases. The tendency continues to this day. In 2013 the leading companies in 
Germany’s wholesale market for pharmaceutical products waged an all-out price 
war . The primary opponents were Phoenix , the market leader, and its “attacker” 
 Noweda . A third large player was Celesio. The outcome was predictable. Despite 
some temporary shifts back and forth, overall market share s barely changed once the 
dust settled. The victim was profi tability , in a market with historically low margins. 
In December 2013 Phoenix announced ongoing declines across all profi t metrics. 7,8
In January Celesio was acquired by McKesson , the American market leader. 
7
 Rabattschlacht im Pharmahandel. Handelsblatt, March 20, 2013, p. 16. 
8
 Q3 2013/2014 results releases for the company. 
5 Prices and Profi ts
85
 No country has a monopoly on emphasizing goals such as market share , sales , or 
 capacity utilization at the expense of profi t. In Japan, market share is a kind of 
national obsession, which certainly plays a role in Japan’s perennial presence at the 
bottom of the profi tability list in Fig. 5.1 . I can’t count the number of times that 
Japanese executives ended a discussion about pricing and profi tability improvements with the comment “but then we would lose market share.” With that motto, 
they would politely decline any recommendations to rein in their aggressive pricing 
and discounting policies, because a loss of market share is taboo in Japan. The loss 
of face associated with a loss of market share carries a signifi cant social stigma. In 
Japanese culture, retreating is frowned upon. The country’s topography allows no 
room for manoeuver, which may explain the roots of this belief. In China, however, 
a retreat can be an honorable tactic. The country’s vast geography permits such a 
manoeuver. It will be exciting to see what strategic goals Chinese companies 
emphasize as they start to market more of their domestic brands internationally. 
In Germany, preserving jobs plays a similarly strong role as market share does in 
Japan. Among the larger countries, the UK and the USA are doing relatively well in 
terms of profi tability. I attribute this to the infl uence of capital markets, which is 
stronger there than in most other countries. In my opinion, American companies, 
however, more strongly pursue market share goals. Market share still plays a strong 
role and its pursuit may explain the margin difference between the two countries 
which is almost two percentage points. 
 It is also surprising in Fig. 5.1 that companies in smaller countries tend to have 
higher profi t margin s than those in larger countries. At fi rst glance, one would 
expect the opposite, namely that companies in larger markets profi t from economies 
of scale . How can the opposite outcome be explained? Based on my experience I 
suspect two reasons. First, companies in larger markets are more strongly market 
share driven. Second, competition in larger markets is more intense, thus making it 
more diffi cult to implement higher prices. This is usually easier in small countries. 
 Fortunately, many companies have begun a reorientation toward profi t in recent 
years. One compelling story comes from the German chemical company Lanxess 
AG, which introduced the motto “Price before Volume” in 2005 and has stayed on 
that successful course ever since. The company’s EBITDA has increased from $600 
million to $1.5 billion, a compound annual growth rate of over 14 % since 2004. 
This demonstrates the effects of consistent, value-oriented price management . 9
 There is nothing inherently wrong with having sales , volume , and market share 
targets. Most companies have them and work hard to strike the right balance. These 
three secondary goals, however, offer you no useful guidance for price setting . Price 
setting requires a thorough understanding of two things: how your customers perceive your value and the profi t level you need to sustain or improve that value. If 
market share is your primary goal, why don’t you just give away your product for 
free? Or even pay customers to use it? Of course such a strategy makes no sense. 
The reality in almost all companies is that goal setting is not an “either-or” exercise. 
9
 Lopez-Remon L. Price before Volume-Strategy—the Lanxess Road to Success. Presentation, 
Simon-Kucher Strategy Forum, Frankfurt, November 22, 2012. 
 Chasing the Wrong Goals?
86
Balance is paramount. The central problem is that most companies are not balanced. 
They still underemphasize profi ts relative to such goals as market share, revenue, 
volume, or growth. And they misunderstand the often dire consequences of that 
prioritization. This imbalance results in bizarre pricing strategies and ineffective 
marketing tactics. 
 Does Amazon want to grow revenue forever without suffi cient profi t margin s? 
Shareholders continue to believe in the strategy. In 2015 Amazon’s share price 
increased by more than 50 %. But eventually even Amazon must turn a profi t. What 
sense do the results of a ceramics company make which for the year 2013 reported 
revenue growth of 4 % and a profi t decline of 28 %? 10 As Amazon, this company 
priced its products very aggressively. Very often, questionable pricing is one of the 
root causes when revenue increases and profi t declines. 
 How Does a Price Increase of 2 % Affect Profits? 
 How would a price change of 2 % affect a company’s profi ts? In order to keep the 
analysis simple, we will change only the price and keep everything else constant. 
For a small price increase the assumption that volumes would remain constant is not 
as farfetched as you might think. Companies have many means at their disposal—
even in highly competitive markets—to effect a price increase of that magnitude 
with little or no loss in volume . 
 A major industrial company with around $14 billion in annual revenue asked us 
for recommendations on how to raise prices. We didn’t recommend an outright 
change in prices. Instead, they changed the incentive system for the sales people, 
specifi cally by including an “anti- discount ” incentive. The lower the discount salespeople offered, the greater the commission they would earn on that sale. The new 
system proved to be attractive and effective almost immediately. The average discount the company had to accept declined from 16 to 14 % within the fi rst three 
months, with no noticeable loss in volume and no customer defections. This change 
amounts to a de facto price increase of 2 %. 
 How would the profi ts of selected companies from the Global Fortune 500 
change, if they raised their prices by 2 %? Figure 5.2 shows the changes in profi ts 
for 25 companies, based on data for their 2012 fi nancial years. 11
 A relatively small price increase of 2 % would have a dramatic effect on the 
profi ts of many of these companies. If Sony succeeded in raising its prices by 2 % 
without any loss of volume , its profi ts would increase 2.36-fold; that is, they would 
more than double. The profi t increase for Walmart would be 41.4 %, and for General 
Motors 36.8 %. Even highly profi table companies such as Procter & Gamble , 
 Samsung Electronics, or Nestle would see profi ts grow by more than 10 %. The 
most profi table companies in this selection, IBM and Apple , would see more 
10 Hoeherer Verlust bei Steinzeug, General-Anzeiger Bonn, May 1, 2014, p. 7. 
11 Global 500, The World’s largest corporations. Fortune , July 22, 2013, pp. F-1–F-22. 
5 Prices and Profi ts
87
modest but still signifi cant profi t increases. These numbers clearly demonstrate that 
it pays to optimize prices. 
 Price Is the Most Effective Profit Driver 
 Revenue is the product of price and volume . Profi t is the difference between revenue and cost. This means that every business has only three profi t driver s: price, 
volume, and cost. All of these profi t drivers are important, but they affect profi t to 
different degrees. Anecdotal evidence, studies, and my own experience have told 
me that managers dedicate most of their time and energy to cost cutting—you could 
alternatively call it “ effi ciency improvement”—as a means for increasing profi ts, 
especially in tougher economic times. I would estimate that managers allocate 70 % 
of their time to cost issues, 20 % to volume, and only 10 % to price. The second 
most “popular” profi t driver among managers is volume or unit sales . They are 
willing to invest in better sales tactics and support, building their sales forces, and 
refi ning their competitive strategies. Price typically comes in last place, and in 
some cases comes into consideration only as the handmaiden of managers waging 
a price war . 
 The irony is that this prioritization runs in the opposite order of the effects 
these drivers have on profi ts. Prices get the least attention, but have the greatest 
 Fig. 5.2 Leverage effect on 2012 profi ts from a price increase of 2 % 
 Price Is the Most Effective Profi t Driver
88
impact. Let’s look at a company that makes and sells power tools. The numbers 
derive from a Simon-Kucher & Partners project, but I have rounded and altered 
them to make the math simpler. It costs $60 to make the tool, which is sold to 
dealers and wholesalers at a price of $100. The fi xed costs are $30 million. The 
company currently sells one million power tools per year. This turns into revenue 
of $100 million and total costs of $90 million. Thus, the company earns a profi t of 
$10 million and a good margin of 10 %. The cost structure of this case is somewhat typical of industrial products . Now let’s look at what happens if we improve 
each of the profi t driver s—price, variable costs , volume , and fi xed costs—by 5 % 
in isolation. 
 A price increase of 5 % boosts profi ts by 50 %. A 5 % increase in volume , in 
contrast, increases profi ts only by 20 %. The profi t improvement s from 5 % reductions in variable costs and fi xed costs come in at 30 % and 15 %, respectively. 
Improving any of these profi t driver s has a signifi cant impact, which makes it 
worthwhile to invest in them. The point is that improving prices has the greatest 
leverage on profi ts. It’s a power which managers typically underestimate (Fig. 5.3 ).
 Now … Let’s Change Your Prices and See What Happens 
 If you cut prices by 20 %, how many power tools would you need to sell to achieve 
the same level of profi t before the price cut? The most common spontaneous answer 
from managers is “20 %.” If only it were that simple. Getting 20 % is far below the 
 volume you would need. Figure 5.4 shows what happens and how many units you 
would need to sell to keep profi t constant.
 Even if your sales force succeeds in selling 20 % more power tools after the price 
cut, you are still losing money. The contributions from your sales are not suffi cient 
to cover your fi xed costs . When your price goes from $100 to $80, you cut your 
 contribution margin in half because it still costs you $60 to make each tool. The hard 
truth is that you need to double your volume after the price cut to keep your profi ts 
at $10 million. Anything less will reduce your profi ts. 
 Fig. 5.3 How improvement in profi t driver s affects profi t 
5 Prices and Profi ts
89
 The calculations above are rather simple. Yet many managers are startled to learn 
that a 20 % increase in volume —which sounds like a success—would have catastrophic consequences for their bottom line. 
 Volume discounts and free shipping are common incentives for online businesses. One study by Simon-Kucher & Partners showed that consumers list “free 
shipping” as one of their main reasons for shopping certain categories online instead 
of going to the store. These incentives may indeed appeal to us as customers. 
But they can have an insidious effect on the company’s ability to earn money. As 
you will see in the example below, the math is simple once you see it on paper, yet 
not immediately intuitive until you do. 
 Let’s look at a company that sells socks online. If you order ten pairs, they will 
give you 20 % off your purchase price. When I asked one of their executives whether 
that makes sense, he said that he marks up the socks by 100 % from the wholesale 
price , so he can afford to offer customers that incentive. As an added sweetener, he 
also waived the shipping costs ($5.90) if you ordered more than $75 worth of socks. 
 Figure 5.5 shows the consequences of those decisions. To keep things even simpler in this case, and make things look even more favorable for the sock seller, we 
will assume that the business has no fi xed costs .
 Fig. 5.4 How price cuts affect profi ts 
 Fig. 5.5 The 
consequences of volume 
 discount s and free shipping 
 Now … Let’s Change Your Prices and See What Happens
90
 The decision to offer the discount and the free shipping cuts the sock seller’s 
profi ts by 51.8 % compared to the base scenario in which he offers no discounts and 
charges for shipping. Now you argue that the volume numbers should be higher in 
the scenario in the right-hand column, because of the intrinsic appeal of discounts 
and free shipping. You’re right. How much higher must the volume be to achieve the 
same profi t as without discounts? 
 To achieve the same amount of profi t, the sock seller would need to more than 
double his volume in the “ discount and free shipping ” scenario. To be exact, he 
would need to sell 107 % more pairs of socks. This is highly unlikely for two 
 reasons. First, consumer products such as socks are not so sensitive to price change s. 
Second, this kind of discount often leads to what consumer goods companies refer 
to as the “pantry effect.” People will stock up on socks solely to get the discount and 
the free shipping, which results in fewer orders in the future. These discounts train 
customers, even the most loyal ones, to buy only when there is a deal or in a way 
that gives them a discount. In this case, most will order ten pairs of socks to get the 
discount and free shipping. But they will not buy more. 
 Big numbers make great stories. If the sock seller’s volume was 50 or 60 % 
higher in the “ discount and free shipping ” scenario, that would probably make him 
happy. The problem is that big numbers are not enough. You need gigantic numbers 
for these schemes to pay off, sometimes impossibly gigantic ones. 
 Let’s look at another online business, this time one that sells pet food and pet 
supplies launched an aggressive pricing strategy. The volume numbers gave management plenty of opportunities to dazzle investors. Sales jumped by 30 % in the 
fi rst quarter and by another 34 % in the second quarter versus the prior year. The 
problem was that these attention-grabbing numbers overshadowed one key fact: the 
company posted a loss in the second quarter. 
 A similar situation happened when a large European retailer with revenue of 
more than $20 billion took part in a “tax-free” weekend and offered to waive the 
19 % sales tax for its customers. “The traffi c we generated is incredible,” one of 
their executives told me. “We had 40 % more customers in our stores over the weekend!” I know of no retail manager or executive that would complain about having 
every aisle in the store overfl owing with customers on a weekend. The problem is 
that the incentives which drew in those customers were far too generous. Using the 
same calculations in the previous tables, the retailer would have needed 113 % more 
customers to break even on that “tax-free” weekend. 
 The obsessive pursuit of the wrong goals—customer counts, revenue, and market 
share —leads even the sharpest managers to neglect the effects that discounts and 
promotions have on profi ts. It is hard to determine how many of the customers these 
promotions draw in will become repeat buyers at regular prices. But this doesn’t 
change the simplicity and elegance of what my gardener knew: when you grant 
customers appealing and addictive goodies in the form of discounts, rebates, taxfree shopping days, free shipping , and on and on, you will typically see increases in 
interest, traffi c, sales volume , and most of the time (but not always) revenue. That is 
what makes these discounts so alluring and so tempting. They look like successes. 
 But that success is often only an illusion. 
5 Prices and Profi ts
91
 Back to the Future: The General Motors Employee 
Discount Program 
 Business didn’t look good for General Motors in the spring of 2005. In April, the 
company sold 7.4 % fewer cars than in the year-earlier month. May showed a slight 
improvement, but still trailed the previous year by 4.7 %. 
 Something needed to change. 
 The marketing teams at GM hit upon a revolutionary idea. They wouldn’t just 
offer discounts or cashback incentives, the standard tools of the trade. They would 
offer their vehicles at the deeper discount normally reserved for its employees. The 
action began with much fanfare on June 1, 2005, and ran for four months. The company did not quantify the discount, as it normally would have. Instead, it declared 
that “GM’s employee price is what a dealer actually pays for a vehicle.” 12
 To call what happened in the next two months a “boom” may be underplaying 
the results. 
 This unprecedented marketing action yielded a volume increase so instantaneous and so large that it may have even taken GM and its dealers by surprise. In 
June alone, GM sold 41.4 % more cars than it did in June 2004. In July, sales 
increased by another 19.8 %, forcing GM to worry that it may literally run out of 
vehicles to sell. Ford and Chrysler launched their own radical versions of the 
employee discount program in July, which started to siphon off some of the attention and the demand. 
 The fi rst important question after two tremendous sales months is this: Where 
did those customers come from? Aside from a house or a college education, a new 
car is probably one of the biggest purchases consumers ever make in their lives. It 
is not a casual spur of the moment decision. We are not talking about pantry loading 
for socks or potato chips. You will see the answer to the question in Fig. 5.6 . Almost 
all of those customers came from one place: the future.
 GM extended the promotion through the end of September, even though sales 
began to plunge in August. They fell by 23.9 % in September and declined by 
22.7 % year on year in October; growth remained negative for the remainder of 
the year. 
 Instead of generating additional demand, GM borrowed customers from its 
future sales and sold those people cars at deep discounts. The solid line in Fig. 5.6
shows just how dramatic the volume decline s were. They dropped from a peak of 
almost 600,000 units in July to fewer than 300,000 units in October. 
 The second important question is the following: How much did all this cost? 
GM’s average discount per vehicle came to $3,623 in 2005. The company posted a 
loss of $10.5 billion. The market capitalization shrank from $20.9 billion in August 
2005 to $12.5 billion in December. One year later, GM Chairman Bob Lutz offered 
his view of the program: “We’re getting out of the junk business, like employee 
pricing sales that boost market share but destroy residual values. It’s better to sell 
fewer cars at higher margins than more cars at lower margins. Selling fi ve million 
12 GM’s Employee-Discount Offer on New Autos Pays Off. USA Today, June 29, 2005. 
 Back to the Future: The General Motors Employee Discount Program
92
vehicles at zero profi t isn’t as good a proposition as selling four million vehicles at 
a profi t.” 13 This is absolutely correct, but one wonders why clever Bob Lutz realized 
it so late. 
 General Motors led the world in car sales for 77 consecutive years, starting in 
1931. It fell to second place in 2008. The company fi led for Chap. 11 bankruptcy in 
June 2009. 
 Prices, Margins, and Profits 
 When I emphasize that price is the strongest profi t driver , I am referring to total 
profi t dollars and not to profi t margin . Contribution margin is the difference between 
price and variable costs . In retail , this margin refers to the difference between the 
 wholesale price and the retail price . In the base scenario for the power tool business, 
the contribution is $40, because the products were made for $60 each and sold for 
$100. If your total contribution exceeds your fi xed costs , you make a net profi t. 
13 www.chicagotribune.com , January 9, 2007. 
 Fig. 5.6 GM’s employee discount program results 
5 Prices and Profi ts
93
 People pay a lot of attention to contribution margins but this alone does not provide 
suffi cient information for you to optimize your prices. Embedded in this thinking is 
what marketers refer to as “ cost-plus ” calculation. You fi gure out the price you want to 
charge by looking at your costs and “mark them up” by adding a certain percentage. 
 Having a high margin offers no guarantee that you will be profi table. One major 
reason is that this “ cost-plus ” approach has little or nothing to do with the value 
perceived by the customer, the most critical determining factor for setting a price. 
The “cost-plus” process takes neither the value to customer nor the resulting effects 
on volume into account. Cost-plus can lead you to set your prices too high, which 
can cause volume to collapse. Yes, you make a lot of money per sale, but if sales fall 
sharply your overall profi t is minimal. This is the textbook defi nition of “pricing 
yourself out of the market.” 
 The opposite effect is also true, in that a company can underprice its products. 
How many of you have heard the fateful phrase “don’t worry, we’ll make it up on 
 volume ” after someone makes a margin-slashing price cut? This kind of outcome, 
as several of my previous cases showed, sounds aspirational, but is more often than 
not an illusion. 
 The simplest method to understand these effects and guard against the ensuing 
margin deception is a break-even analysis. Let’s use the data from our power tool 
business. The price is $100, the variable cost to make the tool is $60 (variable unit 
cost), and the fi xed costs are $30 million. We can calculate our break-even volume , 
the minimum number of units we need to sell, as follows:
Break evenvolume Fixed costs
Price variable cost - = - = $, ,
$
30 000 000
100 60
750 000 - = $ , units 
We start making money after we have sold at least 750,000 units. If we start changing the price, you can see the big effect it has on the break-even amount. If we 
reduce the price to $80, we would need to sell 1.5 million units. At a price of $120, 
we would need to sell only 500,000 units to break even. 
 One question remains, though, when you set prices and fi gure out your breakeven volume : Who wants your product? In other words, is the market large enough—
and the perceived value suffi ciently understood—to sell that many tools? We need 
to take the volume effects into account as well. The break-even analysis is a simple 
yet powerful way to see how price change s affect the likelihood of turning a profi t. 
It also safeguards against making price cuts which have little or no chance of generating the huge volumes required to improve profi tability . 
 Price Is a Unique Marketing Instrument 
 Most people, including managers, never think of the term “ price elasticity ” in their 
day-to-day lives. Yet we all have an intuitive sense of what it means and rely on it 
far more than we think when we make decisions. Whenever we need to decide 
 Price Is a Unique Marketing Instrument
94
whether changing something will make a difference, or how much of a change to 
make, we intuitively or subconsciously take elasticity into account. 
 All of us have encountered situations when we decided that proceeding is “not 
worth the effort” or “won’t really make a difference.” We have also experienced 
situations where a small adjustment or tweak has made an enormous difference. 
 An economist would refer to the “big effort, little change” as “inelastic” and 
“little change, big impact” as elastic. The same applies to prices. Price has a strong 
impact on volume and market share , and we use price elasticity to measure that 
impact. Price elasticity is the ratio of the percentage change in sales volume and the 
percentage change in price. It is usually a negative number, because prices and volumes normally move in opposite directions. But to keep things simple, it’s customary 
to leave off the negative sign and just look at the magnitude of price elasticity. 
 A price elasticity of 2 means that the percentage change in sales volume is twice 
the percentage change in the price. Thus a 1 % price decrease would result in a 2 % 
increase in volume and conversely that a 1 % price increase would cause volume to 
fall by 2 %. Or, if we look at a price increase of 10 % volume would grow by 20 %, 
and vice versa. 
 We know from our investigations of tens of thousands of products that price 
elasticities usually fall into a range between 1.3 and 3. 14 The median is about 2, 
though price elasticities vary greatly depending on the product, region, and 
industry. 
 Other marketing instruments have elasticities as well. Advertising is a good 
example. In that case, we calculate the ratio of the change in sales volume and the 
change in advertising budget (both expressed in percentage terms). The same concept can be applied to sales force elasticity. On the average the advertising elasticity 
is in the range of 0.05 to 0.1 and the sales force elasticity is around 0.20 to 0.35. 
Thus the price elasticity being around 2 is on average between ten and 20 times 
higher than the advertising elasticity and roughly seven to eight times higher than 
the elasticity of the sales force investment. In other words, you would need to 
change your advertising budget by between 10 and 20 % or increase your sales force 
investment by 7–8 % to achieve the same effect you would get by changing prices 
by just 1 %. 
 Price elasticities are often—but not always—much higher when a special offer is 
in effect, such as the employee discount program offered by General Motors . 
Companies can amplify these effects even further when they combine the changes 
with more advertising and improved placement. In extreme cases, the price elasticity for such a special offer could be as high as 10, a rare example in pricing of “little 
change, huge impact.” But as the GM example showed, you need to understand the 
source of demand. Have you attracted new customers? Have you won over customers from the competition? Or have you borrowed heavily against your own future 
 sales , either by pulling sales forward at lower prices or, in the case of an inventory 
clearance, sold them something old now instead of something new later? 
14 Friedel E. Price Elasticity—Research on magnitude and determinants. Lang, Frankfurt, 2014. 
5 Prices and Profi ts
95
 Price has another big advantage over marketing instruments such as advertising 
or sales . Price changes usually can be implemented very quickly. In contrast, it can 
take months or years to develop or change a product. Advertising campaigns and 
budgets also require substantial time to implement and even longer to show their 
full effects. 
 You also see proof of this effect online. In December 2013, Delta Airlines made 
national headlines and became a hit on social media in a matter of hours after it 
offered outrageously low fares one morning. Customers snapped up deals such as 
Boston to Honolulu for $68 and Oklahoma City to St. Louis for just $12.83. 
Unfortunately for Delta but fortunately for the lucky buyers, the prices resulted 
from a computer glitch the company caught and corrected. 15
 You can change prices almost instantly to adapt to market changes, unless your 
contractual commitments or your published catalogs preclude it. Some retail stores 
now have the capability to change prices instantaneously on the shelf by algorithm 
or with a simple command. The same applies to e-commerce sites. 
 Pricing’s high-speed, high-impact power has other downsides. Because prices 
are so easy to change, competitors can respond very quickly to neutralize any 
advantages you stood to gain from a price move. These competitive responses are 
usually swift and strong. This phenomenon alone helps explain why companies 
rarely win price war s. Unless you have an unbeatable cost advantage which prevents your competitors from responding in kind, it is almost impossible to establish 
a sustainable competitive advantage through lowering prices. 
 Finally, price is the only marketing instrument you can employ with no upfront 
investment . This makes it an especially powerful marketing tool for small business 
or start-ups with tight fi nancial resources. The knowledge from this chapter alone 
can give anyone a head-start toward setting an optimal price , or at least weeding out 
dangerous options. Developing an advertising campaign, building a sales force, and 
conducting research and development are all essential parts of business success, but 
they all have a delayed payback and require substantial up-front investments. 
Optimizing these elements is critical, but is often not immediately fi nancially viable 
for a small business or a start-up. Price can be set at the optimal level right from the 
start of a company. 
 All of these unique features make price an endlessly fascinating and interesting 
marketing instrument, but also one whose power is often misunderstood or 
neglected. Pricing can look like a daunting high-risk, high-reward activity if you 
approach it in a half-hearted way. One of my objectives with this book is to convince 
you to go “all in” on pricing, but in a way that lowers your risks and keeps the 
rewards attractive and achievable. 
15 http://money.cnn.com/2013/12/26/news/companies/delta-ticket-price-glitch/ . 
 Price Is a Unique Marketing Instrument
© Springer International Publishing Switzerland 2015 97
H. Simon, Confessions of the Pricing Man, DOI 10.1007/978-3-319-20400-0_6
 6 Prices and Decisions 
 Who, What, Where, When, Why … and How? 
 Who sets prices? It depends mainly on the structure of the market. Think back to the 
farmers’ market from my childhood. In markets with homogeneous products and 
with many buyers and sellers, no individual player sets the price. Instead, the market sets prices through the interplay of supply and demand . The only way for sellers 
to infl uence their revenue and profi t is to change the amount of product they decide 
to sell. That assumes, of course, that they accept the prevailing price and the process 
that created it. 
 More typically in today’s world, however, we fi nd markets in which the sellers 
have some leeway in setting prices. This leeway can be substantial if the product is 
innovative or even unique. It leaves the seller with room to increase his or her profi t, 
but also with room for error. The same leeway also exists for what appear to be commodity product s at fi rst glance. Water is an example. 1
 In most countries, the price of a 
bottle of Evian is many times higher than the price of local mineral waters. Even for 
products which have a commodity at their core, such as water, you can fi nd a way to 
charge more. You can brand them (Evian), package them better (the ergonomic, resealable, plastic bottle), or provide better service. In those cases, you have transformed 
the supposed commodity into a differentiated good , as the price of Evian shows. 
 I use this example in speeches when someone asks whether it is possible for 
commodity or “me-too” products to command premium price s. Then, if the person 
who asked the question is not sitting too far away, I’ll take a plastic water bottle 
from the podium and throw it to them. (Don’t worry. No one has ever failed to catch 
it!) Many of those people call or write me later to say that they have never forgotten 
that lesson. 
 And who decides what the prices are? The “company” as an entity unto itself 
does not do that. Only people can make price decisions. That means these decisions 
are prone to habits, perceptions, and politics. Typically, pinning down a price 
1
 A commodity is a substitutable, undifferentiated product, such as crude oil or cement. 
98
decision to one ultimate person is a surprisingly frustrating exercise. Prices have 
many parents, but hardly any single person ever takes full responsibility for the 
child. Many functions in a company have a voice in the price decision: marketing, 
 sales , accounting, fi nance, and of course general management. Everyone has an 
opinion. Everyone is a pricing expert. 
 If you ask me which department in a company should “own” pricing I cannot 
give you a defi nitive, universal answer. Price setting has no natural home. From 
highly centralized, hierarchical companies to decentralized ones with fl at hierarchies, price setting can take place anywhere in the organization. It is safe to say that 
a company’s organization and product portfolio determine which of the departmental or functional voices carry the most weight in a price decision and who ultimately 
decides. In industries with very few key products—industrial machinery and aircraft come to mind—the top executives usually have the last word on prices. If a 
company has an extremely large and diverse assortment ( retail , airlines , tourism, 
logistics), it means that their teams need to set hundreds of thousands of prices, if 
not millions of them. It is impossible for the senior executives to make these decisions. Teams or individuals further down in the organization rely on pricing process es and guiding principles to set the prices. If a company negotiates most of its 
prices, as practically all business-to-business companies do, it usually empowers 
individual salespeople to make price decisions on the spot within a predetermined 
range. 
 And what do these people decide on? What constitutes a price decision? In 
extreme cases, the answer is one single price. But I am not aware of any company 
that has just one price, even if it has only one product. We will always fi nd variants, 
discounts or other terms, exceptions, and special charges for services such as shipping or travel costs. In general, companies have an assortment of products and services, all requiring price decisions. A carmaker doesn’t just need prices for its 
vehicles, but also for hundreds of thousands of replacement parts. If a company 
serves different segments, its prices will also have several price parameter s. Some 
companies use a combination of base price s and variable price s. Price differentiation can include a large number of components, conditions, and incentives. It should 
be clear that no matter how it looks at fi rst glance, price is rarely just one number 
based on one decision. More often than not, it combines many numbers and an 
intricate web of decisions. 
How do people make price decisions? As much as it may seem like an exact science, it is a wide open area. There is still a lot of truth in the words of advertising 
guru David Ogilvy: “Pricing is guesswork. It is usually assumed that marketers use 
scientifi c methods to determine the price of their products. Nothing could be further 
from the truth. In almost every case, the process of decision is one of guesswork.” 2
He fi rst made that statement over 50 years ago, and today it still applies to large 
parts of the economy. 
2
 Ogilvy D (2004). Confessions of an Advertising Man. Southbank Publishing, London (Original 
1963). 
6 Prices and Decisions
99
 But as you might imagine, not everyone guesses. Some industries and individual 
companies set prices in a very professional way. These include life sciences and 
pharmaceuticals. I would also highlight the higher end segments of the automotive 
industry, where many carmakers capitalize very professionally on their leeway to 
charge a premium. Many online fi rms show a high level of professionalism. We 
need to distinguish between sophistication and professionalism. Airlines employ 
complex and very advanced pricing systems, but even they let themselves fall into 
devastating price war s. 
 To understand and appreciate the quantitative side of “how,” we have to take a 
systematic look at price setting . Without a fundamental understanding of price decisions and the factors that go into them, it will be hard to categorize and evaluate the 
various pricing practices we observe in real life. 
 The Effects of a Price Decision 
 In the fi rst fi ve chapters I have tried to keep the stories and the math as simple as 
possible in order to make the messages easier to understand. In many cases, we 
made the assumption that the only thing changing in a given scenario is the price. If 
the price change is small, that assumption is acceptable. Larger price changes, 
though, will ignite a chain of interrelated effects that makes price management complicated. It’s time for us to meet that complexity head on. 
 Price changes reverberate through an industry in many ways with positive, negative, and occasionally contravening effects. Figure 6.1 shows the most important of 
these interrelationships and demonstrates that the path from price to profi t is neither 
singular nor linear. The dotted lines show defi nitional relationships: revenue is by 
defi nition the product of price and volume ; profi t is the difference between revenue 
and costs.
 The solid lines show the behavioral relationships in this system. Price changes 
affect volume , and volume changes affect costs. You already know about the relationship between price and volume from the earlier discussion of supply and demand . 
 Fig. 6.1 The interrelationships of price management 
 The Effects of a Price Decision
100
The demand curve —or technically speaking, the price-response function —defi nes 
the direct functional relationship between price and volume. If you want to set price 
in a professional manner, you have to know what your demand curve looks like. The 
demand curve helps you estimate and quantify the impact your decisions will have. 
 The demand curve and the cost curve defi ne the chain of effects through which 
price ultimately infl uences your profi t. More specifi cally, as shown in Fig. 6.1 , you 
have three paths that lead from price to profi t: 
 Price → Revenue → Profi t 
 Price → Volume → Revenue → Profi t 
 Price→ Volume → Costs → Profi t 
 Figure 6.1 illustrates the simplest case: one supplier and one time period. Missing 
from Fig. 6.1 are three factors which are common if not omnipresent in business: 
competition, time, and resellers such as distributors, dealers, or retailers. Adding 
them in puts even more complex chains of effects between price and profi t: 
 Price → Competitors’ prices → Market share → Volume → Revenue → Profi t 
 Price (today) → Volume (future) → Revenue (future) and Profi t (future) 
 Price (today) → Volume → Costs (future) → Profi t (future) 
 Price (supplier) → Price ( reseller ) → Volume → Revenue→ Profi t 
 These are only the most important and the most obvious paths. You will notice, 
however, that all paths to profi t begin with price. There is no way around that. This 
is as deep as most pricing practitioners dive into the topic of price decisions. The 
reason for that is easy to appreciate: these paths are diffi cult to trace in the real 
world and even more diffi cult to quantify, which leads practitioners to fall back 
instead on their own experience or rules of thumb to make price decisions. The 
chances that they fi nd the optimal price this way are low. 
 Price and Volume 
 Price normally has a negative effect on volume . The higher the price, the less you 
sell. That is the fundamental law of economics and we express that mathematically 
in a demand curve . You plug a price into that equation, and it tells you how many 
units you will sell. 
 A demand curve usually applies to an entire market or to a market segment. 
These curves are in reality the aggregation of many individual demand curves. The 
type of good you buy also matters.
– Durables : In this case the demand curve s refl ect a yes-no decision of each individual customer. People buy one washing machine, one smartphone, one camera, 
or one PC. Or they don’t buy at all. The demand curve is the sum of the individual decisions. 
– Nondurables: In this case, buyers often buy several units at a time, depending on the 
price. Think about how many cans of soda you have in your refrigerator or how 
many gigabytes in your smartphone plan. We call this the “ variable quantity ” case. 
Again the demand curve refl ects the sum of the units bought by all customers. 
6 Prices and Decisions
101
 The “yes-no” case is easier to quantify. Classical economics tells us that if the 
price is less than the customer’s perceived value for the product or service, he or she 
will buy it. The highest possible price or maximum price corresponds directly to the 
product’s perceived value. Economists sometimes refer to this as the reservation 
price . The reservation price refl ects the customer’s willingness to pay . 
 You can think of the “variable amount” situation as a series of separate “yes-no” 
decisions. The higher the price, the fewer units the customer will buy. In other 
words, a customer’s willingness to pay generally decreases with each additional 
unit, because his or her perceived value for each additional unit also declines. The 
second, third, and fourth unit of a product brings less value (technically speaking, 
less utility) than the previous one. This is called the law of declining marginal 
utility . 
 If a company determines prices on an individual basis, as in a negotiated transaction , its salespeople will have different goals and different degrees of freedom, 
depending on whether they face a “yes-no” or a “ variable quantity ” situation. If the 
buyer’s decision is “yes-no” the salesperson looks for cues and clues to try to determine the buyer’s maximum price and try to make the sale as close to that price as 
possible. This information imbalance in favor of the buyer presents one of the biggest challenges in price setting in a negotiated transaction, especially when the 
salesperson has the power to make the decision. 
 In the “ variable quantity ” case, the sellers have at least two options. They can 
determine a fi xed price per unit or they can vary the price depending on the number 
of units purchased, a technique known as nonlinear pricing . Mathematically speaking it is harder to derive a demand curve in the “variable-quantity” case than in the 
“yes-no” case, because you need a good estimate of the marginal utility of each unit. 
 The aggregated demand curve results from the sum of the individual purchase 
volumes of each buyer for a given price. Theoretically these buyers can be homogeneous. But in reality they are almost always heterogeneous, because the preferences 
and utilities of the different customer segments or individuals vary. In all typical 
cases, once again, the aggregated demand curve also has a downward slope. When 
you take many individual buyers into account, the demand curve will approximate 
a smooth line. 
 To make a well-founded price decision, managers need to take their company’s 
own goals, costs, the behavior of its customers, and the behavior of its competitors 
into account. Taking all of those factors into account requires effort, trade-offs, and 
tough decisions. That’s why managers often rely on only one of those inputs for 
price decisions. The two most common methods are (1) using costs or (2) following 
the competition. 
 Using Costs to Set Prices 
 As the name implies, this method of setting prices relies primarily on the costs and 
to a lesser extent on the company’s own goals, while ignoring the behavior of customers and competitors, at least explicitly. 
 Using Costs to Set Prices
102
 If you ask dealers, distributors, or retailers how price setting works in their 
 business, they will probably say that they simply apply a markup to the costs of their 
product. If the product costs them $5, and the standard markup is 100 %, the merchant would charge customers $10 for that product. I criticize this method because 
it ignores too many important facets of the marketplace, but I admit that the approach 
has practical advantages. First, it depends on hard cost data, not on assumptions. 
It also guarantees the seller a positive unit contribution on every unit sold. Finally, 
if competitors use the same approach to set their prices, and also have similar 
 buying power , this method minimizes price competition for the product and encourages the sellers to compete on aspects other than price. Cost-plus pricing can create 
a de facto price cartel , with the resulting stability and predictability. All these factors 
explain why this method is so popular. 
 However, this method also has very serious disadvantages. It does not take customer reactions into account, because the sellers only use costs. Staying with the 
example above, it is possible that only a few customers are willing to pay $10 for 
the product. If that’s the case, a price of $10 is choking off the market’s growth and 
probably encouraging customers to look for cheaper alternatives to satisfy their 
needs. Conversely, customers may be willing to pay $12 per unit, which means that 
the sellers have sacrifi ced a large margin. 
 The lesson here is that unless you get lucky and your cost-plus pricing happens 
to coincide with customers’ willingness to pay , the cost-plus method of setting 
prices—despite its advantages—can either cost you customers or cost you profi t. 
With cost-plus you have a good chance that your price is either too high or too low. 
 Following the Competition 
 Following the competition means that you set your prices based on what your competitors do. That can mean that you match your competitors down to the penny, or 
consciously price your products above or below the competition’s. 
 Similar to the cost-plus method, one major appeal of this approach is its simplicity, as you can infer from the following comment. 
 “Setting our prices is easy,” a marketing director at a safety products company 
once told me. “We just look at what the premium supplier in our market does, and 
come in 10 % below them.” 
 This approach is not limited to business-to-business companies, either. I know 
one major retailer that sets the prices for its 600 top products by matching the prices 
of the hard discounter Aldi . They have teams which would scout Aldi stores for 
prices and keep an eye out for price change s. Those 600 products make up more 
than half of that retail chain’s revenue. The senior executives were surprised, however, when I told them what this meant for their business. Yes, they had simplifi ed 
their pricing process and positioned themselves as a head-to-head competitor of the 
hard discounter. But this pricing process also meant that they had delegated their 
price-setting responsibility to Aldi. You might say that they have outsourced the 
work of their pricing department. They essentially put Aldi in charge of managing 
more than half of their own revenue. 
6 Prices and Decisions
103
 Of course a company needs to keep an eye on its competitors’ prices and use 
them as input in setting its own. But a rigid, formula-based reliance on competitor 
prices as the basis of your own pricing will rarely lead to optimal price s. In the case 
of that major retailer , it is highly unlikely that the “follower” had the same cost 
structure and or the same demand patterns that Aldi does. So why should prices in 
each channel be identical? 
 Market-Based Price Setting 
 Managers can only avoid the disadvantages of cost-plus pricing or competitor -based 
pricing when they explicitly take the demand curve into account in their decision 
making. They can only fi nd out what their profi t-maximizing price s are if they know 
how customers will respond to specifi c price level s. 
 Let’s revisit our power tool manufacturer, but this time use a demand curve to 
fi gure out what prices will maximize the company’s revenue and profi ts. You will 
recall that the power tool division’s fi xed costs are $30 million and the variable unit 
cost for each tool is $60. The empirically derived demand curve for the tool works 
out to:
Volume Price = -´ 3 000 000 20 000 ,, , 
We know from our earlier discussion that a price of $100 results in sales of one million units and a profi t of $10 million. But what is the optimal price , which in the 
spirit of this book would be the profi t-maximizing price ? To try to calculate that 
price, let’s compare the key fi nancial results for seven different prices, ranging from 
$90 to $120 per unit. Figure 6.2 shows the results.
 The optimal price is $105 and the company earns a profi t of $10.5 million at this 
price. You will also notice some patterns in how the results change as you look left 
and right of the optimal price. At lower prices, revenue increases, but total variable 
 Fig. 6.2 Calculating the optimal price 
 Market-Based Price Setting
104
costs increase at a faster rate, resulting in a lower contribution and profi t. At higher 
prices, revenue and variable costs both decline, but revenues fall faster than costs, 
again reducing contribution and profi t. The same price change from $105—regardless of up or down—reduces profi ts by the same amount. The declines are indeed 
symmetrical. The company earns the same amount of profi t by pricing the power 
tool at $90 as it does at $120. 
 This refutes the widely held belief among practitioners that when in doubt it is 
better to err on the high side rather than on the low side when you price your product. The Russian proverb I cited earlier proves true in this case: a price that’s too 
high is as bad as a price that is too low. In both cases, you sacrifi ce profi t unnecessarily. I will admit, though, that in practice it is easier to back off a high price than 
to raise a price which you have set too low. In that sense, it probably is better to err 
on the high side, as long as the error is not so large that it puts the profi t of the product in jeopardy. 
 The numbers also show that relatively slight deviations from the optimal price do 
not result in severe profi t declines. If you are off by $5 from the optimum, either too 
high or too low, your profi t declines by 4.8 %. That is signifi cant for a billion-dollar 
business, of course, but not as bad as missing the optimal price in this case by, say, 
$15. In that case you would sacrifi ce 42.9 % of the profi t you get with the optimal 
price. This is an important insight. It means that it is not the end of the world if you 
don’t have the optimal price fi gured out down to the last decimal place. It is more 
important to be in the right vicinity. The further away you are from the optimal 
price, the steeper your decline in profi t. 
 Sharing Value Fifty-Fifty 
 So how do you arrive at the optimal price without building a table as in Fig. 6.2 ? 
Whenever you have a linear demand curve , as in this case, you can apply a simple 
rule to solve for it. The optimal price lies exactly in between the maximum price and 
the variable unit cost. The maximum price is the price which results in sales of zero. 
The maximum price for the power tool is pmax = 3,000,000/20,000 = $150. You can 
solve for the optimal price with this equation:
Optimal price Euro =´ + ( ) = 1
2
150 60 105 
This simple decision rule leads to some other lessons and useful rules of thumb. 
Let’s say that your variable unit costs go up. How much of a cost increase should 
you pass on? The equation above provides the answer. Because the optimal price 
lies halfway between the maximum price and the variable costs , you should pass on 
half of the cost increase to your customers. 
 If the power tool manufacturer’s variable unit costs rise by $10 to $70, the new 
 optimal price is not $10 higher, but rather $5 higher at $110. Similarly, you should 
pass along only half of any cost savings to your customers. This shows that costplus pricing is wrong, because it would call for you to pass along the full cost 
6 Prices and Decisions
105
change to your customer. The price of $110 is the midpoint between $70 (the new 
variable unit cost) and $150 (the maximum price , which remains unchanged). The 
same applies to reductions in variable unit cost. If it falls in this case from $60 to 
$50, the optimal price goes down by $5 to $100, not by $10. 
 The same principle applies to exchange rate fl uctuations. It is neither optimal nor 
wise to pass on exchange rate fl uctuations to customers in full. If you export from 
the USA, it is also not optimal to set all of your prices in dollars instead of using a 
local currency. Your customers outside of the dollar zone will use their own currencies for their purchase decisions. If their currency undergoes a devaluation, the 
product becomes more expensive for them. This same principle likewise applies to 
increases of a sales tax. For every tax increase of 1 %, your price should rise by less 
than 1 %. The exact amount depends on the slope of your demand curve . 
 What if the customers’ willingness to pay changes? If the maximum price 
 increase d by $10 to $160, the optimal price would rise by half that amount. You 
should never completely exploit that change in value perception and willingness 
to pay by putting it all in your own pocket. The rule of thumb, again, is to share 
the impact of the changes—whether positive or negative—evenly with your 
customers. 
 Common sense, not just mathematics, corroborates this principle. If your product delivers 20 % more value than the competitors’ products, you should collect 
10 % of that difference in price. If you demand more—or demand it all—the customer actually never gets to enjoy the difference in value. If your value difference 
is 20 % and your price difference is 20 %, the customer comes out of the deal 
empty- handed despite the greater value you provide. You offset the entire advantage 
for the customer by setting the product’s price too high. This is a conclusive theoretical validation of what many experienced sales people know intuitively, that a 
form of “win-win” between you and your customers trumps the full extraction of 
value. 
 Figure 6.2 also gives some insight into the concept of price elasticity . If you set 
the price at $100, you sell one million units. If you change the price by $1, or by 
1 %, your sales volume changes by 20,000 units or 2 %. The price elasticity at that 
price point is 2, which means that every percentage change in price results in a volume change that is double so high, in percentage terms. 3
 If you raise the price by 
5 %, your unit sales will decline by 10 %. I say the price elasticity is 2 at that price 
point, because the price elasticity is not constant when your demand curve is linear. 
It is the result of percentage changes, which means that it depends on where you 
start. 
 In the vicinity of the profi t-maximizing price , the price elasticity must be greater 
than 1. Otherwise, volume would decline proportionally less than the positive price 
change , meaning that your profi t would automatically rise. The price at which 
revenue reaches its maximum, in contrast, is where the price elasticity is exactly 1. 
If we project the table further to the left, we would see that company maximizes its 
3
 Price elasticity, which is the percentage change in volume divided by the percentage change in 
price, is usually negative. But for simplicity’s sake, one normally omits the negative sign. 
 Sharing Value Fifty-Fifty
106
revenue from the power tool at a price of $75. Volume reaches 1.5 million and 
 revenue rises to $112.5 million. The problem is that a price of $75 completely wipes 
out the company’s profi t. It actually books a loss of $7.5 million at that price point. 
This underscores once again the danger of focusing too heavily on maximizing 
revenue versus maximizing profi t, and the need for a balanced approach to goal 
 setting, as we discussed in Chap. 5. 
 So far we have looked at one special case of the demand curve s and cost function s, namely the linear case. Of course, in reality these functions are not always 
linear and the guidelines to deriving an optimal price not so straightforward. But my 
decades of experience tell me that within relevant price interval s, the linear demand 
curve is a suffi cient approximation of reality and therefore a very useful tool. You 
can treat the recommendations we discussed in this section as broadly applicable 
lessons about taking pricing decisions. 
 How to Determine Demand Curves and Price Elasticities 
 If demand curve s and price elasticity play an indispensable role in setting prices, 
where do they come from? How can you get the ones you need and ensure that they 
have enough validity? How do you turn your impressions and experience into hard 
numbers? The emphasis here is on the word “numbers.” You may know intuitively 
that lowering your prices may boost sales by “a little” or “a lot,” but that doesn’t 
help you much. You need to express “a little” or “a lot” in numbers. Prices, after all, 
are numbers. So are costs and volumes. These are the three inputs you need to calculate revenue and profi t, the hard fi nancial metrics allow to judge the fi nancial 
impact of your decisions and to determine whether a planned price decision is wise. 
Put most simply: you can’t make good price decisions without numbers. 
 The good news is that we now have a comprehensive set of methods and tools at 
our disposal to build these curves and use them to answer essential business questions. Over the last three decades, Simon-Kucher has been at the forefront of a wave 
of research and real-world applications that has made considerable progress in 
quantifying demand curve s and price elasticities. There is only a small number of 
proven, practical ways to derive a demand curve. Some require little more than 
back-of-the- envelope calculations, while others demand more sophisticated analyses. I will describe them in greater detail in the next section. 
 Expert Judgment: Making Direct Estimates of Price Elasticities 
 The simplest way to estimate price elasticity is to ask people. That may sound trivial, but if you ask enough people who are either close to customers or have enough 
market experience with a product, you can come up with some very useful 
numbers. 
 Of course you don’t just walk into a meeting and say “how elastic do you think 
the demand for our product is?” You can, however, ask your team how much volume 
6 Prices and Decisions
107
you would lose if you raised prices by 10 %. If the answer is 50 %, it means that 
your product has a price elasticity of 5. This gives you a clear indication that demand 
is very sensitive to price change s and you should proceed with caution if you plan 
to raise them. Conversely, if your team says that a price decrease of 10 % would 
cause volume to increase by 50 %, a price cut may be a very reasonable option. As 
simple as this method sounds, at Simon-Kucher we have used it very effectively as 
a discussion starter over the years. One of our clients in media even named the 
method “one up, one down” to remind themselves to check and discuss how price 
changes would affect volume, and then use the resulting price elasticities as a means 
to compare price sensitivity across different groups of products. 
 I would recommend that you gather these estimates for more than just a “one up, 
one down” scenario. This will reveal whether larger price change s—whether down 
or up—result in disproportionately higher or lower volumes, which in turn would 
show how price elasticity changes depending on the magnitude of the intended 
price change. 
 This approach works even better when you follow up your quantitative questions 
with two qualitative ones: Why? And what happens next? The “why?” question 
challenges the respondents to explain their estimates, particularly what happens to 
the demand if you cut prices and what happens if you raise them. The “what happens next?” question is another way of asking how your competitors will respond to 
your price change . Will they follow your move? If they match your price change, 
you will probably need to revise your estimates. Answering this second question is 
vitally important in competitive markets. 
 You might be wondering whether “expert judgment” is simply a euphemism for 
“guessing.” It is a legitimate question, especially in light of the David Ogilvy quote 
at the beginning of this chapter. The two questions “why?” and “what happens 
next?” help take this approach beyond the realm of pure guesswork. You will notice 
that numbers often undergo revisions as people start to think through the consequences. Managers start to fall back on their experience, their meetings with customers, or similar cases they have seen. A lot of evidence, albeit often anecdotal, 
bubbles to the surface once you start this kind of exercise. 
 The results become even more insightful and useful when you ask these questions not only about changes across multiple price points, but also ask a range of 
people in the organization. Pull together the most knowledgeable and experienced 
people in your organization—executives, fi eld sales , sales management, marketers, 
and product managers—and ask them. To mitigate the risk of group think or having 
one or two parties dominate the discussion, you can ask people to write down their 
answers individually before trying to establish a consensus. 
 The “what happens next?” question will lead you to play out scenarios with different competitive reaction s. It helps to use computer support to track the answers 
and to derive sales and profi t curves. 
 This expert-judgment approach is particularly useful for new products, because 
your “insiders” will be able to make better assessments than customers, who have 
yet to test the product. The “why?” will then prompt a discussion about the value of 
 Expert Judgment: Making Direct Estimates of Price Elasticities
108
the product to customers and offer some guidance on what value messages you will 
need to communicate and reinforce. 
 You can use this method very quickly and at little cost. It also probably marks the 
fi rst time that many of your team members have taken the demand curve s in their 
heads and expressed them in hard numbers. These are the biggest advantages of this 
method. The “con” side is that these experts are all internal. You haven’t asked any 
customers. Even the best experts can be off when they try to anticipate how customers will respond to price change s. 
 Asking Customers About Prices Directly 
 You can ask customers directly about how they will respond to price change s. More 
precisely, you can ask them how they will change their buying behavior. How you 
ask the question will depend on whether you have a “yes-no” situation, such as with 
consumer durables, or a “ variable quantity ” situation, in which the customers tell 
you whether they buy more or fewer units of a product. You can also ask at which 
point a price increase prompts a customer to switch to a competitor ’s product. This 
yields insights into the impact of relative price difference s. Another approach is 
even more direct. You simply ask the customer what his or her acceptable price or 
 maximum price is. There are very thorough, established sets of questions for this 
purpose, such as the Van Westendorp Price Sensitivity Meter . 
 The major advantage of these methods is simplicity. You can ask a large number 
of customers these questions quickly and generate a lot of data. The major disadvantage of these direct methods is that they make people unusually sensitive to price. 
When someone asks “in your face” questions about price, it makes the customer 
focus more on price at the expense of other product features and risks distorting the 
results. If a researcher asks a respondent whether he or she would buy a product at 
a higher price, will the respondent really give an honest answer? And what role does 
the prestige effect play in this answer? If you saw a price in a store in daily life and 
made a spontaneous decision, you may not be placing as much emphasis on price as 
you would if someone asked you directly about price in a survey. 
 These disadvantages cast doubt on the validity of these direct methods. I would 
not dismiss them entirely, though. Instead, my recommendation is that you do not 
rely solely on these direct methods as your input in determining a demand curve or 
setting your prices. You must complement this data with data from other methods. 
 Asking Customers About Price Indirectly 
 Indirect questions give you more valid and reliable insights into price sensitivity 
than direct questions do. “Indirect” means that you do not ask the customer about 
price in isolation, but rather about price and value at the same time. That makes 
price just one of several aspects of the customer’s answer. 4
4
 The most common method used for indirect questioning is called conjoint measurement . 
6 Prices and Decisions
109
 The respondents face many different options and needs to indicate which of the 
options they prefer, and in some cases to what degree they prefer that option over 
the others. The options present a mix of product characteristics such as product 
quality , brand , technical performance, and also price. Each option has some stronger and some weaker features, which means that the respondents need to make 
trade-offs. Do I pick Option A even though it is not my favorite brand? Do I pick 
Option B despite its higher price, because I think it offers great value? The data 
from all these answers allow us to quantify what people would pay for certain product confi gurations and translate that into actual estimates of sales volume s. It gives 
us all the necessary data to make a robust, reliable price decision. 
 The general term for this category of research methods is conjoint measurement . 
Its fi rst uses came in the 1970s. As you can imagine, it has undergone many transformative improvements as both knowledge and computing power increased. The 
advent of the personal computer was a watershed moment, because unlike a rigid 
paper questionnaire it allowed us to customize each survey to the individual respondent. The program which presents the options adapts to the customer’s previous 
answers in order to make each successive set of trade-offs tougher. This adaptive 
approach also lets us come closer to simulating a real shopping experience and thus 
obtain data with even more reliability. Today these methods effectively help managers determine their demand curve s and their profi t-maximizing price s. 
 Price Tests 
 Sophisticated survey methods do an excellent job of simulating real buying behavior. But they are still simulations. There is always a margin of error in any model 
based on survey data. People don’t always act as they say they will. This makes 
so-called fi eld experiment s appealing. A company changes the real prices at the 
shelf or online in a systematic way, and carefully tracks how customers respond to 
the price change s. The ability to collect real-life data is clearly the big advantage of 
this approach. In the past, though, conducting these experiments on a large scale 
was an arduous and expensive task, which meant that companies rarely used fi eld 
tests for price setting . Modern technologies such as scanner data and e-commerce 
make these tests faster, easier, and less expensive than ever before. I expect them to 
become a more important method for price setting in the coming years. 
 The Big Data Myth: Using Market Data for Demand 
Curves and Price Elasticities 
 Headlines in leading business publications will convince you that we fi nally live in 
the era of “Big Data.” I have immersed myself in the quantitative side of economics 
since college, so you might think that I welcome the dawn of this new and promising era. Instead, my reaction is more “déjà vu” than excitement. 
 The Big Data Myth: Using Market Data for Demand Curves and Price Elasticities
110
 Breakthroughs in econometrics in the 1970s and the rapid evolution and 
 personalization of computer power marked the fi rst burst of hope that “Big Data” 
will fundamentally change marketing and pricing. You could make precise estimates 
of demand curve s and price elasticities, because you could fi nally track variations in 
price, market share , and volume in your market, analyze the data quickly, and use it 
to your advantage. 
 This great hope ended in disappointment. 
 The disappointment had little to do with the availability of data, its depth and 
richness, and the ability to “crunch” them. Instead, it had to do with the fundamental 
relevance of that data. Here we distinguish between the fresh market data from 
“live” market tests as described above and historical data sets collected in the normal course of business, not as part of an experiment. 
 As far back as 1962, Lester G. Telser, a professor at the University of Chicago , 
predicted that past market data has very limited relevance for predicting future 
behavior. 5
 The reason is the amount of variation observed. In a market with a high 
 price elasticity , you will probably observe little change in the differences of competitors’ prices. Even without hard data, the competitors know that changes of the relative price position can cause signifi cant shifts in volume . So no one risks a big change 
in the relative price position. If one fi rm changes its price, the others are likely to 
follow so that the relative position hardly changes. From an econometrics perspective, one would say that the independent variable (price) stays within too tight a 
range to allow you to make valid estimates of what the demand curve looks like. 
 In a market with low price elasticity , you may indeed observe signifi cant variation in prices and price difference s, but they yield very slight shifts in volume . Here 
the econometrics expert would say that the dependent variable ( unit sales ) moves in 
too narrow a range to permit valid estimates of what the underlying price elasticity 
truly is. 
 Simon-Kucher & Partners likewise had high hopes in this earlier “Big Data” 
wave and learned its lesson the hard way. When we started the fi rm in 1985, we 
planned to apply econometric methods to historical market data to help improve 
decision making about prices. Co-founder Eckhard Kucher devoted his doctoral 
dissertation to this realm. Since that time the fi rm has conducted over 5,000 pricing 
projects throughout the world in all major industries, and I would estimate that in no 
more than 100 of these projects we applied econometrics as the key method. 
Professor Telser was right. 
 I would supplement his observations with one of my own. I have noticed that 
companies pay less attention to pricing when times are good and markets seem very 
stable. It takes a major structural change in the market—the entry of a new competitor , the exit of a competitor, or the emergence of a new technology or new distribution channel s—to force them to pay more attention to pricing, commission more 
analyses, or bring in a consultant. This happens when pharmaceutical patents expire 
and generics enter the market, when physical products become accessible in digital 
5
 Telser LG (1962) The Demand for Branded Goods as Estimated from Consumer Panel Data. The 
Review of Economic Statistics No. 3, pp. 300–324. 
6 Prices and Decisions
111
form, or when companies aggressively enter new distribution channels such as the 
Internet. When such a structural change occurs, historical market data offer no valid 
insights into current or future customer behavior. A corollary of that observation 
applies to prices for new products, which also often represent a “structural break.” 
If you are setting the price for a new product, such as an Apple iPhone historical 
data is of limited use at best, and in some cases offers no insights whatsoever. 
 What I have found over the years is that a combination of the methods I have 
described above produces the most reliable results. No one method, on its own, has 
so many compelling advantages that I would recommend you use it exclusively. 
Having one method cross-check the other gives you a range you can use to narrow 
down your options. When all methods show similar patterns and results, you can be 
fairly certain that you have correctly estimated how customers will respond to different prices, and thus have greater confi dence that the price you ultimately set is 
optimal. 
 So … What About the Competitors’ Prices? 
 In most of the previous examples, I have kept things simple in order to get my basic 
points across. This required leaving out the whole topic of how competitors will 
respond to your price moves. In the context of a price decision, two complications 
arise when we include competitive reaction : the quantitative effect that competitors’ 
 price change s have on a company’s own sales , and the qualitative challenge of trying to determine exactly how a competitor will respond. The former is relatively 
simple to explain and address, and the latter more diffi cult. 
 Let’s begin with the effect that competitors’ prices have on the company’s own 
 sales . It is obvious that competitors’ prices infl uence customers’ decisions. We can 
measure that infl uence by looking at the cross-price elasticity . The cross- price elasticity is the percentage change of our volume divided by the percentage change in 
the competitor ’s price. Let’s assume that a competitor cuts price by 10 % and our 
sales fall by 6 % as a result. This gives us a cross-price elasticity of 6/10 = 0.6. In 
contrast to the price elasticity of our own products, the cross-price elasticity is positive because our sales usually move in the same direction as a competitors’ price 
change ; that is, if they raise their price, your own sales should rise and vice versa. 
The absolute value of the cross-price elasticity tends to be lower than the price elasticity. The less differentiated the products are, the closer these two elasticities will 
be to each other. 
 It is evident that we need to incorporate competitors’ prices into our demand 
curve s. We can do this in a number of ways. Instead of using our own price as the 
independent variable, we can replace that with the difference between our price and 
our competitor ’s. We can also use the relative price , which would be our price 
divided by our competitor’s price, as the independent variable. Finally, we can 
include our competitor’s price as an additional variable in our demand curve. We 
can likewise use any of the methods described above to quantify the effects of 
changes in our competitors’ prices on our sales volume . 
 So … What About the Competitors’ Prices?
112
 The Prisoner’s Dilemma: Let the Game Begin 
 Whenever you make a price decision, you need to ask yourself whether and to what 
degree your competitors will respond. This kind of interdependence—knowing 
their decisions will affect yours and vice versa—is characteristic of a market with 
only a small number of sellers, which economists call an oligopoly . Price changes 
by any competitor will have a noticeable effect on the sales of other competitors, 
who need to decide whether to react or accept the consequences without reacting. 
 If the competitors do respond, it creates a counter-effect on other competitors’ 
volumes. It also risks starting the kind of chain reaction that leads us into the realm 
of game theory , established in 1928 by the mathematician John von Neumann, who 
also invented the computer. 6
 Including competitive reaction s in your decision making complicates your price decisions. The most common situation in pricing is the 
prisoner’s dilemma, a specifi c situation in which you need to anticipate what another 
party might do, because your own fate depends on their decisions. 
 Let’s assume that we want to make a signifi cant price cut. If our competitors do 
not respond and instead leave their prices unchanged, we can expect an increase in 
 volume . If our competitors follow suit, however, then our volume will probably 
change very little, certainly much less than if the competitor had left prices constant. 
Our price cut brought us no advantage, and even worse, saddled us with two fi nancial problems: It cut our margins, and in the worst-case scenario, it may have gutted 
our overall profi t. You might say we have spent a large amount of money (namely, 
our profi t) in a high-profi le, heavily marketed move for which we received nothing 
in return. 
 A price increase on our part creates a similar situation. If competitors do not 
respond, we may have a price disadvantage which causes our volume and our market 
share to fall. It is not unusual for the initiator of a price increase to rescind it if competitors do not follow. That happened recently to a major brewery after it raised prices 
for its premium product s, and then withdrew the increase when competitors did not 
follow. If competitors do follow the price increase, the new higher prices may lead to 
only minor reductions in total volume, but all competitors realize higher profi ts. 
 If you want to take a more structured approach to anticipating competitive reaction and observing its potential effects, I would recommend either the expertjudgment approach or the indirect questioning approach ( conjoint measurement ) 
described earlier in this chapter. In the spirit of my earlier comment, it is wiser to rely 
on more than one method because, as discussed, all of them have their pros and cons. 
 This is especially true if you are in an oligopolistic market , where understanding 
and anticipating competitive reaction patterns is absolutely essential. Many modern 
markets are oligopolistic in nature so that understanding and anticipating competitive reactions is one of management’s most important challenges. It also begs the 
question, from a standpoint of game theory , whether you can either infl uence 
another party’s course of action or fi nd clues ex ante which may reveal it. This next 
section brings up topics such as price leadership and signaling , which can raise 
6
 von Neumann J (1928). Zur Theorie der Gesellschaftsspiele. Mathematische Annalen. 
6 Prices and Decisions
113
concerns with your legal counsel. Please always discuss any application of these 
approaches with your legal department or advisors to make sure that your company’s policies comply with the law. 
 Price Leadership 
 The easiest way to understand and anticipate your competitors’ reactions would be 
to ask them outright. But of course I am not recommending that. Price fi xing and 
cartels are illegal. In the USA they are even criminal offences which carry stiff 
prison sentences. 
 A widely used method in the “game” of price setting is the concept of price leadership . Companies in the US car market practiced price leadership for decades, with 
 General Motors in the driver’s seat. Other competitors accepted GM’s role as market and price leader in the days when its share stood at around 50 %. GM increased 
prices on an annual basis. 
 In Germany’s retail market, Aldi serves as a price leader for key products. Many 
competitors will follow Aldi when it changes prices. One newspaper article 
acknowledges this leadership role exemplarily: “Aldi is raising prices for milk. It is 
expected that the entire retail sector will follow.” 7
 Another recent case of publicly 
acknowledged price leadership came up in the US beer market. Aggregating the 
shares of individual brands, the market-leading group is Anheuser Busch InBev 
(AB InBev), followed by MillerCoors . The American antitrust authorities determined that “AB InBev typically initiates annual price increase s with the expectation 
that MillerCoors’ prices will follow. And they frequently do.” 8
 The Wall Street 
Journal made a similar comment: “AB InBev has been steadily raising beer prices. 
And Miller Coors typically follows AB InBev’s lead.” 9
 Price leadership can break 
down when new competitors enter a market and do not follow the leader. That is 
how the Mexican beer group Modelo behaved in the US market: “Modelo prices 
have not followed AB InBev’s price increases.” 10 Modelo eventually became part of 
AB InBev in 2013. 11
 Signaling 
 Changing prices is always risky. Will competitors undermine your price increase s 
in an effort to grab market share at your expense? Or will they slash their prices—
unilaterally or in response to our changes—and risk igniting a price war ? These 
questions contain a high degree of uncertainty. The risk of making a mistake is 
signifi cant, and getting these answers wrong can cut your profi ts. You can also 
7
 Aldi erhöht die Milchpreise. Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, November 3, 2012, p. 14. 
8
 Bloomberg online, January 31, 2013. 
9
 The Wall Street Journal Europe, February 1, 2013, p. 32. 
10 Bloomberg online, January 31, 2013. 
11 Grupo Modelo website www.gmodelo.com . 
 Signaling
114
damage your reputation if you need to withdraw a price increase because the competitors do not follow. 
 One method to reduce that uncertainty is signaling . Well before taking its planned 
price move, a company sends “signals” to the marketplace. Then the company listens whether customers, competitors, investors, or regulators send signals back. You 
cannot rule out the possibility that a competitor bluffs, but competitors must also be 
careful if they communicate something and then backtrack or fail to follow through. 
In signaling, the credibility of the competitor is always at stake. 
 Signaling is not illegal per se. As long as companies keep their communication 
relevant to everyone in the marketplace, including customers and investors, and do 
not go overboard, they are usually on the safe side. The signaling must not have 
anything which implies or aims at an agreement or a contract, such as “if competitor 
X raises its prices, we will follow.” 
 A price war plagued the German market for car insurance for years. In October 
2011, the business press reported that “Germany’s largest insurance group, Allianz , 
is going to raise prices drastically, effective January 1, 2012.” 12 All other insurance 
companies publicly announced that they would raise their prices as well. In the 
course of 2012, prices rose by 7 % on average. 
 “In 2013, prices should rise again,” said the chairman of HUK-Coburg , Allianz ’s 
biggest rival. The comment was prescient, as prices did indeed rise that year. 13
These developments showed a clear break from the downward price spiral of the 
previous years. 
 Companies also use signaling to announce a retaliation, in an effort to discourage 
their competitors from taking a course of action such as a price cut. Im Tak-Uk, the 
chief operating offi cer of Korean car manufacturer Hyundai , once claimed publicly 
that “… if Japanese car makers become aggressive in raising incentives and the red 
light comes on in achieving our sales target, we will consider raising incentives for 
buyers.” 14 Incentives in this case mean price cuts in the form of discounts and promotions. The statement could not be any clearer: Japanese companies knew how 
Hyundai would respond if they raised their incentives. 
 Competitive Reaction and Price Decisions 
 How companies in a market anticipate and account for competitive reaction s can 
have a massive infl uence on prices, and thus on the resulting profi ts companies earn. 
Failure to take these reactions into account—or making incorrect assumptions about 
them—can have dire consequences. 
 To understand this complex topic better and draw out some useful insights, let’s 
start with the basic equation below. The market in question has two competitors, 
12 Financial Times Deutschland. October 26, 2011, p. 1. 
13 MCC-Kongress, Kfz-Versicherung 2013, March 20, 2013. 
14 Hyundai Seeks Solution on the High End. The Wall Street Journal Europe, February 19, 2013, 
p. 24. 
6 Prices and Decisions
115
A and B, both equally strong and both with demand curve s ( price-response 
 function s) that look like this:
Own volume own price competitor s price = ´ 1 000 50 25 , - ( ) + ´( ) 
This is what economists would call a symmetrical oligopoly . One company’s own 
price has twice the effect on volume as the competitor ’s price does. This means that 
A’s own optimal price depends not only on B’s price, but also on how B responds to 
A’s price change s. Let’s also assume that variable unit costs are $5 and each company’s fi xed costs are $5,000. 
 In the current situation, as shown in the second column of Fig. 6.3 , the price 
stands at $20 and each company makes $2,500 in profi t. Is it possible to increase 
that profi t? That depends on how A and B behave as well as the assumptions they 
make about each other. There are two classical hypotheses for the potential competitive reaction s: the Chamberlin Hypothesis and the Cournot Hypothesis.
Chamberlin Hypothesis : Under this hypothesis, A and B both assume that the other 
will follow price changes in full, and when one makes a price change , the other 
actually does follow. The third column in Fig. 6.3 shows what happens if one company raises its price to $22.50 and the other one follows: profi t rises by 6 % to 
$2,650. Competitors A and B both behaved as if they were monopolists, despite the 
fact that their optimal price depends on the other’s actions. This is the kind of result 
one would expect in a market characterized by price leadership . George Stigler, 
who won the Nobel Prize in economics in 1982, claims that price leadership is the 
best solution for companies in a highly competitive oligopoly . 
Cournot Hypothesis: Under this hypothesis, A and B both assume that the other will 
not respond to any price change s. That assumption, however, typically turns out to 
be false. In reality, A and B almost always respond in a way that optimizes their own 
respective prices. In that case, the price drops to $16.67 and profi t falls by 27.9 % to 
$1,803. 
 In my days as a professor, I often asked two groups to compete against each other 
using these same numbers. After each round, a group would receive two outcomes: 
 Fig. 6.3 The effects of different competitive reaction s 
 Competitive Reaction and Price Decisions
116
its own sales results, and the price that its competitor charged. Which of the two 
results do you think came about more often? 
 It turned out that the Chamberlin solution occurred very rarely. The Cournot 
solution was far more common. Granted, one must be careful in projecting the 
results of such experiments to day-to-day business reality. But my experience tells 
me that real-life competition follows the same pattern. The Cournot solution or 
something similar happens much more frequently than the clearly more advantageous Chamberlin constellation. 
 This case shows in no uncertain terms that a company must be able to anticipate 
its competitors’ countermeasures correctly. And that applies in both directions. Will 
competitors follow if you raise prices? Only then price increase s make sense and 
bring the expected advantages. And how will competitors respond to a price cut? If 
you expect them to follow, it is often better to scrap your plans. The result is a 
decline in profi t, often combined with only a negligible increase in volume . When 
you expect these asymmetrical reactions (competitors do not follow price increases, 
but do match price cuts), it seems wise to leave prices where they are. This conclusion helps explain why one often sees very rigid price structure s in oligopolies, the 
business version of a staring contest as each waits for the other to blink. 
 If your company is part of an oligopoly , please keep these three points in mind:
– No clear optimal price exists : Instead, the optimal price emerges from the 
assumptions you make about competitors, the information you have at hand 
about them, and the actual behavior of the competitors. 
– Chamberlin outcomes are possible if certain conditions apply: The competitors can achieve a Chamberlin price—essentially a monopoly price for the 
market—or at least get close to it, provided that they have similar cost structures and market positions and also have similar goals, and can back that up 
with a certain level of trust and strategic intelligence. The likelihood is higher 
when all competitors are smart enough to understand the interactions and 
behave accordingly. 
– It is wise to leave prices as they are if those conditions do not exist: If those conditions mentioned above do not exist or one or more competitors face circumstances which make their behavior uncertain, it is wise to leave your prices as 
they are. Price cuts under such circumstances bring no sustainable advantage and 
will instead risk provoking a price war . The one exception is in the case of input 
cost increases, because they would probably affect all competitors to a similar 
degree. 
 So far in this chapter, we have looked at cost changes as one-off events. As a 
general rule of thumb, a company should not pass along cost increases in full, but 
rather share that burden with customers. But what happens when cost changes happen with greater frequency or over longer periods? A particularly challenging situation for price adjustments is the occurrence of infl ation . 
6 Prices and Decisions
117
 Inflation: What It Is and Why It Matters for Price Decisions 
 My grandfather used to tell me stories about life during the hyperinfl ation period in 
Germany in the 1920s. The moment he would get some money, he would immediately rush off to the store and buy something. If he had waited for a few days—in 
some cases even a few hours—the value of his money, and with it his purchasing 
power , would have dropped precipitously. 
 Hyperinfl ation is an extreme situation which still occurs today in emerging markets . But most of us know “ infl ation ” in less severe forms. We generally associate 
the term “infl ation” with a continual rise in prices. But what are the effects of infl ation? And how should you take infl ation—both actual and anticipated—into account 
when you set your prices? 
 Infl ation harms people who hold onto money and people who receive nominal, 
fi xed payments. At the same time, infl ation benefi ts people who owe money. 15 You 
could describe it as a form of redistribution from savers and creditors to debtors. 
These general effects are well known, but infl ation also has deeper and more farreaching effects. 
 The main cause of infl ation is the increase of money supply . The winners in that 
scenario are people who can get their hands on newly issued money quickly. They 
can still buy goods and services at relatively low prices. The later you gain access 
to money, the more you lose, because you need to buy at higher prices. This is 
known as the “ Cantillon effect ,” named after the Irish economic theorist Richard 
Cantillon (1680–1734). 16
 Infl ation also suppresses an important function of prices, namely their ability to 
signal the scarcity of goods. For consumers, price perception s become distorted and 
confusing. It is hard to decide whether to hedge or hoard. For investors, infl ation 
makes it much harder to recognize whether the prices they see refl ect a real scarcity 
or a devaluation of the currency. This plundering money chases after certain forms 
of investment, causing prices to explode even though no underlying scarcity exists. 
This “bubble” effect has occurred time and again, from the Dutch tulip craze of the 
1600s to the Internet bubble at the end of the 20th century and the US real estate 
bubble in the fi rst decade of this century. At some point the bubble bursts, prices 
collapse, and it takes a long time before prices begin to refl ect true scarcity again. 
 Infl ation is also a gigantic redistribution mechanism. Infl ation allows the quick, 
the clever, and the debtors to take advantage of the slow, the naïve, and the creditors. 
It goes without saying that sovereign government s, which issue and hold large 
amounts of debt, are among the biggest benefi ciaries of infl ation . When infl ation 
threatens, you need to strike quickly. That is the time to buy or borrow. The longer 
you wait, the more you will pay, allowing benefi ts to accrue to those who “bought 
15 Polleit T (2011), Der Fluch des Papiergeldes . Finanzbuch-Verlag, München, 2011, pp. 17–20. 
16 Cantillon R (2010) Essai sur la nature du commerce general; 1755, in English: An Essai on 
Economic Theory. Ludwig von Mises-Institute, Auburn (Alabama). 
 Infl ation: What It Is and Why It Matters for Price Decisions
118
low” and can now “sell high.” This is common sense. The art lies in seeing through 
the mass psychology at work and not interpreting the rising prices as a signal of 
 scarcity . 
 The most common way to express infl ation is the change in consumer prices , as 
measured by the consumer price index (CPI) . Figure 6.4 shows the change in the 
CPI in the USA from 1991 through the end of 2013, a period of 22 years. I have set 
the index at 100 for the year 1991, to make it easier to see the percentage changes.
 The upper curve shows the rise in price level s. At the end of 2013, the CPI was 
71.2 % higher than in 1991, which corresponds to an average annual infl ation rate 
of 2.47 %. If you have not increased prices in line with this curve, the real value of 
what you received in exchange for your goods and services has declined. You are 
among infl ation’s victims. What you paid $100 for in 1991 would cost you $171.2 
at the end of 2013 refl ecting your loss in purchasing power . 
 The lower curve is the fl ipside of the upper curve. It shows the loss of purchasing 
power since 1991. In these 22 years the purchasing power of the US dollar has 
declined by 41.6 %. If we go all the way back to 1971 the decline is much greater; 
the purchasing power of the dollar declined by 82.6 %. 
 Why did I pick 1971, which seems like an arbitrary year? That is the year the gold 
standard under the Bretton Woods system was abandoned by President Nixon, a 
move which opened the door to continuing infl ation . You will hear politicians refer 
to an annualized infl ation rate of around 2 % as “modest.” Most conservative central 
bankers consider 2 % per year or a little more to be within an acceptable range. 
 Fig. 6.4 Changes in the CPI of the USA, indexed, 1991 through 2012 (1991 = 100) 
103.0 106.1 108.8 111.9 115.3 117.9 119.8 122.4
126.6
130.1 132.2 135.3
138.9
143.6
148.2
152.4
158.2 157.5 160.1
165.2 168.6 171.2
97.1 94.3 91.9 89.4 86.8 84.8 83.5 81.7 79.0 76.8 75.6 73.9 72.0 69.6 67.5 65.6 63.2 63.5 62.5 60.5 59.3 58.4 50
75
100
125
150
175
1991 1992 1993 1994 1995 1996 1997 1998 1999 2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011 2012 2013
Index
Year
Consumer prices
Loss of
purchasing power
6 Prices and Decisions
119
The cumulative effect, however, is enormous and destructive for infl ation’s victims, 
who get dispossessed as their nominal dollars buy them less and less. The dollar has 
lost more than 40 % of its value in just over two decades and over 80 % of its value 
in the last four decades, despite this “low” level of infl ation. 
 Relative to the price of gold the loss is even higher. On September 1, 2015 the 
price of one ounce of gold was $1,142. That’s what you would have had to pay to 
get one ounce of the precious metal. Before August 15, 1971, the same amount of 
dollars would have bought you 37.1 ounces of gold. Thus, the loss of the dollar’s 
value in gold terms since 1971 is 96.9 %. 
 I interpret the lack of discussion and attention on this topic as tacit acceptance of 
it, or perhaps resignation to it. Most people take this development for granted. The 
only effective way to stop it is to reestablish the gold standard . Such a move would 
remove some very powerful tools from politicians’ toolboxes, though, which is why 
it is unlikely to happen. Unstable money which loses its value—whether slowly or 
quickly—will remain a fact of life in modern economies. 
 The high levels of government debt, combined with the relatively loose monetary policies since the Great Recession began, mean that a sharp increase in the 
 infl ation rate is unavoidable in the future. The only question is when it will come. 
Many companies will face do-or-die decisions when that happens. How they manage their prices will make a critical difference. In emerging markets we frequently 
see increasing rates of infl ation. 17 Maybe we can learn something from the history 
of Brazil, a country that had very high infl ation rates over several decades. 
 Price and Inflation: A Lesson from Brazil 
 In the 1980s, one of the world’s largest pharmaceutical companies needed to make 
a high-stakes decision in Brazil, where out-of-control infl ation reached a rate of 
several hundred percent per year. Their biggest product was an over-the-counter 
pain reliever. The company saw hyperinfl ation as an opportunity to increase market 
share through a combination of lower relative price s and more aggressive advertising . And that is exactly what they implemented. They intentionally raised prices 
below the rate of infl ation, to make their product cheaper relative to the competition. 
They also increased their spending on advertising. 
 Management’s confi dence in these moves—and their odds of success—seemed 
to increase when the competitors continued to raise their prices at the rate of infl ation or above. This widened the price gap in the favor of our client even more than 
they originally anticipated. 
 It turned out that this strategy was counterproductive. Why didn’t it work? What 
happens to price perception during periods of infl ation ? Signals become confusing 
due to the constant fl ux of price change s. In Brazil at that time, the consumers did 
not recognize the price advantage that the pharma company had worked so hard to 
establish. It got lost in the noise, as did the increased advertising . 
17 Infl ation Worries Mount. The Wall Street Journal , February 12, 2014. 
 Price and Infl ation: A Lesson from Brazil
120
 Simon-Kucher & Partners recommended that the company not only pull back 
from its current tactics, but implement the exact opposite approach. They should 
raise prices at least at the level of infl ation (or even a bit more) and cut back on 
 advertising . Profi ts improved considerably with these new tactics, and market share 
barely changed as customers remained loyal to the brand . 
 I learned two lessons from this case. First, an attempt to establish a price advantage will not work unless customers notice and understand it. Price signals are 
harder to convey clearly in a period of high infl ation . Second, under infl ationary 
conditions I strongly recommend a series of small, regular price increase s instead of 
fewer signifi cant changes. The series of small changes allows you to keep pace and 
to avoid the need to overcompensate for lost time and money with a big price adjustment later. You should start these increases and establish the rhythm as early as 
possible when infl ation looms. 
 In the last two chapters, we have looked at the fundamental economics of prices. 
Taking advantage of these principles is part “science” and part “art,” and in the next 
chapter we will explore price differentiation , the high art of pricing. 
6 Prices and Decisions
© Springer International Publishing Switzerland 2015 121
H. Simon, Confessions of the Pricing Man, DOI 10.1007/978-3-319-20400-0_7
 7 Price Differentiation: The High Art 
 So far we have asked ourselves where the profi t-maximizing price lies, meaning 
exactly one optimal price . 1
 When we charge only one uniform price for a product, 
the left side of Fig. 7.1 shows what our profi t situation looks like, with the numbers 
of our power tool business. Leaving fi xed costs aside for simplicity’s sake, the dark 
rectangle corresponds to our profi t.
 We can see from these comparative graphs that one uniform price —even when 
set optimally—exhausts only part of the available profi t potential in the market. The 
right side of Fig. 7.1 shows the entire profi t potential. It corresponds to the whole 
area bounded by the triangle A-B-C. It is much larger than the area on the left 
defi ned by the dark rectangle, which lies within the triangle A-B-C. 
 If we have a linear demand curve and a linear cost function , the area covered by 
the dark triangle on the right is exactly twice the size of the area covered by the dark 
rectangle on the left. If we have a nonlinear demand curve, the difference between 
the entire profi t potential and the profi t from a uniform price can be more or less than 
double. This depends on the distribution of consumers’ willingness to pay , but still 
results in something close to double the profi ts. This realization—that a uniform 
price taps only about half of the profi t potential—is dramatic. It says that even if a 
company succeeds in setting an optimal uniform price, it still leaves a large portion 
of its potential profi ts on the table. How can that be? The explanation is simple. 
 As we can see from the negatively sloped demand curve in Fig. 7.1 , there are 
customers who are willing to pay more than the optimal uniform price of $105. 
Some would pay $115, and others would even be willing to pay $125. Until the 
price hits $150, there will be some customers who buy. Yet with a uniform price, we 
are asking all of these customers to pay only $105, even though they would be willing to pay more. They probably appreciate the bargain and gladly put the so-called 
 consumer surplus , the difference of what they are willing to pay and what they have 
to pay, in their pockets. The shaded triangle at the lower right of the left fi gure 
1
 A profi t curve can also have two maxima. This can happen with the so-called double-kinked 
 demand curve defi ned by Gutenberg. 
122
shows the profi t that we are sacrifi cing from those customers who have a higher 
 willingness to pay . 
 There is another group of potential buyer s whose willingness to pay is below the 
 optimal price of $105, but above our variable unit costs of $60. Those customers 
might be willing to pay $95, $85, or $75, but not $105. If we maintain our uniform 
price at the optimum of $105, these customers will not buy our power tool. Yet if we 
were able to offer these customers the product at $95, $85, or $75, they would buy 
and we would earn a positive unit contribution of $35, $25, or $15. That passed-up 
profi t lies in the shaded triangle at the upper right on the left-hand side of Fig. 7.1 . 
 Going from the Profit Rectangle to the Profit Triangle 
 The critical question is the following: How do we tap into the two areas of profi t 
potential which elude us when we charge a uniform price ? This is one of the most 
interesting, diffi cult, and potentially lucrative questions in pricing. How do we get 
from the profi t rectangle on the left side of Fig. 7.1 to the profi t triangle on the right 
side? I need to make one important remark before we answer that question: under 
normal circumstances it is impossible to completely exhaust the potential in the 
right triangle. That would work only if we managed to get every potential customer 
to pay his or her individual maximum price . This in turn would require that we are 
able to discern those maximum prices for each customer, and then segregate the 
customers to ensure that no buyer pays less than his or her maximum price. 
 There are situations in which sellers try to do exactly that. A trader at an Oriental 
bazaar asks a potential buyer all kinds of questions, in order to tease out his or her 
maximum willingness to pay and then ask for a price which exploits it. The questions can be rather innocuous, such as what kind of car they drive or what and where 
they studied. The objective of the trader at the bazaar is to obtain the maximum 
 Fig. 7.1 Profi t at a uniform price and profi t potential from price differentiation 
7 Price Differentiation: The High Art
123
price from every buyer. These efforts can fail, of course, for a number of reasons, 
such as a bluff by a buyer or the exchange of information among buyers. If one 
buyer tells another how low the price was for a certain item, the revelation sets a 
 price anchor that the bazaar trader will be hard-pressed to overcome. 
 Another method for tapping individual willingness to pay is auctions. The auction 
mechanism of eBay is set up so that every bidder submits his or her maximum price , 
but without the other bidders seeing it. If the bidder wins, he or she pays only the price 
of the next highest bidder plus a slight differential. This method is known as a Vickrey 
auction in which it is optimal for the bidder to reveal his or her maximum price. 2
 In order to get our profi ts closer to what the profi t triangle promises, we need to 
charge different prices for the same product or for slightly different variants. The 
phrase “from profi t rectangle to profi t triangle” makes one point very clear: the profi t 
increase that we can realize from differentiated prices is greater than the profi t 
increases we can get from fi ne-tuning our way to an optimal uniform price . Comparing 
the rectangle to the triangle lets us easily visualize and understand this point. 
 What Does a Can of Coca-Cola Cost? 
 This harmless question defi es a simple answer. It depends entirely on where you 
buy that can. Figure 7.2 shows the price of a 12-ounce can of Coca-Cola at different 
points of sale.
2
 Fehr B (1961) Zweitpreis-Auktionen – Von Goethe erdacht, von Ebay genutzt. Frankfurter 
Allgemeine Zeitung, December 22, 2007, p. 22; Vickrey W, Counterspeculation, Auctions and 
Competitive Sealed Tenders, Journal of Finance, 1961, pp. 8–37. 
 Fig. 7.2 Prices of a 12-ounce can of Coca-Cola 
 What Does a Can of Coca-Cola Cost?
124
 The price difference s are enormous. We’re not talking about differences of 5 or 
10 %, but rather 400 %. The highest price is fi ve times the lowest price. Maybe you 
were familiar with such price differences, but you probably weren’t aware of how 
large they are. 
 It doesn’t take much to fi gure out why these differences are so huge. The minibar 
at the hotel is a monopolist. Someone rushing to catch a train has no time for price 
comparison s or going out of their way, so the newsstand at the train station is their 
only alternative. The same applies to airports, although there one usually fi nds a 
20-ounce bottle for as much as $3.00 per bottle. Everything at airports is more 
expensive anyway. The supermarket and the mall kiosks, in contrast, usually face 
heavy price competition . 
 Price differentiation is a sensitive area. In Japan, Coca-Cola had the idea of differentiating its prices according to the temperature. 3
 When it is hot outside, drinking 
a cola provides greater utility. It seemed logical to charge more. From a technical 
standpoint, implementation was easy. One needed only to outfi t the vending 
machines with a thermometer and program the machine to adjust prices accordingly. However, the plan became public and led to protests. Consumers felt that this 
kind of differentiation was unfair, and Coca-Cola tabled the plans. In Spain, the 
marketing agency Momentum tried the same idea in reverse. The price of a cola 
would drop as the temperature rose. 4
 Can that be optimal? Yes, it can. Assume that 
with cold weather consumers buy just one can and are willing to pay $2.50. Even if 
the price was lowered they wouldn’t consume more. The optimal price is then $2.50 
and with 1,000 consumers Coca-Cola would earn a revenue of $2,500. Assuming 
unit costs of 50 cents and neglecting fi xed costs a profi t of $2,000 would result. Now 
let’s assume that with hot weather people are willing to pay $3 for the fi rst can, $2 
for the second, and $1.40 for the third. What is then the optimal price? Coca-Cola 
could charge $3 per can and sell 1,000 cans. This would yield a revenue of $3,000 
and a profi t of $2,500—better than the cold weather profi t. But is $3 the optimal 
price? No! If they charge $2 per can 2,000 cans will be bought yielding a revenue of 
$4,000 and a profi t of $3,000. At the even lower price of $1.40 they would even sell 
3,000 cans, and get $4,200 in revenue, but profi t would decrease to $2,700—less 
than at the price of $2 which is the optimum in this case. At fi rst thought it’s counterintuitive, but it can indeed be optimal to charge a lower price in hot than in cold 
weather. This case shows how important it is to deeply understand consumers’ willingness to pay under specifi c circumstances. 
 Here is another case of a weather-based form of price differentiation , employed 
by an aerial tramway in Germany. During good weather and good visibility, a ride 
costs 20 Euros; amid bad weather and worse visibility, the trip is 17 Euros because 
the ride is not as enjoyable, but the company still wants to draw customers. Lufthansa 
also has a weather-dependent offer for certain destinations and times, under the 
3
 Hays C. Variable price coke machine being tested. New York Times , October 28, 1999. 
4
 Morozov E. Ihr wollt immer nur Effi zienz und merkt nicht, dass dadurch die Gesellschaft kaputtgeht. Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, April 10, 2013, p. 27. 
7 Price Differentiation: The High Art
125
name “Sunshine Insurance.” For every day that it rains at the given vacation 
 destination, Lufthansa will refund 25 Euros, up to a limit of 200 Euros. 
 Extreme price differentiation is by no means an exception. The least expensive 
economy ticket for Lufthansa fl ight LH 400 from Frankfurt to New York on April 1, 
2013, was $734, but for a fi rst-class ticket one would have to pay $8,950. 5
 That is a 
difference of 1,218 %. Granted, traveling in economy and fi rst class is not the same 
experience, but the passengers still sit in the same airplane and arrive at the same 
destination at the same time. The basic service—air transport—is the same for all 
passengers. Up until 1907, Germany’s rail service had four classes, and the price 
gap at the time was around 1,000 %, similar to air travel today. 
 As with Coca-Cola, the prices for millions of products differ by distribution 
 channel . Massive amounts of fast-moving consumer goods and fashion items are 
sold on promotion, sometimes as much as 75 % off the regular prices. Hotels differentiate prices based on demand, and during conventions they often charge a multiple of the standard prices. In air transportation, some executives have the notion 
that every single seat should be sold at a different price. Electricity and telephone 
rates vary by time of day or day of the week. Restaurants offer lunch deals at lower 
prices; the same meals will cost much more on the evening dinner menu. Lower 
prices for advance purchase s or early booking s are common. Rental car prices will 
depend not only on capacity utilization but on a thousand other factors. If you travel 
within the USA and can show your AAA or AARP card, you can get discounts from 
hotels, travel agencies, and even at outlet shopping malls. Cinemas and theaters 
offer lower prices for seniors and students. You can get a volume discount on almost 
anything you can buy in bulk. Look internationally and you can also see crass differences in prices for the same product. In short: price differentiation is a ubiquitous 
phenomenon in modern economies. Sellers who don’t differentiate their prices run 
the risk of sacrifi cing a large amount of profi t. 
 The Difference Two Prices Can Make 
 So the only motto can be: differentiate your prices! What happens in the example 
from Fig. 7.1 when we charge two different prices instead of one uniform price ? Let 
us assume that we have a “yes-no” purchase decision; that is, each potential buyer 
wants only one unit. Then the demand curve results from aggregating the individual 
 maximum price s. Using the data from Fig. 6.2 we know that at a price of $120 we 
would sell 600,000 units of the power tool and at a second price of $90 we would 
sell an additional 600,000 units. Figure 7.3 compares the results for the uniform 
price of $105 and the price differentiation with prices of $120 and $90. We assume 
that the buyers can be separated according to their willingness to pay .
 We can increase our profi ts dramatically by charging two prices ($120 and $90) 
instead of the uniform price of $105. If we can fi nd a way to sort the potential buyer s 
5
 Prices requested on www.lufthansa.com on March 15, 2013; the lowest economy-class price is for 
a restricted, round-trip ticket; the highest fi rst-class price was for a fl exible, one-way fare. 
 The Difference Two Prices Can Make
126
according to their maximum price s (= their willingness to pay ), then everyone 
whose maximum price is at $120 or more will pay $120. The price of $90 will 
attract all potential buyers whose maximum prices lie between $90 and just under 
$120. With two prices, our profi t in this example jumps to $24.0 million vs. $10.5 
million at a uniform price, a huge difference of 129 %. 
 Are there risks in doing this? Yes! If the potential buyer s with a willingness to 
pay $120 or more fi nd a way to get the product at $90, our profi ts will look a lot 
worse than if we had a uniform price of $105. In the extreme case that all such buyers make their purchase at $90, we will sell 1,200,000 units, but our unit contribution drops to $30. That leaves us with a contribution of $36 million and a net profi t 
of $6 million after subtracting fi xed costs . That is 43 % less than what we would 
earn with the uniform price of $105, a disastrous profi t decline. Price differentiation 
only makes sense when one succeeds in erecting a “fence” between the potential 
buyers with a higher and those with a lower willingness to pay. Without an effective 
fence, price differentiation is a dangerous endeavor. We will deal with the critical 
aspect of fencing later in this chapter. 
 Why the First Beer Should Be More Expensive 
 Price differentiation presents a different challenge when the consumer can buy more 
or less of the same product depending on its price. This is the “ variable quantity ” 
case. Let’s imagine that a thirsty hiker shows up at a remote inn. According to the 
law of diminishing marginal utility , the fi rst beer that this hiker drinks has a greater 
utility for him than the second, which in turn has a greater utility than the third one. 
The hiker may therefore be willing to pay $5 for the fi rst beer, $4 for the second, $3 
for the third, $2.50 for the fourth, and $2 for the fi fth one. More beers than that bring 
the hiker no additional utility. He will not consume more than fi ve glasses, even if 
the sixth were offered for free. 
 Fig. 7.3 The effects of price differentiation with two prices 
7 Price Differentiation: The High Art
127
 What is the profi t-maximizing price structure for the innkeeper? The answer is 
simple: $5 for the fi rst beer, $4 for the second, $3 for the third, $2.50 for fourth, and 
$2 for the fi fth and fi nal one. This kind of price structure is called “nonlinear”; each 
individual unit has its own price point. Under the nonlinear price structure above, 
the hiker drinks fi ve beers and spends $16.50, or an average of $3.30 per glass. 
If the variable unit cost for each beer is 50 cents, the innkeeper earns a profi t contribution of $14. So why shouldn’t the innkeeper make things simpler and just charge 
a price of $3.30 per beer instead of using the complex nonlinear price structure 
based on marginal utility ? At a uniform price of $3.30, the hiker would only buy two 
beers (because the price is less than his marginal utility). That leaves the innkeeper 
with a revenue of $6.60 and a profi t contribution of $5.60, which is 60 % below the 
profi t he would have gotten from the nonlinear price structure. What would have 
been the profi t-maximizing uniform price in this case? It would be $2.50. At the 
price the hiker buys four beers and pays $10. That leaves the innkeeper with a profi t 
contribution of $8, which is still 43 % less than he would have received had he differentiated his prices according to the nonlinear structure. If he had set his uniform 
price at $3 or $2 per beer, the profi t contribution would have been lower, at $7.50 in 
each case. 
 This case provides us with several important insights. It confi rms the huge profi t 
potential that proper price differentiation can unlock. It also shows that a prerequisite for optimal price differentiation is detailed knowledge about the buyers’ willingness to pay . Implementing this kind of price differentiation can be rather 
complicated. For example, the innkeeper needs to keep track of exactly how many 
beers each of his guests has consumed. He must also guard against arbitrage , which 
occurs when one guest buys as many beers as he can at low prices and then distributes them to other guests. Finally, the guests may resist such a price structure . If the 
innkeeper sets his prices to tap 100 % of each consumer’s willingness to pay, their 
 consumer surplus from drinking beer at the inn is zero. That can lead to serious dissatisfaction. These practical diffi culties may explain why such nonlinear price 
 systems—with prices differentiated according to a guest’s marginal utility —have 
not established themselves in the restaurant and hospitality business. 
 Nonlinear Pricing for a Cinema 
 The law of diminishing marginal utility applies not only to consumer products , but 
also to services. The fi rst visit to the movies in a given month has a higher utility 
than the second one, etc. In the case below, a cinema chain in Europe serves three 
customer segments, which we will call A, B, and C. Each segment is characterized 
by a different willingness to pay for the fi rst, second, third, etc. visit in a given 
month. Figure 7.4 shows the data for this case.
 The optimal uniform price is €5.50. At this price, Segment A’s customers would 
go to the movies 2,000 times, B’s would go 3,000, and C’s would go 4,000 times. 
That works out to 9,000 visits in a month and a profi t of €49,500. 
 To determine the optimal price differentiation, we use nonlinear pricing. The fi rst 
step is to determine the profi t-maximizing price for the fi rst visit. This price is €9; 
 Nonlinear Pricing for a Cinema
128
customers from all three segments attend, and the profi t is €27,000. If the price 
were €10, only customers from Segments B and C would attend, and the profi t 
would fall to €20,000. If they charged €12 for that fi rst visit, only segment C would 
visit and profi ts would be just €12,000. 
 Setting prices in the same manner for subsequent visits results in the nonlinear 
 price structure shown in column 5 of Fig. 7.4 . The prices range from €9 for the fi rst 
visit to €3.50 for the fi fth. In the spirit of the phrase “from profi t rectangle to profi t 
triangle ,” Fig. 7.5 illustrates just how dramatic the profi t difference is between uniform and nonlinear pricing.
 Price differentiation (shown on the right) does a much better job of exploiting the 
 profi t potential in the triangle than uniform pricing (shown on the left). The total 
profi t from nonlinear pricing comes to €67,500, which is 37.7 % more than the 
€49,500 the cinema would earn from a uniform price . The number of visits rises as 
well, from 9,000 per month to 11,000, with an average ticket price of €6.14 vs. 
€5.50 in the case of a uniform price. Such simultaneous increases in volume and 
 Fig. 7.4 Nonlinear pricing for a chain of movie theaters 
 Fig. 7.5 Uniform vs. nonlinear pricing 
7 Price Differentiation: The High Art
129
price are not possible with a uniform price and a normal (downward-sloping) demand 
curve . You can only accomplish such a result with this kind of complex price structure , which lets you eat into the two smaller profi t triangle s and strongly increase 
your overall profi t. This structure does a much better job than a uniform price does in 
attracting buyers with a higher willingness to pay (over €5.50) and a lower maximum willingness to pay (under €5.50). The implementation in this case was simple. 
The customers who participated in the program received a card with their name on it. 
Upon each successive visit, the card would get stamped to indicate the fi rst, second, 
third, etc. visit during the month. In contrast to the beer example, this card system 
prevents arbitrage , because the theater tracks each individual’s actual usage. 
 Price Bundling 
 When a seller packages several products together and charges a total price less than 
the sum of the individual product prices, it is called price bundling . Bundling is a 
very effective way to differentiate prices. 6
 Whoever buys multiple products at once 
rather than a single product receives a bundle discount . Widely known examples of 
such bundles are the numbered menus at McDonald’s (burger, fries, and soft drink), 
the Microsoft Offi ce suite, and the all-inclusive packages from travel agents, which 
include fl ight, hotel, and rental car. 
 The fi lm industry was a pioneer in the use of price bundling through a tactic 
known as “ block booking .” The distributor didn’t offer theater operators the movies 
on an individual basis, which would probably prompt the operators to pick only the 
most attractive titles. Instead they offered a block of fi lms—usually a selection of 
attractive and less attractive titles. 7
 Why is price bundling so advantageous? We can answer that question using a 
simple example involving wine and cheese. Figure 7.6 shows the maximum price s 
( willingness to pay ) of fi ve consumers for both products. We assume that the 
 maximum price for a bundle of wine and cheese equals the sum of the buyer’s 
 individual maxima for each product.
 What are the profi t-maximizing price s for wine, cheese, and the bundle? Let’s 
assume that variable unit costs are zero. That assumption makes the math simpler 
without changing the underlying argument. The optimal price for cheese in isolation 
is $5. At that price, consumers 1 and 3 buy, and the profi t (in this case equal to the 
revenue) is $10. If the seller charged $3 per piece of cheese, three consumers would 
buy, but the profi t would be only $9. For wine, the optimal price is $4, with consumers 2 and 3 buying at that price. The profi t (again, equal to the revenue) is $8. 
In total—with wine and cheese sold separately at their profi t-optimal price s—the 
total profi t is $18. 
6
 For a comprehensive treatment of price bundling , please see Georg Wübker . Optimal Bundling: 
Marketing Strategies for Improving Economic Performance, Springer, New York, 1999. 
7
 The US Supreme Court upheld a ban on block booking in 1962, citing price discrimination . 
 Price Bundling
130
 Is it possible to make more money than $18 through bundling ? Yes, one could 
offer a wine-and-cheese bundle for $5.50 and consumers 1 through 4 would buy. 
Only consumer 5 would decline the bundle at that price. The profi t from the bundle 
is $22. This is so-called pure bundling , because the supplier offers only the bundle; 
that is, consumers can buy neither wine nor cheese separately. Even though the supplier offers a bundle discount of 39 % relative to the sum of the individual prices , his 
 profi t increase s by 22.2 %. How can that be? The answer lies in the fact that the 
bundle does a better job at exploiting the consumers’ maximum price s ( willingness 
to pay ) than the individual prices do. By charging individual prices, the seller sacrifi ces profi t potential both at the high end and at the low end. Consumer 1 would have 
paid $6 for cheese, but only needs to pay $5. The same applies for consumer 2 and 
wine. The consumers with lower willingness to pay do not buy when the prices are 
$4 (wine) and $5 (cheese). But when the seller offers a bundle, the excess willingness to pay for one product gets transferred to the other product. Consumer 1 had a 
very low maximum price for wine, but when one adds in the higher maximum price 
for cheese, consumer 1 becomes a buyer of both products. The same applies for 
consumer 2 and consumer 4. Another way to interpret this transfer of excess willingness to pay is to say that the different levels of willingness to pay for the bundle 
are less heterogeneous than the levels of willingness to pay for the individual products. The high and low willingnesses to pay for the separate products balance each 
other out to some degree. This means that it is easier to segment buyers and nonbuyers at the bundle level. 
 The profi t increase from $18 to $22 is a big improvement. But the profi t situation 
gets even better when the seller practices “ mixed bundling ,” which means that buyers can buy either the bundle or the products separately. In our example, the optimal 
bundle price remains at $5.50 with mixed bundling . The optimal individual prices 
are $4 for wine and $2.40 for cheese. Consumers 1 through 4 would still buy the 
bundle, and consumer 5 buys the cheese. This increases the total profi t to $24.40. 
Despite a 39 % bundle discount off the sum of the individual prices, the seller’s 
profi t jumps by 35.6 % when mixed bundling is applied. 
 Fig. 7.6 Maximum price for wine and cheese and for the bundle of both 
7 Price Differentiation: The High Art
131
 Price Bundling for Optional Accessories 
 Car manufacturers offer a whole list of optional accessories at additional prices. For 
the individual customer, putting together one’s own package of options can be a 
tiresome chore. It can also be a bit of a shock, once the customer tallies up the separate prices for each option and looks at the grand total. This can be a strain for the 
manufacturer as well; the extreme customization would create a burden because of 
the high logistics costs. One premium carmaker asked Simon-Kucher & Partners to 
confi gure optimal bundle packages for their optional accessories and then set the 
prices for them. We suggested to defi ne three bundles (or packages): comfort, sports, 
and safety. Figure 7.7 shows the resulting profi t.
 Despite a bundle discount of 21 %, profi ts rose by 25 % compared to selling the 
 optional accessories on an individual basis. This is another example of mixed bundling , which means that customers can either buy a package or buy individual 
options separately. The additional revenue from the packages offset the cost of the 
bundle discount by a wide margin. The car manufacturer saw other advantages from 
its mixed- bundling approach. The optional packages proved to be easier to advertise 
and sell than individual options. The higher level of standardization via the option 
packages also reduced the cost and complexity of internal logistics. This case again 
illustrates very clearly the kind of higher profi ts clever price structure s can unlock. 
 Fig. 7.7 Bundling for optional accessories 
 Price Bundling for Optional Accessories
132
 Unbundling 
 Despite the impressive profi t improvement s above, one cannot make a blanket 
statement that price bundling is always better. There are situations in which 
 unbundling —the elimination of bundles by breaking them up into their constituent 
parts—can actually be more profi table. Similarly, there is no defi nitive answer to the 
question of whether pure bundling or mixed bundling will generate higher profi ts. 
The optimal solution always depends on the respective distribution of the customers’ willingness to pay . 
 I recommend to consider unbundling under these conditions:
– Opportunities for a higher margin: This opportunity exists when the individual 
products have relatively low price elasticities. Such a situation comes about 
when the bundle price evolves over time and ends up becoming very high. 
– Market expansion: The company can open new markets or market segments if it 
sells components on a stand-alone basis. 
– Increasing standardization and compatibility: The more components become 
standardized and compatible, the riskier it becomes to pursue pure bundling , 
because each customer can put together his or her own individual package. The 
supplier faces a dilemma. It can fence itself off from the competition (through 
pure bundling ) or it can unbundle and expand its market. In the course of a product life cycle and as the market matures, the balance tips increasingly in favor of 
 unbundling . 
– A shift in the value chain: In many industries there is a clear trend toward charging separately for value-added service s which used to be included in the price of 
the product. 
 A well-known example of unbundling is the ongoing trend toward charging baggage fees and other surcharges in addition to the price of a plane ticket. Ryanair 
pioneered this trend. An interesting case is the television function in the BMW 7 
series. The fi rst generation of the navigation system in the 7 series included television at no extra charge. Subsequent generations offered television, but for a separate 
charge. 8
 Multi-Person Pricing 
 Multi-person pricing means setting a price for groups of people. The total price will 
vary by the number of people. Travel agents make offers which allow partners or 
children to travel at reduced prices or for free. Airlines sometimes will let a second 
guest or a partner fl y at half-price or free. Some restaurants will charge half-price 
for a dish if one person pays full price. Northwest Airlines, now part of Delta 
8
 www.bmw.de , as of February 23, 2013. 
7 Price Differentiation: The High Art
133
Airlines , once practiced a particularly original form of multi-person pricing : if a 
child paid the full price, an adult could fl y for free. This tactic proved quite 
popular. 
 The profi t increase from multi-person pricing derives from two effects, similar to 
 price bundling : it does a better job of exploiting the consumer surplus es of heterogeneous groups of customers, and it transfers excess willingness to pay from one 
person to another person. The following example illustrates these effects. For simplicity’s sake, we will assume that both fi xed and marginal costs are zero. 
 A wife is thinking about accompanying her husband on a business trip. The husband’s maximum willingness to pay is $1,000. The wife’s willingness to pay is 
$750. If the uniform price for the fl ight is $1,000, only the husband would go on the 
trip. The profi t would be $1,000. If the airline offered a uniform price of $750, then 
both would fl y. The profi t rises to $1,500 (2 × $750), making $750 the optimal uniform price. But it gets better. Using multi-person bundling , the airline sets the total 
price for the married couple to fl y at $1,750, which in this simplifi ed example is also 
its profi t. This is a profi t increase of 16.7 % relative to the optimal uniform price. 
Multi-person pricing takes advantage of the maximum price s of each individual in 
order to achieve higher profi ts. 
 Something which doesn’t fall under multi-person pricing is the situation when 
consumers themselves bundle their demand, in order to press for a bigger discount . 
This method is somewhat common for the purchase of heating oil. Websites also 
exist to help individuals bundle their demand in order to extract lower prices. But in 
general this method is not very widespread. 
 The More, the Cheaper? Be Careful! 
 The most common form of volume -dependent price differentiation is the volume 
discount . The more someone buys, the higher the discount , which means that the 
customer pays a lower price per unit. Everyone knows this “universal law” and 
takes it for granted. But even with volume discounts, the devil is in the details. The 
result depends on how the volume discount is structured. 
 There are essentially two forms of volume discount s: full-volume and incremental discount s. The full-volume variant means that the discount rate applies to the 
entire purchase volume. The incremental rebate means that the discount rate applies 
only to the incremental volume, not the full volume. This difference may sound 
harmless, but it is quite powerful. Let’s look at the numbers in Fig. 7.8 , which again 
uses numbers derived from our power tool case. We assume a list price of $100 and 
variable unit costs of $60. For simplicity’s sake we assume fi xed costs to be zero. 
Up to 99 units, the discount is zero. The discount is 10 % from 100 units onward, 
20 % from 200 units onward, and 30 % for 300 units or more.
 Using the full-volume discount —which applies to the total number of units 
 purchased—the seller achieves revenue of $21,000 and a profi t of $3,000 if he sells 
300 units. But if he chooses the incremental discount —which applies a different 
 discount rate to each portion of the 300 units—the seller earns $24,000 in revenue 
 The More, the Cheaper? Be Careful!
134
(an increase of 14.3 %) and a profi t of $6,000 (an increase of 100 %). What looks 
like a relatively innocuous difference in the discount structure actually doubles the 
seller’s profi ts. Sellers should choose incremental discounts whenever possible. For 
buyers the opposite advice applies. They should ask for full- volume discount s. In 
other words both buyers and sellers should focus not only on the percentage of discount they receive, but also the structure of the discount. 
 Differentiation or Discrimination? 
 A common form of price differentiation is person specifi c; different people pay different prices for the exact same product. Isn’t that discrimination ? The term “price 
discrimination” is often used synonymously with “price differentiation.” In reality, 
 person-specifi c price differentiation is a sensitive topic. If you were to fi nd out that 
a friend of yours paid 25 % less for a product from the same seller as you did, you 
would not be pleased. Amazon suffered very negative publicity when it leaked that 
it was differentiating prices for DVDs according to personal profi les or browsers. 
Amid the intense public outcry, Amazon stopped the practice and reimbursed buyers. 9
 The opportunities to conduct this kind of person- or user-specifi c price differentiation—and the temptation to actually act on them—multiply as Internet usage 
grows. One study showed signifi cant behavioral differences among the users who 
booked hotels using an Apple Mac vs. customers who used another kind of PC. 10
The Mac users paid $20–$30 more on average per night. That makes a big difference when the average price for a hotel room booked online is $100. Mac users also 
made 40 % more reservations in 4-star and 5-star hotels. Such insights build a strong 
case for differentiating service and prices by user. But as the Amazon experience 
showed, sellers should be cautious in taking advantage of such insights. 
 It remains to be seen whether the following form of person-specifi c price differentiation becomes a standard. The airline Samoa Air Ltd. charges passengers 
9
 Spiekermann S. Individual Price Discrimination—An Impossibility? Institute of Information 
Services, Humboldt University; see also “Caveat Emptor.com”, The Economist, June 30, 2012. 
10 On Orbitz, Mac Users Steered to Pricier Hotels. The Wall Street Journal, June 26, 2012, p. A1. 
 Fig. 7.8 Full volume vs. incremental volume discount s 
7 Price Differentiation: The High Art
135
according to their body weight. The price for a fl ight from Samoa to American 
Samoa costs 92 cents per kilogram. Samoa has the world’s third highest level of 
overweight people. CEO Chris Langton is sticking to the plan, despite initial protests. “It’s a pay by weight system and it’s here to stay,” he said. 11 The logic speaks 
for such a system. The weight of passengers is a cost driver for an airline. Why 
should the transport of freight be charged by weight, but not the transport of people? 
In the meantime, Samoa Air has adopted the slogan “A kilo is a kilo is a kilo” and 
continues to describe its pricing strategy as “the fairest way of paying for carriage.” 12
Some US airlines have started to demand that extremely large passengers buy two 
tickets on a full fl ight. Personally I do not see this as a violation of their rights. 
Social acceptance of the approach is another matter. But who knows? 
 On the other hand, there are numerous person-specifi c price differentiation 
schemes which enjoy mainstream acceptance. These include all manner of discounts for children, students, veterans, and seniors. Nobody seems to mind that 
people who belong to certain organizations or clubs receive special prices or discounts. More critical from a consumer perspective, yet more interesting from a 
seller perspective are successful attempts to differentiate prices according to criteria 
such as buying power or price sensitivity . But in any situation in which buyers and 
sellers negotiate prices individually, that is precisely the goal. The list price forms 
just the starting point for individual price differentiation . When someone purchases 
a car, the degree to which willingness to pay gets exploited depends on the talent of 
the salesperson. 
 Person-specifi c price differentiation can also refl ect the cost and risk differences 
among people. At the Italian bank UniCredit Banca , interest rates on loans depend 
on the past credit history and behavior of the person taking out the loan. The bank 
rewards loyalty and prompt payment with lower interest rates. The bank charges a 
spread of 100 basis points over the base interest rate in years 1–3. The spread then 
shrinks by 10 basis points each year (down to a minimum of 70 basis points) if the 
customer has made his or her payments on time. For a mortgage of $500,000, that 
can mean an annual savings of $1,500 per year. 
 More multi-faceted than in the traditional world are the attempts at personspecifi c price differentiation online. E-commerce suppliers learn a lot about their 
customers from all the individual transactions, and in extreme cases they can vary 
prices at the individual level. It has been said that online companies use a form of 
peak and off- peak pricing , charging more in the evenings than they do during the 
day. There are good arguments for this kind of time-based differentiation, which in 
reality is a form of person-specifi c price differentiation . During the day, it is more 
likely that price-sensitive teenagers and college students are online. Adults are more 
likely to be at work during the day, but tend to have higher purchasing power and 
lower price sensitivity . They also tend to order more online in the evenings. Doesn’t 
it seem to make perfect sense to offer lower prices during the day and higher prices 
in the evening? 
11 Craymer L. (2013) Weigh more, pay more on Samoa Air . The Wall Street Journal , April 3, 2013. 
12 http://www.samoaair.ws/ . 
 Differentiation or Discrimination?
136
 Recently I ordered a pair of shoes online from Zalando . Since then, it seems that 
every third webpage that I visit has some kind of advertisement for shoes. Zalando 
and others are able to place their ads on other websites and target me directly. If that 
is possible with advertisements, then it is possible with prices. This is one approach 
to go from the profi t rectangle to the profi t triangle , assuming that one has valid 
information about the willingness to pay of individual customers. “Big Data,” the 
analysis of large amounts of data about transactions on an individual basis, opens up 
fantastic new opportunities for person-specifi c price differentiation. Interesting here 
is the question of whether consumers should occasionally order a very inexpensive 
product, in order to convey a high level of price sensitivity to the seller. This could 
trigger advertisements for special offers and attractive prices—a new kind of catand- mouse game. 
 Implementing person-specifi c price differentiation requires some effort. One 
needs to ensure that the potential customer belongs to the qualifying class (e.g., 
student ID card, proof of birth date) or issue the customer a special card (club card 
for BJ’s, AAA card, or any number of retailer -specifi c cards). 13 For online businesses, the individual transactions of the customers must be stored and analyzed. 
Banks and insurance companies have collected since time immemorial every customer transaction, but the companies usually lacked the analytical competence to 
take advantage of this data and customize their offers for each client. The question 
remains relevant: To what degree can a company truly infl uence the behavior of 
individual customers? I have personally ordered several hundred books from 
 Amazon , but have never received a recommendation from them for a book to buy 
which resulted in a purchase. In my case, whatever analytical work they did was all 
for naught. As for those annoying shoe advertisements from Zalando : they turned 
me off rather than increasing the chances I would make another purchase. Having 
said that, I don’t discourage this practice. But I do believe that it needs to improve. 
One issue is that the data and the algorithms don’t reveal the underlying behavioral 
drivers. With regard to prices, this is especially challenging, because the online 
seller knows only the price the customer has paid, but without additional information (e.g., from tests) they cannot be sure about the customer’s price sensitivity . 
 Price and Location 
 Historically, a classic brand -name article had an identical price no matter where you 
purchased it. Manufacturers had the right to dictate the retail or end-user price for 
all resellers throughout the entire country. In most countries this ended in the 1960s 
and 1970s. After that only specifi c products fell under the so-called resale price 
maintenance . These rules differ from country to country. For most products, retailers are free to set prices. This led to regional and channel price differences . Unlike 
the manufacturer-prescribed price s of the past, the new prices refl ect differences in 
 purchasing power (in New York City, some prices are higher than in rural towns, but 
some are lower) as well as differences in competitive intensity and costs (gas gets 
13 BJ’s is a club store in the USA; AAA is the American Automobile Association. 
7 Price Differentiation: The High Art
137
more expensive the further the gas station is away from a refi nery and the lower the 
competitive density is). 
 Antitrust laws generally forbid manufacturers from exerting infl uence on the 
prices retailers charge, though a ruling by the US Supreme Court in 2007 overturned 
one long-standing pillar of the Sherman Antitrust Act . 14 The court declared in its 
decision on Leegin Creative Leather Products, Inc. v. PSKS, Inc that vertical price 
restraints were no longer per se illegal, but rather subject to the rule of reason. In 
other words, under certain circumstances a supplier could indeed justify setting 
minimum retail price requirements or pulling supplies from a retailer who prices the 
products too low. An intense discussion is going on in Europe because manufacturers are demanding some infl uence on the retail prices. 
 Prices can differ a lot between countries. This is partially due to institutional 
peculiarities, taxes, and differences in distribution systems. In Luxembourg, the 
price of gasoline is about 20 % lower than in Germany, which has resulted in 
Luxembourg having one of the world’s greatest concentrations of gas stations along 
its German border. Some price-sensitive customers travel as far as 50 miles to fi ll up 
both their car gas tanks and their gas canisters. Cigarettes and coffee are also much 
cheaper in Luxembourg, and many people buy these products on their trips to get 
gas. That may have led to some absurd unexpected consequences. The rate of lung 
cancer in the German city of Trier (located near the Luxembourg border) is signifi -
cantly higher than in the rest of Germany. So far no one has established the cause 
for this, but one hypothesis claims that the lower cigarette prices in Luxembourg 
and the ensuing higher rate of smokers in the Trier region are responsible. When the 
Euro saw a massive devaluation against the Swiss franc in 2011, eager Swiss consumers practically invaded southern Germany, because the prices there—expressed 
in Swiss francs—were so much lower than in Switzerland. 15
 The biggest advantage of regional or international price differentiation is effective fencing . If a product is only slightly cheaper at a store about 50 miles away 
from home, no one is going to drive that distance to buy it. On the other hand, as we 
learned in detail earlier, rational behavior is not always the norm. Does a trip to 
Luxembourg to get gas really save money, especially when one considers all the 
cost—both time and money—in driving anywhere from 25 to 50 miles? People 
often look only at their immediate “out-of-pocket” cost savings rather than at total 
costs of a purchase. 
 One study revealed irrational behavior regarding distances. It involved jackets 
and windbreakers. Test Group A saw a jacket with a price of $125. They also heard 
that they could buy the same exact jacket for $5 less from the same store chain, but 
they would need to drive 20 minutes to get there. Test Group B saw a windbreaker 
for $15, and then learned that they could buy the same windbreaker for $10 at the 
same store 20 minutes drive away. In both cases, the saving in absolute terms was 
$5. In Test Group B, some 68 % of participants were willing to drive the 20 minutes 
14 Century-Old Ban Lifted on Minimum Retail Pricing. The New York Times, June 29, 2007. 
15 Ohne Schweiz kein Preis. Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, February 7, 2012, p. 3. 
 Price and Location
138
to get the lower price, but in Test Group A only 29 % were willing to make the same 
trip. 16 Apparently a saving of $5 on a price of $125 isn’t worth the trip, but saving 
$5 on a price of $15 is something else. One can also interpret this in another way: 
the utility (in this case, negative) of the distance is not absolute, but relative. This 
has implications for regional price differentiation and for fencing . 
 Fencing of price difference s by country is particularly effective. But there are 
exceptions here as well. If the price differences are large and at the same time the 
 arbitrage costs (for transportation, customs duties, bureaucracy, and product adaptations) are low, one will see so-called gray or parallel imports , which is the fl ow of 
goods, unauthorized by the manufacturer, across borders. In pharmaceuticals, parallel imports play a major role. The company Kohlpharma generated revenues of 
$760 million in 2012 through parallel imports from other EU countries into 
Germany. International price differences are also substantial in the automotive market. It is estimated that the auto industry’s profi ts in Europe would fall by 25 % if 
prices were uniform across the continent. Or put another way: one-quarter of the 
profi ts of car manufacturers in Europe comes from international price differentiation . Parallel imports do not play a major role in this market, though, because of 
diffi culties in acquiring the cars (manufacturers control the number of cars they 
provide to each country) and because the arbitrage costs are rather high. 
 When the unifi ed European common market came about, many companies 
responded by introducing uniform price s throughout the European Union. That is a 
simple strategy, but not a wise one by any means. Those companies sacrifi ced the 
 profi t potential that price differentiation across countries offers. One could even say 
that a uniform European price made less and less sense as the countries of Southern 
Europe slipped deeper into crisis , because of the growing gap in purchasing power 
between North and South. On the other hand, it remains impossible to maintain the 
once large price difference s between countries, because they can cause signifi cant 
market disruptions through gray imports . The solution is a compromise. For that purpose, Simon-Kucher & Partners has developed the so-called INTERPRICE model, 
which develops optimal international price corridor s. The corridors take advantage of 
differences in markets while keeping gray imports at tolerable levels. 17
 Price and Time 
 Playing off an old Latin saying, one could say “Tempora mutantur et pretii mutantur 
in illis” which means “The times are changing, and prices are changing with them.” 
Time-based price differentiation is one of the most important and widely used methods to go from the profi t rectangle to the profi t triangle . It comes in endless variations, from time of day to day of the week, to seasonal price s, advance booking 
discounts, last-minute offers, winter or summer clearance sale s, Black Friday, and 
16 Trevisan E (2013) The Irrational Consumer: Applying Behavioural Economics to Your Business 
Strategy, Gower Publishing, Farnham Surrey, UK. 
17 Simon-Kucher & Partners , INTERPRICE-Model for the Determination of an International Price 
Corridor, Bonn, several years. 
7 Price Differentiation: The High Art
139
“special introductory offer s.” It also plays a role in “ dynamic pricing ,” which adjusts 
prices as supply and demand fl uctuate over time. 
 The driver behind successful time-based price differentiation —as with the other 
forms we discussed—is the fact that individuals at different times have different 
levels of willingness to pay . During a vacation period or a trade fair, people are willing to pay more for a hotel room than at other times. The sellers would be negligent 
if they failed to increase their prices in those situations. Closely related to this idea 
is the balance between supply and demand . The traditional peak-load pricing 
applied by electrical utilities pursues precisely that kind of balancing. Dynamic 
pricing emphasizes that same goal but combines it with an attempt to increase profits, not just control supply and demand. 
 Parking garages provide a good example of dynamic pricing . In their case, 
“dynamic” means that there is no set price per hour for a parking space. The price 
at any given time depends on availability. The garages at Heathrow Airport in 
London use this approach, as do other garages throughout the world. The price is 
adjusted so that a customer with the corresponding willingness to pay will always 
fi nd a parking spot. On two occasions I have missed a fl ight because I couldn’t fi nd 
a parking space. My willingness to pay in each of those situations was extremely 
high, but because the garages charged a uniform rate, two things happened: the 
garages were full, and the garage also lost a chance to make a lot more money. Both 
the parking garage operator and I would have benefi ted from dynamic pricing. 
 It is not unusual, though, for a company to go completely overboard with the idea 
of time-based price differentiation . One downtown parking garage in my hometown 
has several hundred spaces that cost 2.50 Euros ($3.25) per hour on weekdays. On 
Sundays, the price drops to just 1 Euro ($1.30). Yet on Sundays the garage remains 
almost entirely empty. Where is the mistake? The garage operator mistook low 
demand for higher price elasticity . The garage isn’t empty on Sundays because the 
weekday price of $3.25 per hour is too high. It is empty because very few people 
drive into the city center on Sundays anyway. The price cut to $1.30 is ineffective 
in attracting more demand. The operator is simply giving money away. 
 In a project for a large movie theater chain in England, Simon-Kucher & Partners 
discovered similar errors. The chain had offered discounts of 25 % on certain weekdays and at certain times, but saw no corresponding uptick in demand. We created a 
 price structure that allowed the chain to capture higher profi ts in periods of higher 
demand. The chain offered a discount only on one day a week—it’s so-called cheap 
day—but at a discount level so high that it actually fi lled the theaters. The new 
structure was tested at several locations prior to a broader rollout. As expected, the 
total number of guests declined slightly, but the chain saw a massive increase in 
profi ts . What is the lesson from the garages and the cinema chain? Not the demand 
level as such is relevant for optimal dynamic pricing ; it is the way customers respond 
to different prices at different times, in other words: the price elasticity . Unless you 
know it you are just fi shing in muddy waters. 
 Price and Time
140
 Perishable Goods 
 Perishable goods present a tricky challenge for time-based price differentiation . 
How should a bakery or a fresh-fruit stand price its goods shortly before closing for 
the day? If they don’t sell the products today, they become worthless. No one wants 
to buy day-old bread or spoiled fruit or vegetables. But “perishable goods” also 
include hotel rooms, seats on an airplane, or space on a tour. Every empty seat on a 
fl ight costs the airline revenue and profi t. 
 Costs here are “sunk” and no longer play a role for the “ last-minute ” price decision. From a short-term perspective, the solution is clear. Every price above zero is 
better than letting a good spoil or let capacity remain unsold. This would imply that 
the seller should offer very favorable “last-minute” prices in order to fi ll seats or 
empty the shelf. 
 But this tactic has a catch. If last-minute prices become a rule customers will 
learn it and will increasingly attempt to do their shopping at the last minute in order 
to take advantage of the bargain prices. One housekeeper told me that she is usually 
buying her bread in a bakery which offers last-minute prices shortly before the store 
closes. The fencing between normal prices and last-minute prices breaks down, and 
the seller will then cannibalize his full-priced sales . That is precisely the reason why 
many companies let the goods spoil or leave the seats empty rather than resort to a 
predictable pattern of last-minute pricing. Of course in an individual case it is hard 
to quantify these two contravening effects—protecting higher price sales versus 
losing potential revenue by letting goods “spoil”—and weigh them against each 
other. But in my experience, in many cases it is wise to avoid the practice of lastminute pricing. 
 The possibilities for pricing in peak and off-peak periods are often asymmetrical. 
One can use price cuts to encourage someone to run a washing machine or a dishwasher in periods when electricity demand is low. And one can use higher prices to 
stunt demand in peak periods. With demand at restaurants or on the rails, however, 
the situation is different. Even if the restaurant or railroad offers low prices on a 
Monday evening, they will not have a full house or train. On the other hand, they do 
have opportunities to charge more in peak periods. But this is a sensitive issue, 
because consumers often react negatively to this price “gouging.” 
 Patents for Dynamic Pricing 
 The following story shows what dimensions the battle for leadership in the area of 
 dynamic pricing has taken on. Google submitted a patent application for dynamic 
pricing on September 30, 2011. 18 The summary of the patent refers among other 
things to “Methods, systems and apparatus, including computer programs for 
dynamically pricing electronic content … adjusting a base price associated with 
18 US Patent Offi ce, Application Number 13/249 910, September 30, 2011. 
7 Price Differentiation: The High Art
141
purchasing the item of electronic content, and providing the particular user with an 
offer to repurchase the item at the adjusted price.” Google feels that it has a proprietary method for time-based price differentiation and wants to secure its rights to it. 
 What are the limits of dynamic pricing ? It seems that some companies can be 
outright crass in the way they approach it online. The most frequent price change s 
occur for consumer electronics, apparel, shoes, and jewelry. It is not unusual for 
prices of these products to change several times an hour. Altogether the e-commerce 
world sees millions of price changes every day, a phenomenon we previously only 
witnessed with the airlines . In e-commerce, a primary goal is to make sure that 
one’s site appears fi rst in search-engine results. 19 When this effort relies primarily 
on price changes, which usually means lowering the price, it can become a profi tdestroying pastime, creating behavioral patterns that drive prices ever further downward. It is a classic game-theory dilemma which favors only the buyers. It remains 
to be seen what kind of battles we will observe as companies fi ght for leadership in 
dynamic pricing and the fi rst place in the search engines’ lists. 
 Juggling Capacities and Prices 
 A particularly complex form of time-based price differentiation is what many companies refer to as “ revenue management ” or “ yield management .” Airlines practice 
this with great intensity and a high level of professionalism. Models, data analysis , 
and forecasting techniques play a key role. The goal is to generate the maximum 
revenue and return from each and every fl ight. To achieve this, the airlines combine 
product and price policies. For example, they increase or decrease their capacity in 
business class by moving the bulkhead wall forward or backward. Depending on the 
demand forecast , every price point will be allocated a certain number of seats out of 
the available capacity. Depending on how the actual bookings develop, airlines can 
adjust these assigned price-capacity combinations on an ongoing basis. This 
explains the phenomenon many of us have witnessed, sometimes to our benefi t and 
sometimes to our chagrin. It can happen that we can book a fl ight at $59 at one 
point, and then see that the exact same fl ight costs $99 half an hour later. The revenue manager must make decisions like this: sell a seat now for $59 or hold that seat 
back in the hope—based on the adjusted models and the forecasts—that someone 
will buy that seat later for $99. In the latter case, the revenue manager takes the risk 
that the seat remains unsold. 
 Airlines, hotel chains, car rental services, and other similar business all practice 
some form of revenue management . It helps them to better manage their capacity 
and its utilization. But it is by no means a perfect solution, as shown by a conversation I once had with the revenue manager of the landmark Hilton Hotel in downtown Chicago. 
 “Tonight I have 13 empty rooms out of 1,600, even though the rest of Chicago is 
sold out,” he said. “That is 13 rooms too many.” 
19 Don’t Like This Price? Wait a Minute. The Wall Street Journal, September 6, 2012, p. 21. 
 Juggling Capacities and Prices
142
 “Are you sure about that?” I said asked. “Maybe it would have been better to 
raise the average price from $100 to $110 and have 50 empty rooms.” Figure 7.9
compares two alternatives to what could have happened on that night.
 If the average price were $110 and 50 rooms had remained unsold, the manager 
would have had a decent increase in revenue. This simple example reveals the core 
problem of revenue management . The unsold capacity is “hard” data which puts 
downward pressure on prices. The untapped willingness to pay of hotel guests on a 
given night is “soft” data with a high level of uncertainty. The Hilton Chicago manager knew “with certainty” that 13 rooms remaining empty at $100 meant $1,300 in 
foregone revenue. But he was unsure of whether 1,550 guests would have willingly 
paid the extra $10 and only 37 guests would have booked their room elsewhere. If 
only 1,400 guests would have paid the higher price, the revenue would have fallen 
to $154,000, as the fourth column in Fig. 7.9 shows. Revenue management is the 
best possible way to navigate all this uncertainty and achieve a desirable outcome. 
The better the forecasts are, the greater its profi t contribution . 
 Price and Scarcity 
 A very sensitive issue is pricing during periods of scarcity or during an emergency. 
Hurricane Sandy provides a telling example. This storm struck the east coast of the 
USA in the fall of 2012, touching of a state of emergency which lasted for days, in 
some areas weeks. The demand for emergency electrical generators skyrocketed. What 
does a seller do in such a situation? He faces a dilemma. If he leaves his prices at normal levels, his supply will sell out in nothing fl at. Clever buyers will buy up several 
units—the same way some people hoard food supplies—which leaves many people 
empty-handed or struggling to fi nd alternatives. In the case of the generators, those 
buyers could turn right around and sell them online for twice what they originally paid. 
 The alternative for the dealer is to raise the price to a level at which his supply 
(which is fi xed in the short term) comes into some harmony with demand. More buyers get the scarce good, but the supplier risks being labeled as a profi teer who is 
exploiting a disaster for his own advantage. Potential buyers with limited means may 
not be able to afford the more expensive generators anymore. Many people consider 
this “ price gouging ” to be unfair, and some countries ban the practice entirely. 20
20 Poundstone W. (2010) Priceless. Hill and Wang, New York, pp. 105–106. 
 Fig. 7.9 Prices and rooms sold 
7 Price Differentiation: The High Art
143
A gas station operator in Florida, who raised prices in the aftermath of Hurricane 
Katrina because he had “too many customers” and was running out of fuel, was 
called before the courts under the state’s anti-gouging law s. 21 Numerous tests show 
time and again that consumers resist price increase s in emergency situations. 
Nonetheless, this form of time-based or, more precisely, event-based price differentiation is a hot topic. 
 Hi-Lo vs. EDLP 
 The “Hi-Lo” price strategy in retail is another form of time-based price differentiation . Under a Hi-Lo strategy , a retailer switches between higher regular prices and 
lower promotional price s on an occasional basis. The counterpart to Hi-Lo is the 
EDLP, or “Every Day Low Price” strategy. Under an EDLP strategy, a retailer maintains prices at constant, comparatively low levels over time. This means that consumers always see attractive prices, not just during promotional periods. 
 Retailers who use the Hi-Lo strategy often fi nd that sales on promotion account 
for 70–80 % of their sales in categories such as beer, juice, and a wide range of 
household products. The true “normal” price in this case is the promotional price 
and not the regular price. The retailer supports its price promotion s with advertising 
and fl yers, and places the promoted products at several locations throughout the 
store. It is not unusual for sales to rise by a large multiple in the promotional period, 
relative to sales at regular prices. This is particularly true for strong brands, which 
have very high price elasticities when on promotion. That’s why retailers prefer to 
use such brands for their promotions, a move which may confl ict with the interests 
of manufacturers, who would prefer to have a more stable price image for their 
brands. 
 The effects of a Hi-Lo are extremely complex. Does the strategy generate real 
incremental sales ? Or does the uptick in sales come at the expense of future sales, 
as in the case of General Motors ’ employee discount we discussed in Chap. 5? Does 
the steady stream of promotions under a Hi-Lo strategy train consumers to become 
 bargain hunter s? Does the product’s price elasticity increase due to the promotions? 
What types of consumers prefer Hi-Lo vs. EDLP? 
 Among the few “converging results” on the questions above is the insight that 
low-income consumers prefer EDLP retailers and those with higher incomes prefer 
Hi-Lo retailers. A retailers’ choice between the two strategies is often determined by 
 competitive behavior . If relevant competitors employ one of the strategies, it can be 
wise to choose the other. Research also indicates that repeated exposure to Hi-Lo 
strategies really does make consumers more price sensitive. They learn that there is 
always a bargain price available somewhere, and that searching for it pays off. But 
overall the evidence remains unclear. One survey of the literature on Hi-Lo vs. 
EDLP concluded: “Existing research cannot give clear advice, which pricing 
21 Holman WJ (2012) Hug a Price Gouger. The Wall Street Journal, October 30, 2012. 
 Hi-Lo vs. EDLP
144
strategy is better in terms of revenue, sales volume , store traffi c or profi tability .” 22
This means that retailers have no other option than to look very carefully at their 
own situation and determine whether Hi-Lo or EDLP is the better fi t. Based on current evidence, there is no clear-cut recommendation for one strategy over the other. 
 Advance Sale Prices and Advance Booking Discounts 
 Special variants of time-based price differentiation are advance sales prices, advance 
booking discounts, and “early bird” specials. These methods are common for events, 
air travel, and package tours. For fl ights, this method seems a logical form of differentiation. Price-sensitive leisure travelers tend to book early, while business travelers tend to be less price sensitive and also book on short notice. This seems like a 
relatively effective fence. With tours and events, the arguments in favor of these 
prices and discounts are less clear-cut. Are people who book early really more price 
sensitive? Or do people hold off and speculate that they can fi nd a last-minute bargain? My impression is that an important motivation behind these tactics is the 
desire of the event promoter or tour operator to reach a certain level of sales as 
quickly as possible. The downside is that these early discounts can hurt profi ts 
because they prevent the sale of tickets or packages at higher prices as the event or 
the departure date draws near. Whether such opportunities will emerge is hard to 
assess in the early sales period. 
 An example of the preceding point can be observed in sports. The 2012/2013 
season in Germany’s premier soccer league, the Bundesliga, began on August 24, 
2012. On that same day, the best team, Bayern Munich , announced that all of its 
home matches were sold out. That is not a refl ection of an intelligent price strategy . 
Apparently the ticket prices were too low. It also confers an advantage to buyers 
who snapped up tickets early on and then sell them later on the secondary market. 
Bayern Munich’s strategy would have made sense only if the team had a bad season 
and interest waned. They would have sold the bulk of their tickets when preseason 
hype was at its peak. It turns out that Bayern Munich had a very successful season 
in 2012/2013, winning the Bundesliga championship by a comfortable margin. In 
2013, Bayern Munich also won the German Soccer Cup and the European 
Champions League fi nal, as well as the unoffi cial world championship of soccer 
clubs. The fact that the club sold out in advance must make the successful season 
somewhat bittersweet for the club’s management. 
 One should also heed this saying from the country of Montenegro: “If you want 
to get mad at yourself, pay in advance.” 
22 ibidem. 
7 Price Differentiation: The High Art
145
 Penetration Strategy: Toyota Lexus 
 Typical price strategies for new products are penetration and skimming . Penetration 
strategy means that a company sells the new product at a relatively low price, in 
order to achieve a high market penetration quickly and ignite a contagion effect as 
positive feedback about the product spreads. Penetration is also the recommended 
strategy if there are strong experience curve effect s or economies of scale . 23 Toyota 
used a classic penetration strategy when it launched its luxury Lexus model in the 
USA. Although Lexus was an entirely new brand name and its advertising made no 
reference to Toyota, it became widely known that Lexus was a product from Toyota, 
which sells over one million cars annually in the US market. Toyota achieved strong 
 sales with its Corolla and Camry models, which had a sterling reputation for reliability and high resale values. But this was hardly a basis to believe that Toyota 
would be able to produce and market a car for the luxury segment. Toyota introduced the Lexus LS400 in 1989 at $35,000 and sold 16,000 vehicles in the fi rst year. 
Figure 7.10 shows the ensuing price increase s for the LS400 in the USA.
 The price increase d by 48 % over the succeeding six years. In the second year, 
 volume rose to 63,000 units as positive word of mouth from the early buyers started 
to spread. The LS400 was described enthusiastically in Consumer Report’s annual 
review as a vehicle which “combines advanced technology with almost every conceivable form of comfort, safety, and accessories, which make this the most 
23 According to the concept of the experience curve, unit costs fall by a certain percentage for every 
doubling of cumulative production volume . A low launch price leads to a more rapid doubling of 
the cumulative production volume and therefore to a more rapid reduction of unit costs. One 
speaks of economies of scale when unit costs decline as production volumes increase each period. 
 Fig. 7.10 Penetration strategy for the Lexus LS400 in the USA, 1989–1995 
 Penetration Strategy: Toyota Lexus 
146
highly- rated car we have ever tested.” The LS400 became the standard for a 
 favorable price-value relationship in its segment and consistently appeared at the 
top of customer satisfaction rankings. The original uncertainty whether Toyota 
could build a true luxury car had vanished. Toyota continually raised the prices for 
the Lexus models. The low introductory price helped ease the Lexus’s market entry 
and helped it both gain attention and start building its enviable reputation. This is a 
classic example of a penetration strategy . The price of $35,000 at launch was too 
low to maximize Toyota’s short-term profi ts, but we can still interpret it as an example of shrewd pricing. In contrast to its success in the USA, the Lexus never established itself in Germany. One reason for that could be the fact that luxury car prices 
in Germany are a stronger indicator of quality and status than they are in the USA. 
In such a situation, a penetration strategy will not work. 
 The risk in employing a penetration strategy is that one sets the launch price too 
low. This is an easy mistake to make with a new product. At the beginning of 2006, 
 Audi priced its new Q7 SUV model too low. It received 80,000 orders at the introductory price of 55,000 Euros ($71,500). The annual production capacity was only 
70,000 units. One could argue here that the waiting list made the car more desirable, 
but it may have also led to impatient customers ultimately buying a competitive 
model. 
 The toy company Playmobil launched its model of Noah’s Ark in Europe at 
69.90 Euros ($90.87). The product was soon sold on eBay for 84.09 Euros ($109), 
which is proof that the launch price was too low. 24 Hewlett Packard introduced its 
innovative Series 4 printer at the start of the 1990s at a price signifi cantly below the 
competitors’ prevailing prices. Within one month, it had reached its sales target for 
the entire year. H-P withdrew the printer from the market and later introduced a 
similar model at a much higher price. 
 Another example of low prices being a downfall occurred in online data storage. 
The British fi rm Newnet introduced an “uncapped service” at 21.95 pounds ($36.50) 
per month in 2006. The fi rst 600 customers exhausted the available capacity of 
155 MB. The company then hiked the price by 60 % to 34.95 pounds ($58). The 
Taiwanese computer manufacturer Asus launched the mini-notebook “eee” in 
January 2008 at 299 Euros ($388). The product sold out in a matter of days. In the 
launch period, the company could only satisfy 10 % of the actual demand. 
 Using a penetration strategy is recommended for experience goods. These are 
products which require a consumer to gain some experience with them in order to 
understand their true value. A low price at launch motivates more customers to give 
the product a try, and can create a multiplier effect if customers have a positive experience and start to comment on or even evangelize about the product. One could 
interpret the popular use of a “ freemium ” model on the Internet as a form of penetration strategy. Under such a model, a customer receives a basic version of a product 
free of charge, in the hope that as many “free” users as possible decide to upgrade to 
a premium, paid version. We will take a closer look at freemium models in Chap. 8. 
24 Ebay, December 8, 2003. 
7 Price Differentiation: The High Art
147
 Skimming Strategy: The Apple iPhone 
 Apple used a pronounced skimming strategy when it launched its revolutionary 
iPhone in June 2007. Figure 7.11 shows the price trend for the 8-GB version.
 The introductory price was set at $599. After a few months, Apple undertook a 
massive price cut to $399. What could have been the reasons for the original high 
price? The price of $599 signals high technical competence and quality as well as 
prestige. And despite that high price, long lines formed outside the Apple Stores. 
Another reason could be that Apple wanted to limit demand in the introductory 
phase because it had limited production capacity. One can also not rule out that 
Apple made a mistake. 
 The massive price reduction to $399 led to a sharp spike in demand. There is a 
signifi cant difference between offering the iPhone at $399 from the start and launching at a higher price, and then cutting it by $200 after a few months. Prospect theory 
says that the discount brings the buyer additional positive utility . The fl ipside is that 
some of the customers who purchased the phone for $599 became upset when the 
price suddenly dropped. They protested and Apple responded by issuing $100 gift 
certifi cates to these early buyers. The price of the iPhone continued to fall in the 
ensuing years. 
 Fig. 7.11 Skimming strategy for the 8-GB iPhone 
 Skimming Strategy: The Apple iPhone
148
 Apple ’s pronounced skimming strategy of tapping various levels of willingness to 
pay over time was driven not just by demand, but also by costs, which decreased due to 
technical advancements and also because of the veritable explosion in volume . Apple 
sold 125 million iPhones in its 2011/2012 fi scal year, generating revenues of $80.5 billion, or roughly half of Apple’s entire annual revenue. 25 Dividing revenue by volume 
gives us an average price per iPhone of $640. Interesting here are the statements regarding costs. According to IHS iSuppli, the manufacturing costs in 2012 ranged from $118 
for the 16 GB version to $245 for the 64 GB version. This enormous profi t margin helps 
explain while Apple could earn an after-tax profi t of $41.7 billion on revenues of $156.5 
billion, which corresponds to an after- tax return on sales of 26.6 %. This temporarily 
made Apple the world’s most valuable company, and the price strategy obviously played 
an essential role in the numbers and the outlook that drove that record valuation. 
 Apple supplemented its skimming strategy with continuous innovation and an 
expansion of its product line . This process is sometimes called “versioning,” the 
ongoing introduction of new versions. Each new version offers superior performance compared to the previous generation, which allows Apple to keep the prices 
for its devices relatively constant. This is a common strategy for personal computers. The price level for a PC does not change all that much over time, but each new 
generation brings better performance. In terms of price-value relationship , one can 
speak of a skimming strategy in this case, because the customer pays less and less 
over time for a unit of performance. 
 Some price developments may look like skimming strategies in the launch phase, 
but are actually desperate actions resulting from poor decisions. Nokia introduced 
its new Lumia 900 smartphone in the USA in 2012. The introductory price was $99, 
in combination with a 24-month mobile contract with AT&T . Only three months 
later Nokia cut the price to $49.99 and justifi ed it in a way that made it seem like 
skimming. “This move is a normal strategy that is put in place during the life cycle 
of most phones,” a Nokia spokesman said. 26 Was that really the reason? The price 
cut followed what analysts described as a “lackluster” start. In the three months 
between the launch of the Lumia and the announcement of the price cut, Nokia’s 
 share price fell by 64 %. In 2013, Nokia’s mobile phone business was sold to 
 Microsoft , marking the end of the independence of a once proud company that was 
 world market leader in mobile phones from 1998 until 2011. 
 This next case shows some other risks inherent in skimming strategies. In August 
2012 the pharmaceutical company Sanofi introduced its oncology drug Zaltrap in the 
USA at a price of $11,063 per month. The Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center 
in New York, one of the world’s leading cancer treatment centers, refused to buy it. 
“We are not going to give a phenomenally expensive new cancer drug to our patients,” 
the hospital said according to a report in the New York Times . 
27 Sanofi then reacted 
quickly with a heavy discount which essentially cut the price for Zaltrap in half. 28
25 Apple Annual Report 2012. 
26 Nokia Marks Lumia 900 at Half Price in the US. The Wall Street Journal Europe, July 16, 2012, 
p. 19. 
27 Cancer Care, Cost Matters. New York Times , October 14, 2012. 
28 Sanofi Halves Price of Cancer Drug Zaltrap after Sloan-Kettering Rejection. New York Times , 
November 11, 2012. 
7 Price Differentiation: The High Art
149
Misreading the market in that way is very unpleasant. The rapid reaction was 
 probably the only response Sanofi could have made under the circumstances. Careful 
analysis ahead of time is the only way to reduce the risk of such a mistake. 
 In a letter to me in 2003, Peter Drucker revealed his views on skimming 
strategies:
 I had a few days ago a seminar with one of the world’s largest branded consumer companies 
on pricing. They say that they fi nd it easy to cut prices if they set them too high, but very 
diffi cult to raise them if they set them too low. And they think that this is enough for a pricing policy . It does not seem to have occurred to them that the wrong price impairs market 
and market share. Yet these people enjoy the reputation of most successful marketers. 29
 That is a reminder of an old saying: “One can make a price cut only when one 
charged enough to begin with.” 
 Information and Profit Cliffs 
 After the cases in this chapter, no one should doubt that the high art of pricing lies 
in intelligent price differentiation . But it should also be clear that a company trying 
to practice this high art faces implementation hurdles and traps. So I will offer a 
stern warning: this topic should be handled with the utmost care. We’ll now take a 
short look at the most severe challenges and problems. 
 Well-thought-out price differentiation requires much more detailed information 
than one needs to set a uniform price . This means information about willingness to 
pay at the individual level, or at least the segment level. In the case of nonlinear 
pricing, one must know the marginal utilities for each additional unit. Without 
knowledge of willingness to pay as a function of time, location, or other criteria 
which will serve as the basis for differentiation, managers are stumbling around in 
the dark. Reaping the rewards of price differentiation is a “micro” task and not a 
“macro” one. It requires a microscopic perspective, not a rough or back-of-theenvelope calculation. Gut feeling, no matter how much experience may back it up, 
hits its limits on questions of price differentiation. 
 The reason one needs so much information is that one must understand willingness to pay at the individual level as narrowly as possible, in order to take advantage 
of it through a differentiated price structure . Only that effort and diligence let one 
shift from the profi t rectangle to the profi t triangle . If a company overshoots its 
target even by a tiny amount, a lack of detailed information is usually the cause and 
falling off a profi t cliff is usually the result. 
 Price differentiation requires a thorough understanding of the underlying theories, a very systematic collection and analysis of the right data, and the selection of 
the right differentiation models. Don’t get too euphoric about the promise of data 
from online transactions or from “Big Data.” These data contain information about 
actual transactions and their prices, but do not necessarily offer direct indications of 
29 Personal letter from Peter Drucker, June 7, 2003. 
 Information and Profi t Cliffs
150
a customer’s true underlying willingness to pay . 30 Yet this is precisely the 
 knowledge which is critical for effective price differentiation . In line with this 
reasoning, equity markets are also showing a certain amount of skepticism toward 
the profi t potentialof Big Data. 31
 Fencing 
 As the cases have shown, successful price differentiation requires the ability to 
separate customers effectively according to their willingness to pay . If a customer 
with a higher willingness to pay fi nds a way to buy a product at a low price, the 
seller’s attempt at price differentiation has backfi red. Price differentiation makes 
sense only when fencing works. A classic fencing technique used by airlines was the 
Saturday night stay-over. One could get a low-priced ticket only by staying over at 
least one Saturday night at the destination. It worked as an effective fence because 
business travelers will rarely stay at a destination until Sunday. They want to be 
home on the weekend. Leisure travelers, in contrast, often don’t mind staying the 
extra day or two. 
 Fencing is effective when the value difference between the two price categories 
is suffi ciently large and the seller can control access. That means that the highest 
 price category needs to offer correspondingly high value, and the value in the lowest 
price category is kept intentionally low. The French engineer Jules Dupuit noted 
this necessity way back in 1849. At that time, the lowest class passenger rail cars did 
not have a roof. “It is not because of the few thousand Francs which would have to 
be spent to put a roof over the third class-seats,” Dupuit explained. “What the company is trying to do is to prevent the passenger who can pay the second class-fare 
from traveling third class; it hits the poor, not because it wants to hurt them, but to 
frighten the rich.” 32 Effective fencing requires adequate gaps in value across the 
price categories. We see that same logic at work today when we look at the available 
legroom in economy class. 
 In order to erect an effective fence, pure price differentiation —which means 
charging different prices for the exact same product—is not suffi cient. Product 
modifi cations (versioning), the use of different distribution channel s, targeted messages to individual customers, access control, using different languages, and similar 
approaches are all legitimate options. Price differentiation needs to comprise several 
marketing instruments, which makes it more than pure pricing. It follows, then, that 
price differentiation also creates additional costs. 
30 There are exceptions. In a Vickrey Auction, similar to what eBay uses, the buyer has an incentive 
to reveal his or her true willingness to pay . 
31 Cukier K, Mayer-Schönberger V (2013). Big Data: A Revolution that Will Transform how We 
Live, Work, and Think. Houghton Miffl in Harcourt, New York; see also “The Financial Bonanza 
of Big Data”, The Wall Street Journal Europe, March 11, 2013, p. 15. 
32 Dupuis J (1962). On tolls and transport charges. reprinted in International Economic Papers. 
Macmillan, London (Original 1849) 
7 Price Differentiation: The High Art
151
 Pay Attention to Costs 
 In a perfect world, one would be able to ask each individual customer to pay his or 
her maximum price . This statement only applies, though, when we leave out the 
costs involved in price differentiation . It is realistic to assume that the costs for 
information, access control, or implementing an increasingly fi ner level of price 
differentiation rise disproportionately. At the same time, the profi t growth from each 
incremental price differentiation gets smaller and smaller. In the numerical example 
at the start of the chapter, our contribution rose by 33.3 % when we charged two 
prices—$90 and $120—instead of a uniform price of $105, assuming that we had a 
successful way to fence the two segments. If we instead use three prices, whose 
optimal levels are $81.50, $105, and $127.50, our profi t increase s by only 12.5 %. 
The profi t curve becomes fl atter as price differentiation increases, but the cost curve 
becomes steeper. This implies that there is an optimal level of price differentiation. 
It is not the maximum price differentiation that is optimal, but rather the extent that 
strikes the best balance between value and costs. This also implies that when going 
from the profi t rectangle to the profi t triangle covering the entire triangle is not 
worth the effort, once we start taking the costs of differentiation into account. 
 Pay Attention to Costs
© Springer International Publishing Switzerland 2015 153
H. Simon, Confessions of the Pricing Man, DOI 10.1007/978-3-319-20400-0_8
 8 Innovations in Pricing 
 Prices are as old as mankind. They existed long before the invention of money. They 
were not expressed in units of currency, but rather in exchange ratios among goods, 
a system we still know today as bartering . As children, my friends and I often played 
marbles, and we traded them. For a marble with a rare color, one would need to offer 
several marbles with more common colors. The price of a marble with a rare color 
was higher than the prices for the more common ones. 
 In light of the long history of prices, one would suspect that everything has 
already been discovered in this fi eld, all possibilities have been exhausted, and 
innovations are few and far between. But in the last three decades, the exact opposite has been the case. New ideas, systems, and methodologies are sprouting up all 
the time on how one can gather information about prices and set them. Some of 
these innovative approaches have their roots in theory. These include new research 
methods such as conjoint measurement and the revolutionary approaches which 
behavioral pricing offers to explain economic enigmas. Furthermore, modern information technology and the Internet create opportunities for pricing which until only 
recently were the stuff of dreams. 
 In this chapter we look at a selection of pricing innovations which have either 
established themselves already or have the potential to do so. I expect this wave of 
 innovation to continue. 
 Radical Improvements in Price Transparency 
 The most obvious price-related innovation on the Internet is the radical increase in 
 price transparency . This may also be the innovation with the most far-reaching 
impact, because it affects every industry. In the “old days,” one needed to visit a 
number of stores, call on numerous suppliers , ask for multiple bids, or read thirdparty reports in order to collect and compare price information . This process was 
tedious, diffi cult, and time consuming. It meant that many customers had only limited information about prices. Suppliers could implement and sustain glaring price 
154
difference s which went largely unnoticed. With the advent of the Internet, anyone 
can go online and comfortably put together an overview of the prices from different 
suppliers in a matter of minutes at no or very low cost. The number of sites which 
offer these kinds of price comparison s seems endless. 
 In addition to those services, which gather prices across many industries, there is 
a multitude of industry-specifi c sites performing the same function. If you want to 
travel, you can visit expedia.com, hotels.com, kayak.com , and orbitz.com, among 
others. The penetration of smartphones into our daily lives has added a local dimension to this price transparency . Apps allow you to scan a barcode in a store and fi nd 
out immediately what the same product costs at other nearby stores. This can 
severely restrict location-based price differentiation , which traditionally relied on 
spatial distance as an effective fencing mechanism. It will become more and more 
diffi cult to implement differentiated prices for identical products and services. 
Customers are simply too well informed and when in doubt they can buy the product elsewhere at a lower price. With the help of specialized sites such as alibaba.
com, fi nding the lowest price supplier for a product is no longer a problem even in 
China. It is certain that further innovations will come, each improving the price 
information at customers’ fi ngertips and increasing the competitive intensity and the 
 cross-price elasticity . 
 Pay Per Use 
 The traditional price model is that one buys the product, pays its price, and then 
owns and uses the product. An airline buys jet engines for its aircraft, a logistics 
company buys tires for its trucks, and a car manufacturer installs a painting facility, 
buys paint, and paints its cars. Taking a needs-oriented perspective creates a totally 
different basis for setting prices. The needs of the customers often do not warrant 
owning the product; they would rather have the benefi t, the performance, and the 
needs fulfi llment that the product provides. An airline does not have to own jet 
engines for its aircraft. It needs thrust. Similarly, the trucking company needs the 
performance of the tires, and the car manufacturer needs a painted car. Instead of 
charging a price for the product, a manufacturer or supplier can charge a price for 
what the product actually does. That is the basis for innovative pay-per-use or payas- you-go price models. 
 That explains why General Electric and Rolls Royce sell thrust, not engines, to 
their airline customers. In this model, they charge by the hour for performance. For 
a manufacturer this can mean a completely different business model , as it marks the 
transition from a product to a service business. The company no longer sells products; it sells services. Taking it one step further, these companies now offer a system 
which creates the potential for even greater revenue than their previous productbased business did. In GE’s case, the price per hour can comprise the operation of 
the jet engines, their maintenance, and other services. Their airline customers gain 
several advantages from this price model including reduced complexity, lower capital spending, and the elimination of fi xed costs and personnel. 
8 Innovations in Pricing
155
 Michelin , the world market leader in car and truck tires, was a pioneer with an 
innovative pay-per-use model for truck tires, a model which can appeal to all kinds 
of trucking fl eets from logistics to buses to waste management. The saying “imitation is the sincerest form of fl attery” applies to this pricing model. Other tire manufacturers have started to offer similar systems. Under this model, customers with a 
truck fl eet no longer buy tires. They pay per mile for the tires’ performance. This 
can give the tire manufacturers a higher level of value extraction than with the classic sales model. In Michelin’s case a new tire had a performance which was 25 % 
better than the previous model. It would be extremely diffi cult to charge a price that 
is 25 % higher. Customers are accustomed to certain price level s for tires, which 
form solid price anchor s over time. Deviations from these anchors will meet resistance, even if the new products perform much better. The pay-per-use model overcomes that problem. The customer pays by the mile for use of a tire, and if the tires 
last 25 % longer, the customer automatically pays 25 % more. This model allows 
the seller to extract the added value of benefi ts to a greater degree. The customers 
also benefi t: the tires cost them something only when the trucks actually roll, which 
means that the fl eet is generating revenue. If demand is weak and the truck remains 
parked in the lots, the tires don’t cost the company anything. This also simplifi es the 
business calculations of the truckers’ customers. They often charge their own customers by the mile, so it helps when their own variable costs (in this case, the cost 
of tires) are expressed in the same metric. 
 Similarly, Dürr , the world market leader in automotive paint plants, teamed up 
with BASF , the world market leader in automotive paints, to offer car manufacturers an innovative price model: they charge one fi xed price per car painted. This 
arrangement provides the car manufacturer a fi rm basis for its fi nancial calculations, 
because it transfers the price and cost risks to the suppliers . It also reduces complexity and the need for capital investment. EnviroFalk , a specialist for industrial water 
treatment, installs its units at its customers at no cost, and then charges them per 
cubic meter of water treated. These pay-per-use models give suppliers a cash fl ow 
they can plan on over time, and also allows them to fi nd an optimal coordination 
between plants/installations and the input materials. 
 This kind of model would not immediately come to mind for some industries, 
such as insurance, but even there it has begun to establish itself. Norwich Union , an 
insurance company in England, offered young drivers a pay-as-you-go insurance 
option. Once the appropriate hardware was installed in the vehicle for a one-time 
charge of £199, the driver paid a monthly basic fee which covers fi re and theft. The 
fi rst 100 miles per month were free. The price per mile driven after the fi rst 100 miles 
was 4.5 pence. For younger drivers between 18 and 21, the cost was £1 per mile in 
the particularly accident-prone hours of 11 pm to 6 am. The price difference was 
enormous and gave young drivers a very strong incentive to leave the car parked at 
night, when the risk of alcohol usage is high. 
 End-to-end solutions from one supplier can have a higher utility for customers 
because they offer more assurance and more effi ciency . The Australian company 
 Orica , the world market leader in commercial explosives, offers rock quarry companies a complete solution. Orica supplies not only the explosives, but also analyzes 
 Pay Per Use
156
the stone formations and does the drilling and blasting itself. In this comprehensive 
solution, Orica provides the customer with blasted rock and charges by the ton. The 
customer doesn’t have to take care of the blasting anymore. Each Orica solution is 
customer specifi c. It is hard for customers to compare prices and even harder for 
them to switch suppliers . For Orica, revenue per customer, effi ciency, and safety all 
increase, in addition to repeat business that drives a continuous revenue stream. 
 If one broadens this needs-oriented perspective, one can imagine many other 
opportunities for pay-per-use models. But they would not be cost effi cient to operate unless the supplier had information systems which can measure and relay usage 
data at low cost. For instance, there is no reason why someone needs to purchase a 
car or lease one at a fi xed price per month. One can charge for driving—for instance 
as a function of distance driven and time of day—the same way one charges for 
phone services or electricity. Car sharing businesses such as Zipcar , now owned by 
the Avis Budget Group, already lean in this direction. Pay-per-use or pay-per-view 
is also penetrating the media business. In cable television, one can charge for actual 
usage instead of a fl at monthly rate. The Korean company HanaroTV (now part of 
 SK Broadband ) quickly signed up one million customers with that kind of model. 
The pay-per-use model is also useful in facility management, for the operation of 
heating or air conditioning systems. Instead of daily or monthly rates, the facility 
management company could charge by actual usage or energy consumed. Similar to 
the model with truck tires, this system allows the suppliers to extract value more 
effectively and take a big step from the profi t rectangle to the profi t triangle . 
 Pay-per-use won’t succeed in every situation, though. Simon-Kucher & Partners 
worked with a manufacturer to develop a pay-per-use model for elevators in offi ce 
buildings. A very interesting question sparked the idea: Why do people pay for horizontal transportation (bus, rail, etc.) but not for vertical transportation? There is no 
inherent reason why they shouldn’t. In the spirit of the pay-per-use model, the elevator manufacturer would install the units for nothing, but in return would receive 
the long-term right to charge for elevator usage. To implement this, the tenants in 
the building would receive special cards to track elevator usage, or have the usage 
tracking built into the security cards already in use in the building. 
 This pay-per-use model allocates the cost of elevator usage appropriately and 
more “fairly” than the typical lump-sum models, which are incorporated either into 
the rent or added as a surcharge . Whoever rides more pays more. One can even differentiate the prices by fl oor, usage intensity, or other similar criteria. Admittedly, 
this model has not seen widespread adoption. Maybe it is too innovative? Investors 
and tenants need time to get used to such pricing innovations. 
 New Price Metrics 
 A very interesting approach to pricing is to change the measurement basis for 
the price, or in other words, change the “ price metric .” Some of the previous 
cases in this chapter involve a new price metric (e.g., per mile vs. per tire), but in 
most of them the company changed the business model , not just the price metric. 
8 Innovations in Pricing
157
One case from the building materials industry shows the potential that changing 
a price metric has. If a company sells cinder blocks for wall construction, it 
could charge by weight (price per ton), by space (price per cubic meter), by 
surface area (price per square foot), or for the complete installation (price per 
square foot of fi nished wall). For each metric, the company could charge very 
different prices and face very different competitive relationships. For example, 
with one new type of cinder block, a leading manufacturer’s price was 40 % 
more expensive than the competitors’ with tons or cubic meters as the price 
metric. But with square meters as the metric, the price difference was only about 
10 %. Because the new blocks weighed less and allowed a team to build the 
walls faster, the price per square meter for a fi nished wall conferred a price 
advantage of 12 %. This makes it clear that the manufacturer should try to 
switch the price metric for these new blocks to square meters of fi nished wall. 
The problem is that it is not always easy to implement such changes. The more 
innovative the product is or the stronger the manufacturer’s position is, the 
greater its chances to convince customers to adopt the new metric. 
 Hilti , the global leader for high-performance electric power tools, succeeded in 
changing the price metric s in an industry in which suppliers traditionally sell their 
products. Hilti introduced a “ fl eet management ” model for its tools: the customer 
pays a fi xed monthly price for its “fl eet” of Hilti tools. Hilti ensures that the customer receives the optimal set of tools for its set of jobs, including loaners if tools 
are being repaired, and upgrades as job needs and technologies change. Hilti also 
takes care of everything from repairs, battery exchange, and comprehensive service, 
which saves time at the jobsite and eliminates the need for the customer to track 
down repair quotes or incur unexpected expenses. Instead, the customer can count 
on a predictable, fi xed monthly price and can focus on its core competencies. 
 The advent of cloud computing has also given rise to new price metric s. Software 
is no longer sold on a license basis and then installed on-premise on the customer’s 
own machines. The new trend is toward Software as a Service (SaaS), with software 
offered online and on-demand for a fee. Microsoft ’s Offi ce 365 suite is no longer 
sold in the traditional way, but rather offered as a monthly or annual subscription. 
The Offi ce 365 Home Premium costs 10 Euros per month or 99 Euros per year. In 
return the customer receives immediate online access to the latest versions and a 
range of additional services. The fi rm Scopevisio offers medium-sized companies 
its software under a similar model. It asks a monthly price per application and user. 
This allows the customers to combine the various online applications into a package 
which perfectly fi ts their needs, with the ability to manage the number of users on a 
monthly basis as needs change. The monthly price varies accordingly. This model 
will likely become the standard for cloud-based application software. 
 Introducing a New Price Parameter: The Case of Sanifair 
 Sometimes a company has a lucrative opportunity to introduce a price parameter and 
charge for a previously free service. The operation of toilets in a public facility or an 
offi ce building requires considerable investment and results in high operating costs. 
 Introducing a New Price Parameter: The Case of Sanifair 
158
In restaurants, the usage of the restroom facilities is included in the price of the 
meal. So up until a few years ago, why was the use of bathrooms at a highway rest 
area free of charge as well, even when many of the guests never purchased any gas, 
food, or drink at the rest area? Who bears the costs when the customers, the users, 
receive the service free of charge? Decades ago in the USA, when pay toilets were 
common, customers themselves bore the costs, until some cities and states started to 
ban pay toilets in the 1970s and their installation in buildings fell out of favor. In 
Germany, the government was responsible for those costs at highway rest areas 
until 1998. A federally owned company managed the rest areas, whose toilets were 
in a condition I would like to forget. Then a private company called Tank & Rast 
took over the responsibility for rest areas from the federal government, massively 
upgraded them, and now licenses the operations for 390 rest areas, 350 gas stations, 
and 50 hotels along the German highway system, accounting for 90 % of such roadside services. In 2003 it introduced an innovative solution to the “toilet” question 
with the “ Sanifair ” concept. 
 First, Tank & Rast renovated all the restroom facilities to bring them to the most 
modern standards. Then they asked for a fee of 50 cents per use, but with a twist. 
Adults needed to pay the full amount to pass through a turnstile and enter the facility, but children and handicapped guests received a token to get in for free. This was 
a family-friendly form of price differentiation . But the 50 cents were not lost. The 
guests would receive a 50-cent coupon which they could spend at any store or restaurant at the rest area. This was an elegant way to differentiate among the guests 
who just wanted to use the toilet (and would now need to pay 50 cents for that privilege) and those who actually bought something. The latter group would still use the 
toilets for free. In 2010, Sanifair raised the price to 70 cents, and the guest receives 
a coupon for 50 cents. 
 Sanifair is innovative in a number of ways. First—and perhaps most importantly 
for the guests—it has improved the cleanliness and hygiene of the restrooms tremendously. Maintaining that standard results in costs, and the model does justice to 
that by asking the guests to pay a small amount for that leap in value. The prices are 
also differentiated in a number of ways. Children and handicapped users still have 
free access. People who solely use the restroom and drive away pay the full 70 
cents. But those who buy something receive a rebate of 50 cents, effectively a reimbursement of 71 % of the price they paid. Their net price is just 20 cents. The operation of the payment and access process requires no personnel. Guests pay cash at the 
turnstile machine and receive their printed coupon, while the children receive a 
token. Many studies have shown that despite the fact that they need to pay something, the guests have a high level of satisfaction. Sanifair even received a prestigious award for its innovation . Considering that about 500 hundred million guests 
stop at the German rest areas every year, Sanifair’s pricing and service innovations 
have made an essential contribution to the success of Tank & Rast . Companies 
within and outside Germany have begun to adopt the Sanifair system under license 
from Tank & Rast. 
8 Innovations in Pricing
159
 Amazon Prime 
 It seems as if every retailer in the USA offers some kind of loyalty card with perks. 
But few retailers charge a separate fee for the card or for access to the services and 
perks. Amazon offers its “Prime” program which guarantees delivery within two 
days with no separate shipping charges on over 20 million eligible items. The program today offers a range of other advantages and privileges, including unlimited 
access to over 40,000 movies and TV episodes with Prime Instant Video and a 
selection of over 500,000 books to borrow from the Kindle Owners’ Lending 
Library. 1
 The price for one year of Amazon Prime was $79 in the USA and 49 Euros 
(roughly $63) in the EU. The number of customers crossed the 10-million plateau 
in 2011. US customers in the program tripled their purchase volume with Amazon 
to $1,500 per year. In the USA, Prime customers generate an estimated 40 % of 
Amazon’s revenue. Nonetheless, it is said that the revenue from Prime probably 
does not cover the direct costs Amazon incurs. The costs per customer are estimated 
at $90. Amazon views the program as an investment in customer loyalty. “If they 
can make customers more loyal, they can make more profi t, even if they have to 
subsidize Prime,” one former Amazon manager said. 2
 In 2014, Amazon offi cially 
raised the annual price of Prime to $99, citing the fact that it hadn’t raised the price 
in nine years despite increases in fuel and transportation costs during that time. 
 Industrial Gases 
 Two-dimensional and multidimensional price systems are commonplace. In industries such as telecommunications , energy, and water supply, prices regularly consist 
of a fi xed base price and a variable price based on actual usage. In the case of industrial gases, which are sold in steel containers, there is a daily rate for renting the 
bottles, and a price per kilo for the gases. A customer who uses one bottle of gas per 
day therefore pays less per kilogram than a customer who takes 10 days to use up 
one bottle. In spite of offering the same scheme to each customer the actual price 
paid strongly differs signifi cantly according to usage intensity: a very smart scheme 
for price differentiation . 
 ARM 
 Two-dimensional models are also common in licensing. ARM, the world market 
leader in intellectual property for semiconductors, issues a license in exchange for 
a one-time fee and then takes a royalty on every chip shipped. ARM chips are found 
1
 E-mail to Amazon Prime customers in the US, March 13, 2014. 
2
 Woo S (2012) Amazon increases bet on its loyalty program. The Wall Street Journal Europe, 
November 15, p. 25. 
 ARM
160
in 95 % of all smartphones. Since 2000, the company’s sales have risen from $213 
million to $1.12 billion in 2013. 3
 In 2013 the average royalty per chip was 4.7 cents, 
not a high amount. But with about 12 billion chips per year this is adding up to a 
nice sum. About half of ARM’s business comes from licenses and royalties. 4
 An 
interesting alternative for them would be the BahnCard model, which means that 
they would collect an annual fee instead of a one-time upfront fee. All multidimensional price structure s contain some form of price differentiation , because the fi xed 
price gets allocated across different volume levels. An advantage of these systems 
is that a company makes the same price offer to all customers, but each customer 
pays a different amount according to his or her own actual usage. 
 Freemium 
 Freemium is a combination of the words “free” and “premium.” It describes a price 
strategy under which a customer can either get a basic version of a service for free 
or can purchase a premium version of the service. On the Internet, the number of 
 freemium business model s has risen sharply. The marginal costs for many Internet 
services are zero (or close to it), which means that the free offer does not cause 
incremental costs. “Freemium-like” models also existed in the offl ine world. Banks 
lure customers in with free checking accounts, but if the customers wants anything 
beyond basic services, they must pay. Admittedly, the free offers for the basic bank 
account often came with conditions, such as a minimum balance requirement . 5
 But 
such offers only look like freemium models. The customer pays because they earn 
little or no interest on their deposits. A similar hidden payment occurs with “zeropercent” fi nancing offers from retailers or car dealers. 6
 The fi nancing costs are hidden in the purchase price. 
 The goal of a freemium model is to use the free price to attract the largest number 
of potential customers. The company hopes that if the user becomes comfortable 
with the basic functionality, he or she will have a growing interest in paying for a 
version which is more powerful, and more advanced, or offers additional functionality. Freemium fi ts very well to experience goods, whose full value only becomes 
apparent when customers have had a chance to use the good. One could interpret 
freemium as a specifi c form of penetration strategy . Freemium is becoming more 
and more popular. Typical industries include software (e.g., Skype ), media (e.g., 
 Pandora ), games (e.g., Farmville ), apps (e.g., Angry Birds ), and social networks 
(e.g., LinkedIn ). 
3
 Financial Times, March 20, 2013, p. 14 and Fleissner L (2014) ‘Internet of Things’ gives ARM a 
boost. The Wall Street Journal Europe, April 24, 2014, p. 19. 
4
 Fleissner L (2014) ‘Internet of Things’ gives ARM a boost. The Wall Street Journal Europe, April 
24, 2014, p. 19. 
5
 Direct mailing from Commerzbank dated March 26, 2013. 
6
 Nicht jedes Angebot ist ein Schnäppchen. Null-Prozent-Finanzierungen werden für den Handel 
immer wichtiger. General-Anzeiger, Bonn, April 3, 2013, p. 6. 
8 Innovations in Pricing
161
 The key success factors for a freemium model are:
 1. An attractive basic offer : which can attract a lot of users. 
 2. The right fencing : between the basic and the premium offer, in order to convert 
fi rst-time buyers. 
 3. A customer loyalty concept : to turn the fi rst-time buyers into repeat customers, 
who have the highest lifetime value. 
 There is a trade-off relationship between the fi rst two factors. If the basic offer is 
too attractive, it will be hard to develop a clearly differentiated premium product 
and encourage customers to trade up to it. The company will defi nitely attract a 
large number of free users, but will struggle to convert them to paid users. On the 
other hand, if the basic version offers too little value, it may not attract enough free 
users at all. One may achieve a high conversion rate to the premium model in that 
case, but the absolute number of users remains small. The fencing between the basic 
and the premium versions is achieved through features, product versions, or differences in usage intensity. 
 In contrast, the communications software Skype offers a complete array of functionality, but restricts free calls to within its own network. It also offers instant messaging and fi le sharing free of charge within its network. If Skype users grow 
accustomed to the intuitive user interface, they are more likely to want to make calls 
to landline networks or cell networks, and also be willing to pay for those calls. 
When it began, Skype primarily sold individual talk minutes. Later on, it structured 
its service portfolio to resemble a classic telecommunications offering. The current 
paid offerings include bundles of minutes or fl at rate s for selected domestic phone 
networks. 
 Newspapers have introduced freemium models, after years of enduring the 
“free” culture for digital content. Newspaper websites used to earn their money 
online solely with advertising . In order to get money directly from readers as well, 
many publishers erected paywalls. The main fencing instrument here is not a better 
version of the product, but rather the reader’s usage intensity. The New York Times , 
for example, allows a reader to access 20 articles in a month free of charge. Whoever 
clicks through more often needs to pay. But print subscribers receive free access to 
the online version. The German newspaper Die Welt is also experimenting with 
paywalls. 7
 Each of those newspapers offers digital subscriptions for 99 cents per 
month, even though the list price s are between 4.49 and 14.99 Euros for Die Welt
and between $15 and $35 for the New York Times . The Kindle version of the New 
York Times costs $29.99 per month. The offers of 99 cents for a monthly subscription are not too far from being truly “free,” but the fact that these small amounts 
create a paid relationship makes a fundamental difference for the customer as well 
as the publisher. The largest hurdle in freemium models is getting customers over 
this initial price barrier, or getting them to cross the “ penny gap .” The challenge for 
the publishers is to draw customers away from the “free” culture and to establish 
7
 Axel Springer glaubt an die Bezahlschranke. Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, March 7, 2012, p. 15. 
 Freemium
162
their digital content as a paid experience. IBM manager Saul Berman has called this 
“the challenge of the decade.” 8
 Stephan Scherzer, the head of Germany’s newspaper 
publisher trade association, says that this is the “question which decides our future: 
How do the publishers get readers to pay for content online?” 9
 Right now there are 
few media companies that make their money entirely from content. One example is 
the French investigative and opinion portal Mediapart , led by former Le Monde
editor-in-chief Edwy Plenel. The portal charges a monthly subscription fee of 9 
Euros, has 65,000 subscribers, and generates revenue of 6 million Euros. This is a 
small amount, but the company is profi table and achieves a margin of over 10 %. 10
Mediapart accepts no advertising at all. 
 When Simon-Kucher & Partners began a project for a social network, only 8 % 
of its users were premium customer s. Using online price test s, we found out that 
 price change s would barely affect revenue. Because the company faced many comparable competitors—some with completely free offers—the number of premium 
users fell quickly in the tests after a price increase . Price cuts, in contrast, did not 
attract many new customers. The price elasticities were roughly 1. That means that 
price changes would be more or less revenue neutral, as volume changes tended to 
balance them out. What did have an effect, however, were changes to the portfolio 
and to the offers themselves. On the strength of better, more content-rich offers, the 
share of premium customers rose from 8 to 10 %. That represents a growth of 25 % 
and corresponded exactly to the increase in revenue. It was the network’s most successful project ever, and it confi rms the central role that usage plays. The usage 
difference between “free” and “paid” must be large enough to get customers across 
the penny gap . 
 In online gaming, the freemium model has become so popular that even classic 
game manufacturers have started to offer many games online for free, with the goal 
of earning money with individual features. Based on its popular Need for Speed
racing game, Electronic Arts has developed a freemium product called Need for 
Speed World . The player can use real money to purchase play money, which he or 
she can then use to buy additional cars or optional equipment to improve their cars’ 
performance. 
 From a company’s perspective, whether a freemium model is better than a conventional price structure or scheme depends on the competition, the target customers, 
and the product features. 11 The key metrics are conversion and the customer lifetime 
value of the premium customer s. A company can get several hundred dollars from 
such customers, whereas users of the basic product generate no revenue at all. A sys8
 Berman SJ (2011) Not for free – revenue strategies for a new world. Harvard Business Review 
Press , Boston. 
9
 Das nächste Google kommt aus China oder Russland. Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, March 18, 
2013, p. 22. 
10 Enthüllungsportal Mediapart bewährt sich im Internet. Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, April 4, 
2013, p. 14. 
11 A compact, good analysis of Freemium can be found in Uzi Shmilovici, The Complete Guide to 
Freemium Business Models. TechCrunch, September 4, 2011. 
8 Innovations in Pricing
163
tematic optimization of price and product using a freemium model typically increases 
revenues by about 20 %, according to Simon-Kucher & Partners ’ experience. 
 Media companies, however, can do very well without pursuing a freemium 
model. Simon-Kucher & Partners tested that hypothesis for a leading magazine in 
the USA, and ultimately recommended equal but slightly increased annual prices of 
$118 for its digital and online editions. The price for the bundle of digital and online 
was $148, a discount of 37 % against the combined price of $236, which is the sum 
of the two individual prices . After implementation, the average revenue per subscriber rose by 15 %, with no relevant loss of subscribers. One must note here, 
however, that this magazine enjoyed a very strong reputation. Customers are obviously willing to pay for it, and they perceive the combined access to the print and 
online versions as true added value. 
 Flat Rates 
 Flat rate is the modern term for a lump-sum price. A customer pays one fi xed price 
per month or per year, and can then use the product or service as much as he or she 
wants in that period. Flat rates are very widely used today in telecommunications 
and Internet services. Cable television subscribers generally pay one fl at rate per 
month to gain access to all available channels and watch them as often as they like. 
The BahnCard 100 is also a fl at rate offer. Cardholders can ride the rails as often and 
as far as they would like. Flat rates are very effective tools for price differentiation . 
Heavy users realize huge discounts when they have a fl at rate. For example, if someone travelled by rail so often that they would pay 20,000 Euros per year at regular 
prices, they would earn a discount of 79.6 % if they bought a second-class BahnCard 
100. This heavy usage is precisely the risk that companies face when they offer fl at 
rates. They should expect lower revenues from their heavy users, and potentially also 
higher costs (for example, additional investments in a telecommunications network). 
 Nonetheless, fl at rate s are among the most important innovations in pricing. We 
see monthly or annual pass es to museums, theaters, and fi tness studios all having a 
fl at rate character. The all-you-can-drink offers for soft drinks at fast food restaurants 
follow the same principle. The “all-inclusive” offers in tourism combine fl at rate elements (e.g., for food and drink) with price bundling . “All-you-can-eat” buffets are 
another example of fl at rate pricing. The risk for the restaurant owner is limited, 
because guests can only eat or drink up to certain personal limits anyway. In Japanese 
bars, a popular price model is a fl at rate which allows guests to eat and drink as much 
as they want during a certain period. The prices range from 1,500 yen (roughly $15) 
for one hour, 2,500 yen (roughly $25) for two hours and 3,500 yen ($35) for three 
hours. These fl at rates are particularly popular among Japanese students. The time 
limit helps reduce the bar owners’ risks. When I once tested this system in Tokyo I 
also had the impression that service was somewhat slower for fl at rate guests. 
 For telecommunications and Internet companies, fl at rate s can present a 
 problem. One European company offered its readers the following deal: for a fl at 
rate of 19.90 Euros (around $24.70), they would have unlimited free calling and 
 Flat Rates
164
also have unlimited free Internet usage. They would also receive a Samsung smartphone. 12 What is the problem with these fl at rates? One can only talk or surf for 
24 hours in a day, but data amounts know no limits. They continue to increase. The 
discussions around fl at rates in telecom and Internet businesses began in earnest in 
the late 1990s in the USA and soon spread abroad. Heavy users, who benefi t the 
most from such price models, intensifi ed their pressure on companies to offer more 
of them. On November 20, 2000, I made a presentation to T-Mobile entitled 
“Internet and Flatrate—Strategic Considerations.” I presented two theses:
• Thesis 1 : Flat rates mean that the vast majority of light users subsidize a small 
minority of heavy users. 
• Thesis 2 : Flat rates lead with a high probability to lower revenue and profi ts. 
From an economic standpoint, fl at rate s make no sense. 
 Whether one can still speak of a “small minority” of heavy users nowadays is an 
open question. As for the second and most important thesis, I still stand by those 
words today. 
 Data volume has been growing massively. Because of their fl at rate s, however, 
telecom companies have not participated in that growth the way they could have. 
Their revenues have stagnated. At the same time, they need to invest billions of dollars in new network infrastructure. They will not be able to harvest the fruits of these 
investments, though, because their fl at rate price policies have capped the maximum 
amount of revenue they can receive from an individual customer. I am not claiming 
that any single telecommunications company could have withstood the fl at rate 
wave on its own. The industry as a whole has done itself a disservice with fl at rates. 
In recent years more and more telecommunications companies stopped offering 
their customers contracts with unlimited data usage. I expect that such price strategies will become a new standard in the industry and offer the telecom companies a 
way out of the fl at rate trap. When I shared my two theses from above in 2013 with 
Rene Obermann, at the time CEO of Deutsche Telekom , the parent of T-Mobile , he 
admitted that such attempts to pull back “demonstrate that you and your team did in 
fact foresee this development in the year 2000.” 13
 From a consumer perspective, fl at rate s offer many advantages. Some consumers 
opt for a fl at rate, even when it is not their most economical choice. One reason is 
that a fl at rate acts as a kind of insurance policy. It limits the consumer’s out-ofpocket risk to the fi xed amount. When one treats the fl at rate as a sunk cost, the 
consumer’s marginal cost for voice or data usage is zero. One has the perception 
that these services cost “nothing.” They also avoid the “taxi meter” effect. From the 
perspective of prospect theory , every phone call or online interaction provides a 
 positive utility . We have these experiences daily, and their sum is greater than the 
 negative utility of the fl at rate, which we pay once a month. 
12 ADAC Motorwelt , March 2013, advertisingsection from tema. 
13 Letter to the author. 
8 Innovations in Pricing
165
 If consumption or usage is not constrained by some natural or artifi cial limits, 
companies should be very careful with fl at rate s. It is critical to have detailed information about the distribution of light vs. heavy users and to run rigorous simulations. Otherwise, one can experience a nasty surprise with fl at rates. If the number 
of heavy users is large, fl at rates put profi ts at considerable risk. 
 Prepaid Systems 
 Prepaid systems, which require users to pay for a service before they consume it, 
can be interpreted as a variation on advance sale or prerelease prices. Simon-Kucher 
& Partners supported the mobile phone service pioneer E-Plus with its pioneering 
launch of prepaid cards in the 1990s. Prepaid is now common at cafeterias and at 
shops such as Starbucks , which offers stored value cards and has built a loyalty 
program around them which also includes “gold” status that entitles the cardholder 
to discounts and free beverages. Starbucks does not publicize either the number of 
cards in circulation or the amount of money stored on them, but one indirect indication of their popularity is the amount of money Starbucks books as pure profi t from 
cards deemed lost or permanently inactive. For the fi scal year 2013, it booked $33 
million in extra profi t from stored card money considered “dead.” 14
 Typically with a prepaid card, a consumer either buys a card or loads up a free 
card (such as a Starbucks card) with a certain amount of money, and then draws the 
balance down with each purchase. The system has advantages both for seller and 
buyer. Because the customer has paid in advance (by loading money on the card), it 
eliminates the seller’s risk of nonpayment. The buyer knows how much he or she is 
spending and this precludes the risk of exceeding one’s budget. This is one reason 
why prepaid cards are popular in less affl uent countries. One disadvantage for the 
seller is that the relationship with the prepaid buyer is looser than one governed by 
an actual contract for a specifi ed time. One fi nds prepaid cards in unusual places in 
 emerging markets . In Mexico, the insurance company Zurich offers prepaid car 
insurance. One can buy a card that offers 30 days of insurance coverage, starting on 
the day the customer activates the card. 
 Customer-Driven Pricing 
 During the fi rst e-commerce wave in the late 1990s, there were big expectations for 
a new price model under which a customer would make an offer, and then the seller 
would decide whether to accept it. Whether it is called “ name your own price ,” 
“ customer-driven pricing ,” or “reverse pricing,” the process rests on the hope that 
the customer will reveal his or her true willingness to pay . The price offered by the 
customer is binding for him or her, and payment is secured because the customer 
14 Starbucks fi scal 2013 10-K. 
 Customer-Driven Pricing
166
must supply a credit card number or allow their account to be debited. As soon as a 
customer’s offer exceeds a minimum price threshold (known only to the seller), the 
customer gets the product and pays the offered price. One could describe the curve 
defi ned by aggregating these binding offers as the fi rst ever “real” demand curve in 
history, an interesting side effect of this price model. 
 The pioneer of the customer-driven price model was Priceline.com , founded in 
1998. Similar companies, such as IhrPreis.de 15 and tallyman.de in Germany, soon 
followed. In their early years, these companies offered a wide assortment of products. But it turned out that most customers named unrealistically low prices. Either 
these sites attracted only dedicated bargain hunter s, or consumers intentionally hid 
their true willingness to pay and instead tried to get products at extremely low 
prices. Either way, the model was not a lasting success. IhrPreis.de and tallyman.de 
disappeared after a short time. Priceline survived, but evolved into a conventional 
Internet retailer and now has revenues of around $5 billion. The “ name your own 
price ” model plays only a very marginal role, as a means for suppliers to dispose of 
excess inventory . Or as Priceline.com describes it on its own website: “The Name 
Your Own Price® service uses the fl exibility of buyers to enable sellers to accept a 
lower price in order to sell their excess capacity without disrupting their existing 
 distribution channel s or retail pricing structures.” 16
 Despite their theoretically interesting potential to reveal consumers’ real willingness to pay , these models did not fulfi ll expectations. One cannot rule out a comeback, though, or increased usage as a way for companies to clear inventories. 
 Pay What You Want 
 The “ pay what you want ” model takes customer-driven pricing one step further. 
Under this model, the buyer determines the price, but the seller is obligated to accept 
it. The music group Radiohead released its album In Rainbows online in 2007 with 
a “pay what you want” model. The album was downloaded over one million times, 
with 40 % of the “buyers” paying an average price of $6 apiece. 17 Occasionally one 
will see a restaurant, hotel, or other service business try a similar approach. After 
fi nishing the meal or checking out, the guest pays whatever price he or she wants to. 
From a pricing standpoint, the seller is entirely at the buyer’s mercy. In such situations, the seller may indeed see a certain number of customers pay prices that cover 
costs. Other customers will take advantage of the opportunity to pay little or 
nothing. 
 In contrast to zoos, museums, cinemas, or other facilities which also use such 
models, the hotels and especially the restaurants incur high variable costs which 
make the “ pay what you want ” model even riskier. In the worst case, some 
15 The author was a member of the board of IhrPreis.de AG. 
16 Investor relations homepage of Priceline, ir.priceline.com. 
17 van Buskirk E (2007) 2 out of 5 Downloaders Paid for Radiohead’s ‘In Rainbows’. Wired 
Magazine, November 5, 2007. 
8 Innovations in Pricing
167
customers do pay absolutely nothing. I am not aware of any case in which this 
model has established itself as standard practice. I consider the “pay what you want” 
model to be a pipe dream. One could interpret a donation as a variant of “pay what 
you want.” But in that case we are not talking about a “price,” because the donation 
brings no tangible obligation or benefi t in return. 
 There are two fundamental differences between the “ pay what you want ” and customer-driven price models. In the latter model, the seller can decide whether to accept 
or refuse the price the customer names, and that decision comes before any goods or 
services are exchanged. Under a “pay what you want” model, consumption can occur 
before payment is required or the price is set, or after payment, as in the entry to a zoo 
or a museum. And the sellers no longer have any decisions to make. One middle 
ground is the “ suggested price ,” a practice used by some museums in New York and 
Washington, DC. This is “pay what you want” with a hint. New York institutions seem 
to be moving away from the model, but it is still popular at many places and is in 
practice at multiple sites around the National Mall in Washington, DC. 
 But even in those cases, the operators or owners depend entirely on a customer’s 
goodwill. Whether a customer pays—and how much—is entirely up to that customer, with no other obligations or conditions. In short: businesses should avoid 
“ pay what you want ” systems. 
 Profit-Oriented Incentive Systems 
 In this book I have said on many occasions that over the long term, only a profi t 
orientation can serve as a rational guideline for pricing. Other goals—such as those 
based on revenue, volume , or market share —lead to less-than-optimal results. The 
same holds true for incentive system s. Despite this insight, revenue-based compensation remains the most commonly used form of incentive for salespeople. This 
tends to lead to discounts which are too high and prices which are too low. Under 
normal circumstances, the price which generates the maximum revenue is much 
lower than the price which maximizes profi t. If you have a linear demand curve and 
a linear cost function , the revenue-maximizing price is half of the maximum price , 
while the profi t-maximizing price lies at the midpoint between the maximum price 
and the variable unit costs. For our power tool business, you might recall that we 
had a maximum price of $150 and variable unit costs of $60. This means that we 
have the following “maximizing” prices:
– Revenue-maximizing price: $75, with a loss of $7.5 million 
– Profi t-maximizing price: $105, with a profi t of $10.5 million 
 The profi t difference between the two prices is abysmal. If salespeople are 
rewarded for maximizing revenue, we can assume that they will naturally make that 
their goal. To do otherwise would be irrational from their perspective. If one also 
empowers them to decide on price level s, prices will tend to decline, taking profi ts 
with them. Of course, in the power tool case, managers should establish some fl oors 
 Profi t-Oriented Incentive Systems
168
or limits to prevent the company from slipping into the red. But the trend in prices 
is still downward. So why are sales - or revenue-based compensation systems so 
common? This may have several reasons, from sheer habit to simplicity, to the 
desire to keep knowledge about profi ts and profi t margin s out of the hands of 
salespeople. 
 Instead of perpetuating these revenue-based plans, I strongly recommend that 
companies switch to profi t-oriented incentive plans. In making that switch, companies do not need to sacrifi ce simplicity or confi dentiality. One simple approach is to 
link the commission or incentive to the level of discount . The lower the discounts a 
salesperson grants, the higher his or her commission. At Simon-Kucher & Partners 
we have developed numerous plans of that kind for companies from a diverse set of 
industries. Normally the realized discounts drop by several percentage points, without any losses in volume or any customer defections. It helps when the salesperson 
can actually see the changes to his or her commission during the negotiations on 
their PC or tablet. That enhances the effect of this kind of incentive. Modern information technology plays an important role in the creation and maintenance of incentives. The actual form of the incentive and its parameters matter less than the fact 
that measures of profi t—not measures of revenue—are what determine a salesperson’s variable compensation. 
 Better Price Forecasts 
 In a commodity market, the individual supplier has no infl uence on prices. As I 
described in Chap. 1 with the farmers’ market and hog prices, the price refl ects the 
interaction of supply and demand . Does that mean that one is powerless from a price 
perspective and must sit back and wait to see what happens? Not necessarily! If one 
is able to know in advance which way the price will move, one can pull forward or 
postpone a sale; that is, one can sell more at higher prices and less at lower prices. 
 A large chemical company faced precisely that challenge. The salespeople visited their customers in the textile industry on a weekly basis and could exert some 
infl uence on the timing of orders. Together with the chemical company, SimonKucher & Partners developed a forecasting model for prices, which incorporated 
data about supply and demand as well as estimates which salespeople provided after 
each of their visits. Figure 8.1 shows the forecasts for 30 and 90 days.
 The company made these forecasts available to the salespeople. The key was 
understanding the timing in the forecasted price trend s. When will the price rise? 
When will it fall? If the model showed a forthcoming rise in prices, the instructions 
to the salespeople were as follows: “Sell less now; push out the purchase dates.” If 
the forecast showed a pending drop in prices, the advice was the opposite: “Sell 
more now; pull purchase dates forward.” The situation is similar to trading on a 
stock exchange. Whoever has better information over future trends will have an 
opportunity to make more money. These forecasts—and the resulting ability to 
improve transaction timing—were responsible for an increase of one percentage 
8 Innovations in Pricing
169
point in the company’s profi t margin , which is an enormous improvement in a commodity business. 
 Intelligent Surcharges 
 Many pricing innovations which we observed or initiated at Simon-Kucher & 
Partners over the last few years were based on surcharges. One can divide surcharges into several categories, depending on the form and the intent:
– Unbundling : A product or service previously included in the total price is now 
priced separately, in the form of a surcharge or an additional payment. 
– New price components : A product or service which never had a price before now 
gets a stand-alone price. This creates a new price component. The Sanifair concept is a good example. 
– Passing on cost increases : A company passes along cost increases to its customers in the form of a surcharge , usually tied to some form of index defi ned in the 
contract. 
– Price differentiation : The surcharge is used as a means to differentiate prices, 
based on time, geography, personal characteristics, etc. 
 Ryanair is particularly creative in inventing and collecting surcharges. In 
2006, the no-frills airline became the fi rst airline worldwide to charge separately for checked baggage, at the time a radically new and controversial move. 
Back then customers needed to pay 3.50 Euro (about $4.50) for each checked 
bag; nowadays the price per piece (up to 20 kg) is 25 Euro ($32.50) in the slow 
 Fig. 8.1 Price forecasts for a commodity chemical 
 Intelligent Surcharges
170
season and 35 Euros (around $45) in peak travel periods. Ryanair does not provide a detailed breakdown of its net earnings from this surcharge , but the airline 
fl ies more than 100 million passengers per year. 18 Even if only a small percentage of passengers check their bags, Ryanair earns hundreds of millions. Ryanair 
chose a surprising way to communicate the introduction of the checked-bag fee: 
“This will reduce the overall ticket price for passengers not checking in bags by 
about 9 percent.” Who can oppose a checked-bag fee after that? In addition to 
the low base fare, to which customers pay close attention and which has a high 
 price elasticity , Ryanair has thought up a long list of surcharges, which people 
pay less attention to and which therefore have a lower price elasticity. They 
charge a credit card fee of 2 % and an administrative fee of 6 Euros. Reserving 
a seat costs 10 Euros, and bringing sports equipment or a musical instrument 
with you would cost 50 Euros. The list goes on and on. If a passenger does not 
book online, the surcharges are even higher. From time to time Ryanair CEO 
Michael O’Leary threatens to introduce even more surcharges, such as for using 
the toilets on the plane, but doesn’t always follow up. Perhaps Ryanair passengers are very thankful for that. 
 Surcharges are an appropriate way to take advantage of higher willingness to pay 
in peak periods. A passenger railroad could introduce surcharges for travel on Friday 
afternoons or on Sunday evenings. These surcharges would have two effects: they 
would increase the company’s profi ts and also damp demand, which lowers the 
chances that trains will be overbooked or overfi lled in those peak travel times. Price 
cuts in off-peak periods often have little effect, but price increase s in peak periods 
can have a signifi cant effect. We see these kinds of asymmetries in time-based price 
differentiation in a number of industries. 
 When a company offers its customers additional value, surcharges provide a way 
to extract some of that value. If Air France passengers want a seat in an emergency 
exit row, they need to pay 50 Euros ($65) for that privilege. If the fl ight lasts longer 
than nine hours, the surcharge is 70 Euros (around $90). Air France waives the fee 
for its gold and platinum cardholders. Other airlines have adopted similar surcharges. 
The added value of more space is clear. Why shouldn’t customers who want that 
added value pay something for it? This is also a wonderful fencing mechanism. 
 Often the value of a product depends on how quickly it becomes available or how 
quickly a customer can access it. If a dump truck at a mine has a damaged tire, the 
truck is unusable. Every hour that the truck stands idle, the mining company loses 
revenue. The faster the company can get a new tire delivered and installed, the 
shorter the downtime. This implies that the mining company would be willing to 
pay for faster service. That is refl ected in the price model for a leading manufacturer 
of tires for heavy-duty industrial vehicles. The standard delivery time varies by type 
of tire. Tires in high demand are stocked at warehouses and are always available. 
For those tires, the company charges nothing extra for immediate delivery. Delivery 
times for less common tires can be several days. If the customer wants faster 
18 http://www.ryanair.com/en/investor/traffi c-fi gures
8 Innovations in Pricing
171
delivery, the tire company charges extra. This example shows how surcharges can 
help a company use this model of availability to earn money from better or faster 
services. 
 Passing along higher costs through a change in the normal product price is often 
diffi cult. But if a company introduces a surcharge for certain cost parameters, that is 
usually more palatable for customers. Rising fuel costs prompted a pharmaceutical 
products wholesaler to tack on a fuel surcharge to its prices. Competitors followed. 
Margins in this industry are extremely tight, at less than 1 %, so this surcharge 
boosted returns by 30 %. A British ready-mix concrete company instituted a surcharge of £70 ($115) per delivery truck on weekends and £100 ($165) per delivery 
truck at night, on top of the base price of £600 (ca. $1,000). A German company in 
the same industry demands a surcharge of 8 Euros per cubic meter for deliveries 
when temperatures are below freezing. 
 Another interesting idea is to offer additional services in exchange for a 
 surcharge . The luxury Jumeirah Beach Hotel in Dubai allows guests to use its 
executive lounge for a fee of roughly $50 per day. That price includes breakfast in 
the lounge, which would cost around $37.50 separately. That means that the net 
surcharge for a day’s lounge usage is $12.50. The offer is popular and increases the 
hotel’s revenue per guest. 
 We could view tips as a special form of surcharge , or even a variant of “ pay what 
you want .” In some countries, such as Japan and Korea, tipping is not customary at 
all. In other countries, it has the character of a de facto surcharge. One “must” tip 
15 % in American restaurants, though one may pay more. Some restaurants make 
this tip obligatory, at 15 or 18 %, for groups above a certain size. Up until a few 
years ago, taxi drivers in New York accepted only cash, and the guest decided how 
much to add as a tip. The average amount was around 10 %. The drivers then began 
to accept credit cards. The guest now needed only to swipe his or her card in the 
reader, which is installed within easy reach. Then the guest can choose the amount 
of the tip manually, with three default options available to press on the touch screen: 
20, 25, and 30 %. After the introduction of this system, the average tip rose to 22 %, 
which corresponds to additional annual income of $144 million for New York’s taxi 
drivers. 19 Not bad, and all because of smart pricing! 
 Surcharges are also a way to make some alternatives less attractive and steer 
customers to others. In 2002, Lufthansa Cargo introduced a surcharge of 5 Euros for 
traditional bookings, and pushed electronic bookings with the slogan “e for free.” 
These measures massively increased the share of electronic bookings. Once customers grew accustomed to making their bookings online, Lufthansa Cargo eliminated the surcharge for traditional bookings. 
 Normally the price elasticity for surcharges is lower than the elasticity for the 
 base price . But sometimes we see the opposite effect. As of 2010, all public German 
health insurance companies received a uniform amount per person/member they 
covered. Companies for whom those amounts were not suffi cient to cover their 
costs needed to surcharge their members directly if they wanted more revenue. 
19 www.slate.com/blogs/moneybox/2012/05/15/taxi_button_tipping.html . May 15, 2012. 
 Intelligent Surcharges
172
Some instituted monthly surcharges. Even though these surcharges—typically 8–10 
Euros—were very small relative to the base contribution members paid each month 
via a payroll deduction, their introduction met with strong resistance. The insurers 
who added the surcharges lost so many members that they ended up in fi nancial 
diffi culties. The CEO of the largest public insurance fund said that “[t]he additional 
surcharges sent a strong price signal with little positive fi nancial impact. Instead, 
they caused signifi cant shifts in membership to competitors. As an instrument to 
raise revenues, the surcharges proved ineffective.” 20
 There are psychological explanations for these strong negative effects. The members perceive the difference between a price of zero (no additional surcharge ) and an 
additional price as something negative, even if the additional price is very small relative to the total price. Furthermore, members did not have a sense of the actual premiums they paid, because the public insurance companies expressed their “prices” 
for many years as a percentage of a member’s income rather than in Euros and cents. 
That “price” was paid in part by the employee (member) and the employer. It then 
appeared as a largely inexplicable entry among many others on the monthly payroll 
stub. In contrast, the member would need to pay the surcharge directly, out of his or 
her own pocket. In terms of prospect theory , the perceived negative utility is high. 
 The rental car company Sixt also met with resistance when it tried to levy a surcharge on all kilometers driven beyond 200 (ca. 120 miles). After complaints and 
protests from customers, Sixt withdrew this surcharge. Deutsche Bahn has also misfi red with surcharges. It tried to charge an additional 2.50 Euros for all tickets issued 
in person at a ticket counter. In this case, not only customers but also leading politicians complained, prompting the company to rescind the surcharge after two weeks 
 Bank of America experienced a similar disaster when it tried to charge customers a 
monthly fee of $5 for their debit cards. Customers became so upset that the bank 
lost 20 % more customers than it had the previous year. 21 After a short time, the 
bank withdrew the surcharge . Only through carefully planned and executed market 
research does a company stand a chance of avoiding such damage to its image. 
 à la Carte Pricing 
 Whoever used to buy music on a CD needed to buy the entire album, with an average 
of 14 songs. This is an example of pure bundling . Unless a music company released a 
single, one could not buy a title individually. Much like fi lm studios in the days of 
“ block booking ,” a typical album would have a mix of more attractive and less attractive songs. In this manner, the record companies transferred the excess willingness to 
pay for the top titles to the other tracks on the album, as described in our earlier section 
on price bundling . The customer usually had no other choice than to buy all the songs 
20 Wir müssen effi zienter und produktiver warden. Interview with Christoph Straub. Frankfurter 
Allgemeine Zeitung, January 30, 2012, p. 13. 
21 Bertini M, Gourville J (2012) Pricing to create shared value. Harvard Business Review, June 
2012, pp. 96–104. 
8 Innovations in Pricing
173
together. Many customers hated the fact that they had to buy 14 songs, even though 
they only wanted two or three. The desire for an alternative model was clearly there. 
 When Apple opened its iTunes stores on April 28, 2003, it used an innovative “à 
la carte” price model. Customers could now buy each track individually. It is said 
that Steve Jobs personally visited the heads of all the major record companies, in 
order to get the rights to sell the songs on iTunes and to use à la carte pricing . This 
led to an unbundling of music which later included price differentiation . The iTunes 
library offers 35 million titles, including music, ebooks, apps, movies, and other 
titles. Music tracks cost 69 cents, 99 cents, and $1.29. Other products and titles fall 
into different price categories, and iTunes also offers weekly specials. At one point, 
iTunes sold 24,000 music tracks every minute, around the clock, 7 days a week. It 
controlled two-thirds on the online music market, which in 2013 made up 34 % of 
the total market for recorded music. 22 In the fi rst 10 years of the platform, customers 
had downloaded more than 25 billion songs. 
 The innovative price model played a signifi cant part in the spectacular success of 
iTunes, but it offers no guarantee for future success. Spotify , Pandora , and Google 
have all offered music streaming services for a fl at rate in the form of a monthly 
subscription. Apple has since countered with iTunes Radio, and has long offered an 
option called “complete my album” which allows users to add all the remaining 
songs from one album at a fi xed price with a small bundle discount . This makes 
users feel like they are getting a deal. 23 But competition continues to grow. Sirius 
XM Radio had over 25 million subscribers in 2013 for its satellite radio service. 
Spotify had 20 million paid subscribers and 75 million active users in 2015. Beats 
Electronics , most famous for line of headphones, launched a music streaming service which offers over 20 million titles and has an exclusive family plan deal with 
 AT&T Mobility, which is bundling the plan with its smartphone services. In May 
2014, Apple announced plans to purchase Beats Electronics for $3.2 billion. Times 
and price schemes keep changing. 
 Harvard Business Review Press 
 The à la carte model fi ts well in many industries. Harvard Business Review Press 
sells individual book chapters and individual articles from Harvard Business Review
(HBR) at a price of $6.95 each. Other publishing companies have adopted a similar 
model. This is a very attractive model for those customers with an intensive interest 
in one topic or aspect. That should give the publishers cause to rethink their overall 
price strategies. An annual subscription to Harvard Business Review costs either $89 
for print and online or $99 for “all-access” across mobile platforms. 24 If someone 
reads fewer than 13 articles in a year, it makes more sense for them to buy à la carte. 
If someone only needs or reads six articles, they save 53 % with the à la carte model 
22 Theurer M (2013) Herrscher der Töne. Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, April 20, 2013, p. 13. 
23 Apple ’s Streaming Music Problem. Fortune , April 8, 2013, pp. 19–20. 
24 Prices quoted in the HBR.org website in May 2014. 
 Harvard Business Review Press 
174
vs. an annual subscription. The à la carte price model does carry risks and must be 
introduced carefully and with forethought. 
 Auctions 
 One of the oldest forms of price setting are auctions. This book began with the 
description of one, at a farmers’ market. It seems as if prices for agricultural products, fl owers, commodities, art, and public contracts have always been set with the 
help of auctions. Auctions come in many forms, each designed to fi t a particular 
situation or challenge. 25 Their importance has grown in recent years, and they have 
also undergone a lot of innovation . This is due in part to massive government auctions of telecommunications bandwidth, energy rights, and exploration rights in the 
oil and gas industry. Companies are using them more often in procurement as well. 
Starting in 2013, Tank & Rast used a new auction process to sell the rights for fuel 
delivery at more than 100 of its highway gas stations. 
 The Internet has helped drive the usage and appeal of auctions. The most widely 
known example is eBay . The highest bidder wins the auction on eBay, but they pay 
the bid of the next-highest bidder plus a small differential. This is almost identical 
to an auction process already used by Johann Wolfgang von Goethe around 1,800. 
He would sell his manuscripts to the highest bidding publisher, who would then pay 
the price of the second-highest bidder. Columbia University professor William 
Vickrey proved that it is optimal for a bidder in these auctions to reveal his or her 
maximum willingness to pay . He won the Nobel Prize for this fundamental insight 
in 1996 and that form of auction now bears his name. 
 Google uses a clever auction system for selling advertising space, which takes 
into account the utility of the ad for the search-engine user as well as the willingness 
to pay of the advertiser. Google also provides the advertisers key data on advertising 
 effi ciency . The system was developed by the renowned economist Hal Varian, who 
has been Google’s chief economist since 2007. 
 In auctions the idea is normally to extract the maximum willingness to pay from 
the bidder. For public contracts, other goals can take precedence, such as ensuring 
the fi nancial viability of the participating companies, securing energy supplies, or 
avoiding capacity constraints. In order to achieve such goals, economists develop 
special “market designs.” 26 Sometimes these auctions can lead to very high prices. 
In 2000, mobile phone service companies in Germany paid a combined total of 50 
billion Euros ($65 billion) for the rights to UMTS bandwidth in a government auction . In the Netherlands, a bandwidth auction in 2013 netted 3.8 billion Euros 
(ca. $5 billion), much more than expected. In the Czech Republic, regulators broke 
25 Krishna V (2009) Auction theory. Elsevier Academic Press, London and Klemperer P (2004) 
Auctions: theory and practice. Princeton University Press, Princeton. 
26 Ockenfels A, Wambach A (2012) Menschen und Märkte: Die Ökonomik als 
Ingenieurwissenschaft. Orientierungen zur Wirtschafts- und Gesellschaftspolitik (4): pp. 55–60. 
8 Innovations in Pricing
175
off a bandwidth auction in the spring of 2013 after they started to worry that the 
winning bidders may lack the funds to make the necessary investments in new infrastructure. Mobile phone network operators are now fearing bandwidth auctions, and 
the CEO of one of the largest players did confi rm to me that these auctions represent 
a very diffi cult problem for his industry. Auctions and market designs are some of 
the most innovative areas in modern economic research. We can assume that more 
and more prices will be set through auctions tailored to the unique circumstances of 
a market at that time. 
 Auctions
© Springer International Publishing Switzerland 2015 177
H. Simon, Confessions of the Pricing Man, DOI 10.1007/978-3-319-20400-0_9
 9 Pricing in Crises and Price Wars 
 Crisis: What Does That Mean? 
 In the context of this book, we consider a crisis to be a collapse in demand. This has 
several consequences for pricing. Unlike a market with a balance between supply 
and demand , a crisis induces a “buyer’s market.” The balance of power has shifted 
in favor of the buyers. Basic indicators of such a situation are the following:
– Capacity utilization : Internally, a company’s production capacity and its employees are underutilized; this can result in furloughs, job cuts, or wage cuts. 
– Inventory : Unsold goods pile up in warehouses, factory lots, or at resellers. 
– Price pressure : Arises when customers try to take advantage of the new balance 
of power or when competitors start undercutting each other. Price pressure also 
increases internally as the urge grows to clear out unsold inventory . 
– Selling pressure : The sales force gets pushed harder and harder to sell more units 
at the same time when buying resistance from the customers grows. It becomes 
more diffi cult for salespeople to meet their targets. 
 These developments of supply and demand lead to massive effects on prices. 
A crisis causes one or more profi t driver s—price, volume , and cost—to develop to 
the company’s detriment. At prevailing prices, volume falls. The company may feel 
the need to reduce its own prices as a reaction either to reduced demand or to price 
cuts by competitors. 
 To show the negative effects on profi t, let’s return once more to our power tool 
case. This time around we are on defense instead of offense. Our starting situation 
is a price of $100, variable unit costs of $60, fi xed costs of $30 million, and sales of 
one million units. Figure 9.1 shows how profi t drops if either price or volume falls 
by 5 %.
 Cutting prices by 5 % leads to a 50 % drop in profi t, much greater than the 20 % 
profi t decline we would see if volume fell by 5 %. From a profi t perspective, it is better 
in a time of crisis to suffer a volume decline than a price decline . The reason for this 
178
is easy to understand. The price decline has a full, direct impact on profi t. The profi t 
margin —which includes an allocation of fi xed costs —falls by half, from $10 per unit 
to just $5. Because volume and variable costs do not change, and fi xed costs don’t 
change anyway, the profi t likewise falls by half. The situation is much different, 
though, when volume falls by 5 % (or 50,000 units) but price remains constant. The 
drop in volume means that variable costs fall by $3 million (60 × 50,000), so that total 
profi t decreases by only $2 million instead of $5 million. 
 Confront managers with the statements above as they need to choose between 
Alternatives A and B below, and you get an explosive debate. 
Alternative A : Accept a price cut of 5 % and volume remains constant. 
Alternative B : Accept a volume reduction of 5 % and price remains constant. 
 I have discussed these two alternatives with many managers at seminars and 
workshops. Almost all of them lean toward Alternative A, even though the profi t is 
$3 million lower. The managers generally present the same arguments, namely that 
 volume , market share , and staff utilization are higher in Alternative A. One avoids 
the need for furloughs or outright staffi ng cuts. We already examined this fundamental goal confl ict between profi t and volume in Chap. 5. Under normal circumstances, managers tend to show a preference for a “lower prices, constant volume” 
alternative, but this tendency becomes more pronounced in a time of crisis . The 
effort to keep sales and capacity utilization up, and keep people at work, takes precedence. But in a time of crisis, that can be precisely the wrong approach. 
 The case of our power tool business—where either price or volume drops, but 
not both—is bad enough. But it is relatively harmless when compared to a crisis in 
which both price and volume fall by the same percentage. Figure 9.2 shows this 
devastating impact.
 If both volume and price fall by 5 %, revenue drops by 9.75 % and profi t plunges 
by 67.5 %. If both price and volume drop by 20 %, revenue declines by 36 % and 
we post a loss of $14 million. If price and volume both fall by 30 %, revenue will 
plummet by 51 %. These declines may seem extreme at fi rst glance, but such acute, 
life-threatening declines were not uncommon in 2009, the worst year of the Great 
 Recession . 
 Fig. 9.1 Effects of a price or volume decline 
9 Pricing in Crises and Price Wars
179
 Cut Volume or Cut Price? 
 How should one respond to a crisis ? Is it better to cut prices or to accept a decline 
in volume ? The statements below—from two CEOs in the automotive industry—
show just how different the opinions are on questions of price and volume management in a time of crisis. 
 Richard Wagoner, the former CEO of General Motors , said: “Fixed costs are 
extremely high in our industry. We realized that in a crisis we fare better with low 
prices than by reducing volume . After all, in contrast to some competitors, we still 
make money with this strategy.” 1
 Former Porsche CEO Wendelin Wiedeking represented the exact opposite end of the spectrum with this statement: “We have a policy 
of keeping prices stable to protect our brand and to prevent a drop in prices for used 
cars. When demand goes down, we reduce production volume but don’t lower our 
prices.” 2
 He went a step further when he noted: “One thing is clear to us: we are not 
going to pump the market full of cars when there is no demand for them. We always 
want to produce one car less than the market demands.” 3
 Both executives spoke about a crisis -induced decline in demand and came to the 
exact opposite conclusions:
– General Motors lowers its prices, in order to prevent or lessen a decline in the 
production volume . 
– Porsche lowers its production volume , in order to prevent or lessen a decline in prices. 
1
 Statement at the International Automobile Show in Frankfurt in September 2003. 
2
 Comment provided by Georg Tacke, CEO of Simon-Kucher & Partners , who told the author 
about his conversations with Wendelin Wiedeking. 
3
 Sportwagenhersteller Porsche muss sparen. Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, January 31, 2009, p. 14. 
 Fig. 9.2 Revenue impact of a simultaneous percentage decline in price and volume 
 Cut Volume or Cut Price?
180
 Our previous analysis indicated that from a profi t standpoint, it is better to accept 
a volume decline than a price cut. Yes, managing volume is an important measure 
in times of crisis . But what is the right choice? The laws of economics show their 
merciless power here. If a company or an industry throws too much product into the 
market, lower prices and lower margins are unavoidable. The problem begins in the 
factory. If there is pressure to keep people working and to produce the corresponding amount of goods, this excess will suppress prices. Low variable unit costs and 
high fi xed costs , which are a blessing in good times, become a curse in a crisis. High 
fi xed costs need to be spread across the largest possible number of goods. At the 
same time, low variable unit costs mean that it is still possible to get a positive unit 
contribution despite low prices. All of these factors conspire to put formidable pressure on the sales force, which uses price concession s to try to move the required 
volumes. 
 One objective during a crisis must be to defuse this vicious volume and supply 
cycle as quickly as possible. Many companies in various industries did this in 2009, 
reacting in a calm and cool manner as the crisis deepened. They introduced shorter 
work shifts and closed factories. Almost all car companies reacted that way. The 
global chemical giant BASF shut down production at 80 plants around the world. 
Arcelor-Mittal, the world market leader in steel, reacted even sooner, curtailing production by one-third as early as November 2008. 4
 US-based airlines followed suit in 
June 2009, when Delta said that it would trim foreign capacity by 15 % and domestic capacity by 6 %. American Airlines , in turn, reduced its capacity by 7.5 %. 5
 The 
champagne industry in France saw demand fall by 20 % in 2009. But instead of 
cutting prices, the vintners in the Champagne region left one-third of their grapes in 
the fi elds. That allowed them to keep the price level relatively stable. Those are all 
intelligent moves. But sometimes a price cut is nonetheless unavoidable. 
 Making Intelligent Price Cuts 
 “One of the most important decisions in this recession is what to do about prices. In 
booms you don’t have to get pricing exactly right. Now you do!” wrote Fortune
editor and columnist Geoff Colvin in 2009. 6
 During a crisis , price becomes an 
extremely important yet incompletely understood tool. An indispensable prerequisite for intelligent pricing is a precise understanding of the relationship between 
price and volume . What has changed since the crisis hit? Will price change s have 
different effects in the crisis than under more normal or stable circumstances? The 
most common reactions in a crisis are also the most incorrect ones: cutting prices or 
increasing discounts. How can we explain this counterproductive behavior? In most 
cases, again, the primary motivation is the desire to protect existing volume levels 
and keep employee utilization at levels which do not require furloughs or job cuts. 
4
 Hoffnung an den Hochöfen. Handelsblatt, February 12, 2009, p. 12. 
5
 The Wall Street Journal, June 12, 2009, p. B1. 
6
 Colvin G (2009) Yes, you can raise prices. Fortune , March 2, 2009, p. 19. 
9 Pricing in Crises and Price Wars
181
 A volume crisis means that a company sells fewer units at the same price. But by 
no means is the opposite true: it does not mean that a company can sell the same 
number of units as before if it cuts its prices. That is a grand illusion which is rarely 
fulfi lled. Why is that true? There are two reasons. First, the crisis has altered the 
 demand curve , shifting it downward, which means that a company doesn’t sell as 
many units as it used to at a certain price. The previous demand curve no longer 
applies. Second, price cuts or steeper discounts do not yield the desired upturn in 
 sales , because competitors are also cutting their prices. This fact alone dashes any 
hopes the company may have had of increasing its market share or defending its 
previous volume. It is not true that high prices discourage consumers from buying 
during a crisis; they stop buying altogether because they perceive high uncertainty 
and hoard their cash. A price cut within normal ranges does little to alleviate this 
uncertainty. It therefore stands to reason that one should refrain from using price 
aggressively during a crisis. The most likely consequence is that the company starts 
a price war which doesn’t increase anyone’s volumes, but ruins margins for a long 
time. On the other hand, it is also an illusion that one can navigate an entire crisis 
without making any price concession s at all. 
 If there is no way to avoid a price cut or a price concession any longer, then one 
should structure the price cut in such a way that it minimizes the negative margin 
effects and maximizes the positive volume effects. Suppliers have asymmetrical 
interests depending on whether they are raising or cutting prices. In an ideal case, a 
customer should not notice a price increase . For a price decrease , the more the customer notices it, the greater the positive volume effect will be. This places the onus 
on the supplier to use communications to increase the price elasticity of the product 
or service. Empirical studies have shown that a volume increase from a price cut is 
signifi cantly higher when the action is supported with special price-oriented advertising , additional placements, or special signage. This volume increase is more necessary than ever during a crisis , but precisely in such tough times, communication 
budgets are also limited. This presents the company with a dilemma. The company 
might need to make more price reduction s, but lacks the money to communicate 
them effectively. 
 The “ cash for clunkers ” program in 2009 is an example of a well-publicized 
price incentive which did indeed boost sales . The program offered consumers 
between $3,500 and $4,500 if they would trade in their old cars for new, fuel-effi -
cient ones. Edmunds.com estimated that the average residual value of the cars 
traded in was $1,475. Thus, the subsidy created a signifi cant benefi t for US consumers. 7
 The government -backed program ran out of its initial $1 billion in funding after 
two weeks, so Congress allocated an additional $2 billion to extend it. The same 
kind of program proved even more popular in Germany. The car makers added more 
incentives on top of the $3,500 the government provided, resulting in net price discount s of over 30 %. The German Government initially allocated $2 billion for the 
7
 Congress Passes $2 Billion Extension of ‘Cash for Clunkers’ Program. ABC News, August 6, 
2009. 
 Making Intelligent Price Cuts
182
program, but ultimately appropriated a total of $7 billion. 8
 These massive price 
reduction s clearly combined with high attention overcame the purchase resistance 
many people in the target group may have had. The programs showed how such 
large, well- publicized incentives can work, but not every industry will have the 
good fortune of getting government subsidies in a crisis . 
 For an effective example without government support, we can look at Hela , a 
regional home improvement store chain in Germany. Even to this day, German 
 retail stores remain closed on Sundays, except for four designated “open” days 
throughout the year. On one such Sunday in the spring of 2009, one Hela outlet 
offered a 20 % discount on all purchases. 9
 This created absolute gridlock in the 
parking lots and streets surrounding the store. Hela saw a run on its merchandise. 
The combination of a dramatic price cut and effective communication—buoyed by 
the open Sunday—encouraged consumers to set aside their uncertainty and go 
shopping. Whether Hela turned this enormous amount of traffi c into actual profi ts 
is another story. Did the additional volume compensate for the “sacrifi ce” of 20 % 
on every sale? If we assume that Hela had a gross margin of 25 %, it would need 
to sell fi ve times as much merchandise as on a typical day to earn the same level of 
profi t. Even in crisis situations, and despite the potential in combining large price 
cuts with an intense communication campaign, one should still be wary of making 
such cuts. 
 Offer Cash or Goods Instead of Lower Prices! 
 Price concessions can come in the form of cash rebates, which reduce the transaction price, or in the form of additional goods and services. Offering goods and 
 services instead of lower prices has several advantages during a crisis :
– Price : The nominal price level is not harmed. 
– Profi t : Assuming the same percentage, the supplier is better off profi twise by 
offering goods or services instead of a straight discount . 
– Volume : This form of discount generates more volume and keeps people 
working. 
 To illustrate this, we will look at the case of a manufacturer of playground 
equipment. When the crisis hit, it reacted by offering resellers a special deal: buy 
fi ve and get the sixth unit for free. At a price of $10,000 per unit this represents an 
effective price decrease of 16.7 %, because the reseller receives six units but only 
8
 Driving out of Germany, to pollute another day. The New York Times , August 7, 2009. 
9
 This action is reminiscent of the tagline of the home improvement chain Praktiker , which offered 
“20 percent off everything except pet food.” Burnout is the main reason why Praktiker’s permanent 
 discount of 20 % had minimal effect on sales (see chapter 10) . In contrast, Hela rarely offered 
discounts, so a discount of 20 %—especially during a crisis —proved very effective. 
9 Pricing in Crises and Price Wars
183
pays for fi ve. The profi t calculations show the effect of a discount via goods versus 
a straight-up discount. At a price of $10,000 with one unit for free, the manufacturer gets revenue of $50,000, has a volume of six units, and earns a contribution 
of $14,000. But if the manufacturer had offered the fl at discount of 16.7 % instead, 
it would get a price of $8,330 per unit (refl ecting the discount of 16.7 %). The 
manufacturer gets $41,650 in revenue, has a volume of fi ve units, and earns a contribution of $11,650. 
 Using goods as a means to deliver a discount improves volume , employee utilization, and profi t. This kind of offer has an additional advantage. If the manufacturer designates it as a temporary measure during the crisis , it is easier to rescind 
when the crisis ends. Trying to restore the “crisis” list price of $8,330 back to its 
pre-crisis level of $10,000 would be much harder. 
 A manufacturer of designer furniture also fared well with discounts in the form 
of goods during the 2009 crisis . This leading brand placed great emphasis on price 
consistency and continuity. Whenever customers argued for a price discount —
which they did frequently and sometimes relentlessly during the crisis—any concession would involve an additional piece of furniture rather than a price discount . 
In most cases, the customers were satisfi ed with this offer. The tactic resulted in 
higher capacity utilization (they sold more units than they would have with a price 
discount) and also in a higher contribution. This higher contribution was based primarily on the different ways that the manufacturer and the customer perceive the 
value of the additional furniture. The customer perceives the value of the additional 
furniture based on its retail price , while the manufacturer looked instead at the variable cost. In other words, the manufacturer can offer a gift which has a value of 
$100 in the eyes of the customer, but costs the manufacturer only $60. In the case of 
a direct price discount, the manufacturer needs to give up the actual $100 in order 
to give the customer a “gift” of the same value. 
 The same principle applies to renting, not just to purchases. In general, it is more 
advantageous for a lessor to offer a new tenant several months of free rent instead 
of a discounted price per square foot. The valuation of a building depends on a multiple of the rent, and banks use a similar metric when they make decisions on fi nancing. This gives a lessor an incentive to have a high nominal rent, even if one assumes 
that rent will be zero for the fi rst few months. It is interesting to note that the tenants 
also place a high perceived value on the free rent. That may be due to the fact that 
in the initial period of their lease, they have other pressing obligations such as moving costs and buying new furniture. 
 Staying Off the Customers’ Radar Screen 
 Despite the heavy price pressure s, it is still possible to make selective price increase s 
during a crisis . On the one hand, some price systems are so complex that customers 
never have full price transparency . That can stem from the sheer size of the product 
assortment, the number of individual price elements, or a complex and convoluted 
 Staying Off the Customers’ Radar Screen
184
system of terms and conditions. On a price list of a bank, for example, many customers do not even notice some of the line items, never mind recall the actual prices. 
Normally the customer’s eye falls only on certain prominent prices or price elements. In banking, this can be the monthly fee for basic banking services, transaction fees for investment funds, or the current interest rate on savings, certifi cates of 
deposit, or money market accounts. Business customers would more likely have 
their eye on key international interest rates and the fees for wire transfers. Private 
customers are less likely to know the management fees for investment funds, the 
interest rates charged for overdrafts, or even their exact credit card interest rates. 
That latter group of price elements offers opportunities for price increases. 
 During the recent crisis , a regional bank raised certain prices that would remain 
under the customers’ radar screens. These increases yielded several hundred thousand dollars in additional revenue without any customer complaints. A prerequisite 
for this was a complete analysis of all price and product components regarding the 
number of transactions, assets, returns, and the sensitivity of customers to potential 
 price increase s. These aspects were researched through a survey of the bank’s customer relations team, which was a quick and cost-effective process. 
 Selective price increase potential is buried in many places when you have a large 
assortment. This applies to retail , spare part s, or tourism. Their customers usually 
orient themselves on a few key products and know them well, but have little or no 
knowledge of the prices of the rest of the assortment. That is especially true for 
products customers rarely buy. You might recall my encounter with the padlock for 
my barn, when I had little knowledge of what a padlock should cost and chose one 
from the middle range of the assortment. 
 Spare parts offer several areas where a company can raise prices during a crisis 
without losing volume . First, customers still need spare part s, crisis or not. One area 
to focus on is differentiation of the parts by segment, based on the customers’ different levels of willingness to pay . One category is exclusive parts, available only 
from the original manufacturer. Another category is commodities, which someone 
could buy from the original manufacturer or from a number of alternative suppliers . 
The challenge here is to set up the right price policy for each volume tier. In one 
such effort for a car manufacturer, Simon-Kucher & Partners helped implement an 
average price increase of 12 % for the spare parts business, resulting in a profi t 
improvement of 20 % versus a base scenario. This came about because of selective 
price increases for spare parts which had very low price elasticities—the reward for 
a deep analysis of the buyers’ needs and behavior. 
 Another aspect to consider is the changing nature of price differentiation , which 
creates new opportunities in a crisis as people change their habits. Studies have 
shown that people tend to dine out less during a crisis, but also read more because 
they spend more time at home or have more leisure time. These changes can manifest 
themselves in greater or lesser levels of demand and also increased or decreased 
 price sensitivity . This means that I cannot make any blanket statements on how prices 
and price strategies should change when a crisis hits. Only a thorough understanding 
of the effects and their intensity and duration will lead you to the right answers. 
9 Pricing in Crises and Price Wars
185
 The Arch-Nemesis: Overcapacity 
 The biggest challenge facing pricing in the modern world is overcapacity . This conclusion has become clearer and clearer to me over time, and received a lot of support 
during the last crisis . This problem confronts even new growth industries such as 
wind power technology or smartphones. 
 “The capacity in the wind power industry exceeds the global demand by a factor 
of two,” said one trade association offi cial in 2013. 10 We see overcapacity almost 
everywhere. In one of Simon-Kucher & Partners project in the building materials 
industry, overcapacity was the issue that preoccupied managers more than any 
other. The steel industry constantly bemoans the fact that it has too much capacity, 
and it also seems to be a chronic problem in the automotive industry. The industry 
saw record-high global sales of 80.1 million vehicles in 2011, but global manufacturing capacity was 100 million vehicles and continues to expand. Overcapacity is 
typical as a market enters its mature phase, as companies overestimate growth 
potential, and also typical for a market’s decline phase, which companies often do 
not anticipate. Even emerging markets can get to a state of excess capacity relatively 
quickly. 
 “Global overcapacity for car makers is not only a problem in the saturated markets of Europe,” said one expert. “The booming emerging markets —especially 
China—could become a problem sooner or later for carmakers who have quickly 
ramped up their production capacity.” 11
 We can appreciate the effects that overcapacity has on prices and profi ts in this 
statement from the CEO of an engineering company, the global leader in its market, 
who got straight to the point with this comment: “No one can make any money in 
our business. Every single company has too much capacity. Every time a project 
comes up for bid, someone needs it desperately and offers suicidal prices. Sometimes 
it’s us, sometimes it’s a competitor . Even though four suppliers make up 80 % of the 
global market in our business, no one makes any money.” 
 It didn’t take long for me to formulate my answer: “As long as this overcapacity 
remains, nothing will change.” 
 The Great Recession of 2009 forced one company to withdraw from that market, 
and the surviving companies all reduced their capacity. What happened next? The 
industry quickly returned to profi tability . The share price of the engineering company whose CEO I spoke with also benefi ted from this fundamental shift in the 
industry. After languishing for years and sitting at just $13 in 2009, it rose to over 
$100 per share by 2015 after the industry got its capacity under control. No competitor in the industry could have eliminated the miserable overcapacity on its own. 
Prices in the industry rose to profi table levels only after several competitors reduced 
their capacity. The crisis was actually helpful because it eventually forced all competitors to adjust their capacity to demand. 
10 Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, January 31, 2013, p. 11. 
11 Produktion, April 23, 2012. 
 The Arch-Nemesis: Overcapacity
186
 The presence of overcapacity —and the pressure it puts on prices—does not 
always prevent investment in more capacity. The luxury hotel industry is a good 
example. Comments such as ““overcapacity is pelting the prices at top hotels” and 
“the higher the standard, the lower the profi ts” describe the state of the industry.” 12
Despite the depression in prices, investment in new luxury hotels remains robust. 
This will only worsen the problem. In many companies and industries, I have witnessed many attempts and many discussions—some of which dragged on for 
years—as managers scrambled to implement the prices they needed to earn a 
 reasonable profi t or ensure the company’s survival. But as long as overcapacity 
remains in such markets, most of the efforts to obtain better prices will not be very 
effective. The answer here lies not in vain attempts to raise prices, but in cutting 
capacity. This means that the complex interplay between price and capacity is a top 
management issue of highest priority. 
 What can a company do, though, if it reduces capacity and other competitors do 
not? Or even worse: What can a company do when a competitor seizes another’s 
capacity reduction as an opportunity to increase its market share ? Similar to the 
situation with a price increase , we have another prisoner’s dilemma. If competitors 
do not follow the move, or counter it with their own capacity increase, then cutting 
one’s capacity can be dangerous. One will lose market share or even put the company’s long-term market position in jeopardy. For this reason—just as it is with 
price increases—a company needs to observe its competitors closely and within 
legal limits explain the need for lower capacity in the industry. Of course, antitrust 
law forbids any kind of coordination or contractual cooperation among competitors, 
be it about prices or capacity in the industry. Signaling, or the announcement of a 
company’s intentions or plans, is one legal way to help determine the appropriate 
course of action in face of the prisoner’s dilemma. One should therefore consider 
using signaling systematically as an instrument for capacity management and not 
only for price. Effective signaling can include announcements that a company will 
defend its market share, or that it will retaliate if competitors take advantage of a 
change in the supply situation. 
 As with pricing, it is important to maintain consistency between pronouncements and actions. In order to remain credible, a company needs to follow through 
on the changes and the timing it has publicly announced. Management also needs to 
make sure that the sales force complies with any changes in price, discounting, or 
other sales policies and remains disciplined. If management announces a more disciplined course of action, but salespeople continue to pursue aggressive prices , it 
risks drawing a severe counter-response from competitors, to the detriment not only 
of the company but also of the entire industry. The statements in the economics and 
marketing literature on price management in an oligopoly apply equally to capacity 
management. 13
 In a crisis situation, the chances are greater that competitors will understand the 
need to reduce capacity, as it is in their own self-interest. Many industries saw 
12 Unter einem schlechten Stern. Handelsblatt , March 20, 2013, p. 20. 
13 Simon H, Fassnacht M (2008) Preismanagement, 3rd edn. Gabler, Wiesbaden. 
9 Pricing in Crises and Price Wars
187
signifi cant reductions in overall capacity from 2008 to 2010. The leading tour 
 operators TUI and Thomas Cook reduced their capacity throughout Europe. 14 Many 
 airlines eliminated fl ights to less popular destinations. Price pressures in a market always have root causes, and one of those is often overcapacity . As long as this 
root cause remains unaddressed or unresolved, any changes companies make are 
just doctoring with symptoms rather than fi nding lasting cures. The path to rational, 
reasonable, profi table prices often requires the elimination of excess capacity. 
 Price Increases in Times of Crisis 
 Crises change the supply and demand-situation in a market and therefore create an 
opportunity for companies to analyze and rethink their price propositions. One 
should not confi ne oneself to price decrease s, but instead think more broadly and 
also consider the alternative. For example, the crisis period of 2008–2010 hit the 
restaurant industry particularly hard. 15 After all, dining out is more expensive than 
eating at home. But the Panera Bread chain, which operated roughly 1,300 outlets 
in the USA at the time, reacted differently than its competitors as the crisis struck. 
Instead of cutting prices or offering promotions, Panera upgraded its menu and 
raised its prices. This included adding a lobster sandwich to the menu at $16.99. 
Panera- CEO Ron Shaich explained the changes as follows: “Most of the world 
seems to be focused on the Americans who are unemployed. We’re focused on the 
90 % that are still employed.” 16 Bucking the industry trends, Panera’s revenue rose 
by 4 % in 2009 and profi t by 28 %. 17 Apparently the people in Panera’s target segment were willing to pay higher prices for higher value. 
 In June 2009, at the peak of the crisis , US stainless steel manufacturers raised 
their prices by between 5 and 6 %. The industry’s capacity utilization at the time 
was only at 45 %, which automatically increased total unit costs. Because all manufacturers were affected more or less equally, the attempt to raise prices succeeded. 
“We are raising prices because of the increased costs of operating our mills at the 
current lower demand levels,” commented Dennis Oates, the CEO of Universal 
Stainless & Alloy Products . He then added that “[t]he whole mindset has changed 
in the industry. Sometimes you have to accept the fact that raising prices is a risk. 
But you are better off not chasing that last sale at the bottom. Nearly all of our customers have accepted the price hike.” 18 Even in hindsight, this price increase comes 
across as a wise move. 
14 Meitinger K (2009) Wege aus der Krise. Private Wealth, March 2009, pp. 26–31. 
15 Industry trends in a downturn. The McKinsey Quarterly, December 2008. 
16 Jargon J (2009) Slicing the bread but not the prices. The Wall Street Journal, August 18, 2009. 
17 Jannarone J (2010) Panera bread’s strong run. The Wall Street Journal, January 23, 2010. 
18 The Wall Street Journal, June 11, 2009, p. B2. 
Price Increases in Times of Crisis
188
 Price Wars 
 Price wars happen in many industries everywhere across the world. In the Global 
Pricing Study of Simon-Kucher & Partners , some 59 % of all managers surveyed 
said that their company was involved in a price war . 19 The situation was worst in 
Japan, where 74 % of respondents reported being engaged in a price war. The rate 
in Germany was slightly below average at 53 %, while the USA (along with 
Belgium) had the lowest incidence at 46 %. 20
 Very surprising, however, were the answers to the question of who started that 
 price war . An incredible 82 % of respondents said that a competitor had started 
the price war. As is often the case in life, the instigators are always “the others.” 
Some 12 % of the respondents said that their own company had intentionally 
started the price war. The remaining 5 % admitted that their company had started 
the price war unintentionally, which can only mean that they had made a move 
without correctly anticipating the competitive reaction . 
 Price wars are one of the most effective ways to destroy profi ts in an industry for 
a long period. One remark from an American manager sums the situation up succinctly: “In a war, the atomic bomb and price are subject to the same limitation: both 
can only be used once.” That statement may be somewhat of an exaggeration, but 
the parallels are clear. Starting a price war in an industry is easy, but a price war is 
hard to stop, creates tremendous mistrust, and leaves behind scorched earth. What 
factors precipitate a price war? And how much damage does it do to price level s? 
Figure 9.3 answers these questions. 21
19 The Global Pricing Study included responses from 2,713 managers from 50 countries. 
20 Simon-Kucher & Partners , Global Pricing Study 2012, Bonn 2012. 
21 Heil O (1996) Price wars: issues and results. University of Mainz. 
 Fig. 9.3 Price wars: Their causes and the effects on prices 
9 Pricing in Crises and Price Wars
189
 This study shows that overcapacity is the most frequent trigger for a price war . 
That is especially true for commodity product s or services, i.e., those with little differentiation and for which price is often the decisive purchase criterion. Slow growth 
also increases the risk of a price war. As the right side of Fig. 9.3 shows, collapses 
in price level s can be catastrophic. Earning a profi t after such price decline s is virtually inconceivable. 
 If we look at the incidence of price war s by industry, the picture matches up 
pretty well with this diagnosis. Figure 9.4 shows the industries where price wars 
occur with above-average frequency around the world. 22 Noteworthy is both how 
high these frequencies are and how similar they are across different industries.
 How can a company prevent a price war ? And how can it end a price war? These 
are certainly not easy questions to answer. To make one point clear up front: there 
are no defi nitive, universally applicable solutions to those questions. In addition to 
the factors shown on the left side of Fig. 9.3 , personal aggressiveness of managers 
plays a key role. Time and again I have met managers whose one and only goal 
seemed to be the complete and utter destruction of their competitors. I once witnessed a CEO turn to his Sales VP and ask point blank: “what would it cost to drive 
Competitor X from the market?” 
 “It would cost $2 billion,” the Sales VP said. 
 “Then do it,” the CEO ordered without a moment’s hesitation. 
 When bosses infect their teams with that kind of attitude, especially the sales 
teams, it is no surprise that such a company comes across to the market as price 
aggressive. In the end, the company took no clear-cut action. 
 Unrealistic goals fall into the same category. For instance, General Motors was 
traditionally market share oriented. Business school professor Roger More says: 
“Historically, GM’s fi nancial metrics have focused on market share and revenue, 
rather than on cash fl ow and profi t.” 23 The managers at GM lived out that philosophy. 
At a sales meeting in 2002, the company’s managers wore a lapel pin with the num22 Simon-Kucher & Partners , Global Pricing Study 2012, Bonn 2012. 
23 More R (2009) How general motors lost its focus – and its way. Ivey Business Journal, June 2009. 
 Fig. 9.4 Industries with 
the highest incidence of 
 price war s (in percent) 
 Price Wars
190
ber “29” on it. The company’s market share in the USA had fallen steady over 
decades, and at that time was well below 29 %. 24 The “29” on the pin represented the 
new market share goal. No one outside the company thought that GM could turn 
things around and achieve that goal. But even after real market developments showed 
that the “29” was an illusory goal, management still had faith. 
 “‘29’ will be there until we hit ‘29’,” Gary Cowger, at that time the president of 
GM North America, said two years later. “And then I will probably buy a ‘30’.” 25
Such unrealistic attitudes and goals lead to price aggression, price war s, and ultimately to bankruptcy, as General Motors itself proved in dramatic fashion. Since 
2002, GM’s market share declined continuously, falling to 19.9 % in 2009 and 
17.9 % in 2012. The best methods to avoid a price war are to curtail aggressive statements and behavior and to set realistic targets for revenue, volume , and market share. 
I strongly advise managers to deal more peacefully with competitors and save their 
stubbornness and discipline for their negotiations with customers. I admit that such 
advice runs counter to what you will read in most management and marketing books. 
 But price war s are by no means confi ned to mature markets such as automotive . 
We observe them in young markets as well. In April 2014 the Wall Street Journal 
writes “Price War Erupts in Cloud Services.” 26 Amazon , Microsoft , and Google cut 
prices on various services by up to 85 %, sparking a three-way price war. The ones 
who enjoy this are the customers. “It’s terrifi c for my business,” one customer said. 
 Communication and signaling are essential for avoiding or ending price war s. 
The following advice captures this sentiment well: “Companies that successfully 
avoid price wars consistently write and speak publicly about the horrors of price 
competition and virtues of value competition. They do this ‘jawboning’ in articles, 
in their in-house publications, at industry association meetings, and in every available public forum.” 27
 Taking a softer stance toward competition is a path that leading companies have 
already followed, as this statement from Toyota Chairman Hiroshi Okuda shows. 
He told reporters that “Japan’s auto industry needed to give Detroit time and room 
to catch its breath” and suggested that Toyota might increase its car prices in the 
USA. The move would still have a self-serving component, because higher prices 
would likely boost Toyota’s profi ts. But it would also create an opportunity for US 
automakers to gain additional market share . 28
 Price communication should decrease the probability that customers and competitors misinterpret a price action or the motivations behind it. Misinterpreting 
prices and price change s can be damaging, regardless of whether the competitor or 
24 Sedgwick D (2002) Market share meltdown. Automotive News, November 4, 2002. 
25 GM is Still Studying the $100,000 Cadillac. Automotive News, May 17, 2004. 
26 Ovide S (2014) Price war erupts in cloud services. The Wall Street Journal Europe , April 17, 
2014, p. 20. 
27 Presentation by the author: “How to Boost Profi t Through Power Pricing” at the World Marketing 
& Sales Forum, Madrid, November 22, 2008. 
28 Sapsford J (2005) Toyota Sends Mixed Messages on Detroit Woes The Wall Street Journal, April 
27, 2005, p. 22. 
9 Pricing in Crises and Price Wars
191
the company itself makes the error in the fi rst place. Both cases can lead to a price 
war . Let’s assume that Company A wants to introduce a new product that will 
replace an older model. Its warehouses still contain a large inventory of the old 
model. Perhaps the simplest solution would be to make a massive price cut and then 
support it with a heavy price communication campaign. Yet in its campaign, the 
company neglects to mention its intention, which is to replace that old model with 
a new one, nor does it mention the motivation behind the price cut, namely to clear 
out the older inventory. 
 If Company A is fortunate, customers will buy the products at the much lower 
price and empty the warehouse. But how will competitors respond to such an 
aggressive price cut, in the absence of additional information? The chances are high 
that competitors will perceive the price action as an attack and as an attempt to steal 
 market share . Under such circumstances, the competitors are only a short step away 
from striking back with their own aggressive price cuts. If competitors really do cut 
their prices, then Company A suddenly has two problems. First, it will sell fewer 
units of the old products than originally expected, which means that it does not 
deplete its stocks. Second, it may have permanently destroyed the price level and 
may need to introduce its new version at a lower price. 
 The competitive responses would probably be much different if Company A 
instead announces that it will soon introduce a new version, and that its price cut is 
a temporary action to clear existing inventory . If competitors fi nd these explanations 
credible (a function of Company A’s previous behavior), the likelihood is greater 
that they will restrain themselves and avoid starting a price war . The exact same 
action—in this case a temporary price cut of, say, 30 %—can be interpreted in different ways by customers and competitors and can lead to entirely different 
responses. This makes signaling the method of choice if a company wants to reduce 
the risk of a price war. 
 I summarize my insights into price war s very simply: there are smart industries 
and there are self-destructive industries. What is the difference? The smart ones 
avoid price wars, and the self-destructive ones get stuck in them. The smart ones are 
profi table; the self-destructive ones incur losses or destroy profi ts. The problem is 
that it only takes one self-destructive competitor to render an entire industry selfdestructive. That’s why it is better to have smart competitors. 
 Price Wars
© Springer International Publishing Switzerland 2015 193
H. Simon, Confessions of the Pricing Man, DOI 10.1007/978-3-319-20400-0_10
 10 What the CEO Needs to Do 
 If a CEO asked me point-blank for advice on how to use price in the best way 
 possible in his/her company, what would I say? That is not a rhetorical question. I 
do hear that question often, and I realize that a CEO is not looking for an answer that 
begins with “It depends on your situation …” or “It’s really complicated.” They 
know that already. They want more. 
 One recent situation involved a CEO who had been promoted from within to run 
a global company with annual revenues of more than $50 billion. He explained that 
his company historically placed a huge emphasis on market share , to the point 
where that “obsession” had taken root in the company’s culture. That may have 
been fi ne a few decades ago, but the company now served far more mature markets 
than growing ones, he noted. 
 “So what should I do?” he asked. “What is your silver bullet or secret potion?” 
 I admitted of course that I didn’t have one. No one does. But I did have an 
answer. 
 “Lead your company with a strict profi t orientation,” I said. “And keep in mind 
that price is the most effective profi t driver .” 
 “Easier said than done,” he responded, reminding me that his predecessor would 
publicly berate his direct reports who had lost market share . “That is incredibly 
diffi cult.” 
 I advised him to repeat the “profi t” mantra every day, as often as possible. He of 
course will hear the message every time he says it, but others hear it only once or 
twice and won’t get tired of it. He also needs to follow his words with consistent, 
appropriate actions. One of the most important measures is to base the incentive 
system s of the country managers strictly on profi t, not on revenue, volume , or 
 market share targets. 
 There is also a tactical element which must reinforce the link between words and 
action. His company should not start any price war s. It should not respond to every 
aggressive move that competitors make. In countries or regions where the company 
has market leadership, it should pursue price leadership through a consistent 
 communication campaign emphasizing the importance of price and value. 
194
 Though the long-term profi t orientation matters most, this CEO will need some 
successes in the short term. The goal, however, remains: direct the company’s 
attention and energy resolutely to a long-term profi t orientation. That requires a 
focus on value creation . The most important aspect of price is and will be value to 
customer. 
 “Good pricing has three prerequisites: create value, quantify value, and communicate value,” I said in summary. “That is when you get the price you deserve, the 
price you need for a profi table business. And, last but not least, avoid price war s.” 
 If a company can resist the temptation of price war s and eliminate the stigma of 
 market share losses, it can improve the profi t situation for an entire industry. In 
Poland, the company’s subsidiary was number two. The new country manager 
ended a price war, which paved the way for price increase s. The market leader followed. The net result for the number two-company was higher profi ts and a slight 
loss of market share. This success marked the fi rst time the CEO did not criticize a 
country manager for losing market share, and this sent a powerful signal to the 
managers in other countries. 
 Price and Shareholder Value 
 We learned as early as in Chap. 1 that profi t maximization is the only sensible goal 
for pricing. When people talk of profi t maximization, they usually refer to one 
period, for example a year or a quarter. In reality, one’s planning horizon should be 
longer and not limited to one period. The short-term orientation—in particular the 
typical quarterly fi xation of publicly traded companies—is one of the most controversial aspects of capitalism. 
 Management should focus on long-term profi t maximization . That is identical to 
saying that a company should increase shareholder value , or its market capitalization if the company is listed. Because price is the most effective profi t driver , it 
follows automatically that price must take on a decisive role in management’s 
efforts to increase shareholder value. This makes price a vital issue for top management. If a company’s pricing drives its earnings, and earnings drive shareholder 
value, how can a CEO not make pricing one of his or her highest priorities? 
 Unfortunately, price does not appear to be a high priority for many CEOs. Former 
 Microsoft CEO Steve Ballmer said that price is “really really important” but a lot of 
people “under-think it through.” 1
 Nor is price a high priority for the investment 
community at large. Though references to price have become more frequent in 
recent years, you still fi nd them only rarely in commentaries, in equity analyst 
reports, or similar documents. One exception is this comment from investor Warren 
Buffett, who stated “The single most important decision in evaluating a business is 
1
 Be all-in, or all-out: Steve Ballmer’s advice for startups. The Next Web, March 4, 2014. 
10 What the CEO Needs to Do
195
 pricing power .” 2
 Even private equity investors, whose typical objective after taking 
over a company is to increase its value, rarely take advantage of price opportunities. 
Instead they typically focus on cutting costs or driving volume growth. Cost-cutting 
is internal and one sees the effects directly. Attempts to increase volume usually do 
not draw a negative reaction from customers. But price increase s may put customer 
relations hips at risk and the effects of price actions are often indirect. This risk aversion and the perceived lack of control over the outcome make price actions a less 
palatable option than cost-cutting and volume growth. The same thinking applies to 
executives and senior management, where the commitment to pricing is often lacking. We know that companies earn higher profi ts when their CEOs and the most 
senior managers get personally involved in price management ; yet the attention that 
top managers actually pay to pricing is limited in most companies. 
 How Price Can Increase Market Capitalization 
 The relationship between market capitalization and after-tax profi t is expressed as 
the price-earnings ratio, or PE ratio. As of May 16, 2014, the average PE ratio for 
all 30 companies which constitute the Dow Jones Industrial Average (DJIA) was 
16.6. 3
 In other words, the market valued the average company at 16.6 times its 
profi t. The PE ratio can fl uctuate sharply over time, but the fi gure of 16.6 is roughly 
in line with the long-term average for the DJIA stocks. 
 In Fig. 5.2 we presented the dramatic effect that a price of increase of 2 % 
could have on the profi tability of selected public companies. Let’s assume that 
this price increase sticks and the PE ratio remains constant. That allows us to 
calculate the effect a 2 % price increase has on a company’s market capitalization . 
Figure 10.1 shows the results for the same companies we looked at in Fig. 5.2. 
The PE ratio for the selected companies is 17.93, slightly higher than the current 
PE ratio for the DJIA.
 If Sony succeeded in implementing a price increase of 2 % across its entire product portfolio , its market capitalization would increase by $42.73 billion. On average 
the companies in Fig. 10.1 would see their market capitalization increase by $48.88 
billion or by 26.7 % (based on the current average market capitalization of $182.8 
billion). The effect that such a relatively small price increase has on a company’s 
value should be the more interesting and more relevant performance indicator for 
top managers and business owners, because of its long-term nature. These numbers 
reveal in a very impressive manner the sheer massive potential that pricing has to 
increase the value of a company. I wonder how many leaders and business owners 
are aware of the leverage effect of prices, never mind actually inspire their organizations to tap that effect through professional pricing. 
2
 Statement by Warren Buffett before the Financial Crisis Inquiry Commission (FCIC) on May 26, 2010. 
3
 Market Data Center. The Wall Street Journal, May 16, 2014. 
 How Price Can Increase Market Capitalization
196
 $120 Million More Through Pricing 
 The following case proves that the impact of price and profi t on shareholder value 
is not the stuff of theory and dreams. It is absolutely real. A private equity investor 
was preparing to sell off one of the world’s leading parking garage operators, a 
company it had owned for about fi ve years. The investor previously exhausted all of 
its profi t growth potential through conventional means such as cutting costs and 
adding more garages. However, it had not taken any systematic actions on the 
pricing side. 
 When a thorough analysis revealed potential for price increase s, especially in large 
cities, the company acted swiftly. Instead of implementing an identical, across-theboard price increase, it took a differentiated approach, basing the increases for an 
individual garage on its attractiveness, capacity utilization , and competitive situation. 
The investor built the new prices into the contracts with the garage lessors, thereby 
locking in an additional income stream of $10 million per year. A few months after the 
implementation of the price increases, the private equity investors sold the company 
at a PE ratio of 12. In one fell swoop, the contractually secured profi t increase of $10 
million increased the company’s value by $120 million, which means that they got 
 Fig. 10.1 Increase in market capitalization after a permanent price increase of 2 % 
10 What the CEO Needs to Do
197
$120 million more than they had expected prior to the price increases. This case shows 
that price increases can quickly and massively increase the value of a company. 
 Price and Market Capitalization 
 The equity markets are considered the most objective evaluator of a company. The 
 share price is supposed to refl ect all information available in the market. That 
prompts the question of how price actions affect share prices. To my knowledge, no 
one has made a representative study of those effects. One reason for this may be the 
fact that information about the price situation of a company rarely if ever appears in 
a standard company report. Unusual price actions, in contrast, can often precipitate 
a signifi cant change in a share price. In what follows we will look at a selection of 
case studies which show the sudden and dramatic infl uence that pricing can have on 
a share price. 
 The Day the Marlboro Man Fell Off His Horse 
 On Friday, April 2, 1993, Philip Morris , the maker of Marlboro, the world’s biggest 
cigarette brand , announced a massive price cut for Marlboro cigarettes in the US 
market. The goal was to ward off no-name competitors, who had captured an everincreasing market share . Philip Morris’s share price fell by 26 % that same day, 
wiping out $13 billion in market capitalization and helping to drag down the share 
prices of other leading consumer goods companies such as Coca-Cola and RJR 
Nabisco. The DJIA declined by 2 % that day. 
Fortune described “Marlboro Friday” as the day the Marlboro Man fell off his 
horse. Investors interpreted the price cut as a sign of weakness and a concession by 
 Philip Morris that it was unable to maintain high prices in its fi ght against no-name 
competitors. The Marlboro Man, launched in 1954 and known worldwide as one of 
the biggest marketing icons ever, had lost a price war . Investors took his defeat as a 
general sign for the marketing ineffi ciency of leading brands. The declining market 
capitalization s of leading US consumer product companies in 1993 prompted a 
slight decline in advertising spending. That marked the fi rst such decline since 
1970. This event was considered to be the “death of a brand ” and as a sign for the 
rise of a new consumer generation which gave more weight to the true value of a 
product rather than its marketing. 
 20 % Off on Everything: The Praktiker Case 
 Praktiker , a home improvement store chain in Europe with 25,000 employees, hundreds of stores, and about $5 billion in revenue, had a share price of over $40 in the 
middle of 2007. Building for years on its slogan “20 % off of everything—except 
pet food,” Praktiker became Germany’s second-largest chain in the category. Later 
 20 % Off on Everything: The Praktiker Case
198
on, Praktiker began launching campaigns based on discounts for specifi c product 
categories, such as “25 % off of anything with a plug.” 4
 Another Praktiker slogan 
was “This is the price talking.” Praktiker positioned itself as the hard discounter in 
the home improvement category and ultimately defi ned itself by these slogans. 
 Praktiker ’s aggressive price strategy led to disaster. By the end of 2008, its share 
price fell below $13. The hard discount strategy had led Praktiker astray, and they 
ultimately had to abandon it. The company took that bold step in 2010, running its 
“20 % off of everything” slogan for the last time at year’s end. But the share price 
plunged again. In spring 2013 it was around $1.90. Figure 10.2 shows the share 
 price decline from 2007 to 2013.
 Praktiker ’s management was criticized for playing down the complexity of the 
transition away from a “ discount culture,” noting that “as soon as it became clear 
that the new positioning would take time and cost a lot of money, trust for the brand 
disappeared.” 5
 Another report said that “whoever boils down their magic formula to 
‘20 percent off of everything—except pet food’ doesn’t get what it’s about. Praktiker 
4
 Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, March 18, 2009, p. 15. 
5
 Seidel H (2011) Praktiker : Es geht um 100 Prozent. Welt am Sonntag, July 31, 2011, p. 37. 
 Fig. 10.2 Praktiker ’s share price decline 
10 What the CEO Needs to Do
199
is a soulless company.” 6
 Worth noting is that while Praktiker stumbled, the rest of 
the category fl ourished. From 2008 to 2010 the German home improvement chains 
saw their aggregate revenue rise by more than $1.3 billion to $24.7 billion. Praktiker 
fi led for bankruptcy in 2013, and has ceased operations. 
 Dieter Schindel, the chairman of the retailer Woolworth , spoke of the “ Praktiker 
syndrome,” something which affl icted his own chain. Woolworth went into bankruptcy in April 2009 and then tried a completely fresh start in Europe. Under the 
new concept, the company consciously decided it would not succumb to the 
“Praktiker syndrome.” It made direct, permanent price cuts on over 400 items, 
instead of making ongoing claims about aggressive discounts. 7
 The moral of this story: before committing a company to a positioning solely 
dependent on low prices, one should consider the potential consequences for profits—and thus for the share price . Following this statement, it should be observed 
that once committed, a company’s attempts to move away from that policy can have 
disastrous consequences. 
 The Devastating Effect of Price Wars: The Potash 
Oligopoly Case 
 The global market for potash—potassium compounds which are an important additive to fertilizers—used to be dominated in relative peace by just three companies: 
Russia’s OAO Uralkali , Canada’s Potash Corp. , and Germany’s K+S . Prices were 
relatively stable at around $400 per metric ton. That all changed at the end of July 
2013, when Uralkali announced three moves which broke up the “informal cartel ” 
and sent stock prices into a tailspin. In keeping with a new “ volume over price” 
strategy, 8
 Uralkali said that it would increase its production by 30 % in the next year, 
offer more favorable prices to China (one of the world’s biggest consumers of potash), and break off its joint sales organization relationship with its Belarusian sister 
company. 9
 The effect on the Uralkali ’s share price was immediate and huge, as shown in 
Fig. 10.3 . In a 2-day period, shares of Uralkali fell by 24 %. The other competitors 
suffered a similar fate: shares in Potash Corp. by 23 %, and shares in K+S by 
30 %. The prospects for K+S seemed particularly dire, as one analyst saw prices 
falling to as low as $288 per ton, which is roughly equal to the production costs 
of K+S. Another analyst group lowered its profi t forecast for K+S by 84 % in the 
aftermath of the Uralkali announcements. A few months later, Uralkali effectively 
set a new fl oor for potash prices by signing a 6-month deal with a Chinese 
6
 Freytag B (2011) Magische Orte. Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, December 29, 2011, p. 11. 
7
 Woolworth will zurück zu seinen Wurzeln. Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, July 2, 2012, p. 12. 
8
 Alpert LI (2014) Uralkali Signs Potash Deal With China. The Wall Street Journal, January 20, 2014. 
9
 Uralkali bringt Aktienkurse in Turbulenzen. Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung, July 31, 2013. 
 The Devastating Effect of Price Wars: The Potash Oligopoly Case
200
consortium for $305 per metric ton, roughly 25 % below the prevailing prices in 
the fi rst half of 2013. 10
 Pride Before the Fall: The Netflix Case 
 Netfl ix began as a DVD rental business. For a monthly fee, you could borrow as 
many DVDs as you liked. They would arrive by mail, and you would return them 
by mail when you were done. With this innovative business model , Netfl ix helped 
drive the huge DVD rental chain Blockbuster, which had thousands of stores nationwide, into bankruptcy in 2009. Step by step, Netfl ix began to evolve into a movie 
streaming service, and kept its simple price model of a low monthly subscription fee 
intact. From 2010 onward the company was a true online star, boasting 25 million 
customers by the summer of 2011 and facing virtually no competition. 
 That such a successful company can fall victim to pride is no surprise. On July 
12, 2011, Netfl ix announced a price increase of 60 % and attributed it to a sharp 
increase in its licensing costs. Those licensing costs, however, didn’t interest Netfl ix 
10 Alpert LI (2014) Uralkali signs potash deal with China. The Wall Street Journal, January 20, 2014. 
 Fig. 10.3 Uralkali ’s share price decline 
10 What the CEO Needs to Do
201
customers one bit. They responded negatively, though the company’s net loss of 
customers was not so large in percentage terms. Investors were much less tolerant. 
They roughed up the company even more, causing the share price to plummet by 
around 75 % over the ensuing three months. 
 Netfl ix ’s market capitalization , which once topped $16 billion, eventually 
fell below $5 billion. Content suppliers cancelled their license agreements. 
A weaker Netfl ix also became vulnerable to stepped-up attacks from Amazon 
and Apple . 11 Figure 10.4 shows the movement of Netfl ix’s share price in the 
three months after the price increase in July 2011. The moral: one should avoid 
arrogance in pricing, especially after a run of enviable success.
 A Failed Attempt to Trade Customers Up: The J.C. Penney Case 
 In June 2011 the department store chain J.C. Penney announced that former Apple 
executive Ron Johnson would take over as CEO , effective November 1. Johnson 
wasn’t just any ordinary manager getting elevated to a top executive job at a retailer . 
11 For a detailed description of this case, please see Stahl G (2011) Netfl ix Shares Sink 35 % after 
Missteps. The Wall Street Journal, October 26, 2011, p. 15 as well as the Harvard Business School 
case study on Netfl ix. In 2014 Netfl ix’s market cap was $5.5 billion. 
 Fig. 10.4 The Netfl ix stock price after its large price increase 
 A Failed Attempt to Trade Customers Up: The J.C. Penney Case
202
He was the man behind the spectacularly successful Apple Stores, which he nurtured and expanded since leading their launch in 2000. Prior to Johnson’s taking 
charge, J.C. Penney sold almost three-quarters of its merchandise at discounts of 
50 % or more. Without doing an advance testing of the potential effects, J.C. Penney 
implemented a radical change to its pricing on February 1, 2012. It eliminated 
almost all promotions and at the same time initiated a signifi cant upgrade in merchandise to more expensive brands, which Penney would sell in more than 100 
separate boutiques. In response to critical questions about the lack of advance testing, Johnson responded “we didn’t test at Apple.” 12
 J.C. Penney’s revenue fell by 3 % in its 2012 fi scal year, while costs rose 
because of the implementation of the “trading up” strategy. These effects combined to turn an after-tax profi t of $378 million in 2011 into a loss of $152 million 
in 2012. When the retailer announced the hiring of Johnson in the middle of 2011, 
its share price responded positively. As Fig. 10.5 shows, the share price started to 
12 Mattioli D (2013) For Penney’s Heralded Boss, the Shine is off the Apple. The Wall Street 
Journal, February 25, 2013, p. A1. 
 Fig. 10.5 The J.C. Penney share price 
10 What the CEO Needs to Do
203
decline sharply after implementation of the new price strategy began. Between 
January 30, 2012, and April 2, 2013, the company’s share price plunged from 
$41.81 to $14.67, a decline of 65 %. During the same period, the DJIA rose by 
16 %. This requires no further comment. And how did the story end? Ron Johnson 
was fi red in April 2013. Until 2015 the share price fell below $10.
 Discounts and Promotions: The Abercrombie & Fitch Case 
 In the third quarter of 2011, the fashion retailer Abercrombie & Fitch launched a 
campaign of discounts and promotions. The combination of the price cuts and a 
double-digit increase in unit costs put “signifi cant pressure on our gross margins,” 
said CEO Mike Jeffries. Because making a price increase —or rescinding the discounts—seemed feasible only after the holiday shopping season, the company 
expected that its profi t would decline through the end of 2012. 
 During the fi nancial crisis after 2009, Abercrombie & Fitch suffered revenue 
declines because the company steadfastly refused to undertake high-profi le promotions. The promotions in the third quarter of 2011 did boost revenues, but the profi t 
margin s worsened. One investment fi rm downgraded the stock, and a retail analyst 
wrote: “We now see greater gross margin deterioration than we previously 
 Fig. 10.6 The share price of Abercrombie & Fitch after launching its promotions 
 Discounts and Promotions: The Abercrombie & Fitch Case
204
anticipated and believe the pace of margin recovery will take longer than expected, 
particularly given management’s aggressive promotional stance in the domestic 
channel.” 13 As Fig. 10.6 shows, Abercrombie & Fitch’s share price fell by more than 
30 % as a consequence of its price cutting. In 2015 it hovers around $20.
 Price Discipline Increases a Company’s Market Value: 
A Telecom Case 
 Now let’s look at a positive case. The US market for data and wholesale voice 
 services is famous for its price war s. Once a company puts its network cables in the 
ground, it has hardly any variable costs . This makes it very tempting to use aggressive prices to attract customers. One leading US company fi nally had enough of this 
strategy, after its share price fell by 67 % over a 2-year period. Simon-Kucher & 
Partners developed a comprehensive program to help the company stabilize its 
prices. The new program imposed strict price discipline on the sales force. 
 At an earnings press conference, the company announced that it had seen its fi rst 
success with the new strategy. Its share price rose signifi cantly that same day and 
13 Talley K (2011) Pricing Weighs on Abercrombie Margins. The Wall Street Journal, November 17, 2011. 
 Fig. 10.7 Price discipline and share price for a telecom company 
10 What the CEO Needs to Do
205
eventually doubled within six months. Figure 10.7 shows the share price movement 
of the company before and after the introduction of the program. Some of its competitors witnessed the success and followed suit with their own form of price discipline, making this case a textbook example of strategic price leadership .
 The company’s management commented on the upward trend in the share price 
by saying: “We are pleased with the results of our continued disciplined approach to 
pricing. Third quarter performance refl ects positive industry dynamics including 
continuing moderation of price compression.” Analysts also praised the newfound 
price discipline: “The company’s increase in wholesale price s is part of a general 
trend that price pressure is easing, a healthy pricing trend. More stable pricing 
should help all the players.” 
 These cases show that price measures can have a dramatic impact on share price s 
and market capitalization s. It would seem prescient for senior management and 
investor relations departments to take the role of price more seriously, and communicate its importance more vigorously. Avoiding serious pricing mistakes would 
seem to be even more important than fi nding the right price strategy . Companies 
must absolutely avoid both kinds of mistakes: the ones with sudden short-term 
effects—such as Marlboro’s, J.C. Penney’s, or Abercrombie & Fitch ’s—as well as 
mistakes in long-term price positioning , such as Praktiker ’s. Taking the correct 
price decisions does not impact share prices immediately, but rather with some 
delay. That is because such decisions are normally not spectacular; they simply 
bring a company closer and closer to its desired price position. The effects are 
asymmetric. A poor price decision—as the previous examples showed—can have 
an immediate and devastating impact on a share price. A sound price decision often 
takes time to show its full effects, translating into a modest but steady improvement 
in share prices as the equity markets take notice. 
 Pricing and Financial Analysts 
 Analyst reports play a very important role for investors. After everything I have said 
above, one would expect that topics such as price level , pricing competence, and 
 pricing power would appear prominently in analyst reports. But that is not the case. 
Only rarely do we see statements about prices in these reports, and when we do, it 
is usually some triviality such as the fact that a company is a premium supplier . 
When the reports do address pricing, they usually do so superfi cially. 
 But this seems to be gradually changing in the aftermath of the fi nancial crisis . 
Analysts have begun to pay more attention to pricing. Perhaps the comment from 
Warren Buffett on pricing power has something to do with that. No one else’s words 
carry greater weight or have a wider audience in the investment community than his. 
 One analyst report from a large banking group offers proof that the tide may be 
turning. 14 Entitled “Global Equity Strategy,” the report goes into extensive depth 
and detail on the signifi cance of price and pricing power for the evaluation of stocks. 
14 Credit Suisse, Global Equity Strategy, October 18, 2010. 
 Pricing and Financial Analysts
206
It is worth reviewing a few key points of this study. The analysts concluded that 
pricing “is abnormally important: we calculate a price increase of 1 % point raises 
fair value on a discounted cash fl ow base by 16 %,” a confi rmation of what we 
repeatedly said in this book. 
 The report also analyzed individual industries with respect to their pricing power . 
It recognized high pricing power in premium cars, luxury goods, tobacco products, 
technology products, investment banks, software, and maintenance contracts. In 
contrast, it identifi ed mass-market cars, tourism, airlines , consumer electronics 
(e.g., cameras), and media as industries with extremely weak pricing power. The 
analysts also assessed the pricing power of individual companies, attributing high 
pricing power to BMW , Imperial Tobacco , Daimler , Goldman Sachs , Oracle , and 
 SAP . Companies they considered to have weak pricing power include Solarworld , 
Peugeot Citroen, Fiat , Nike , and the drugstore chain CVS. 
 There can be no doubt: factors such as pricing power , price position, and pricing 
competence are signifi cant both for shareholder value and for evaluating stocks. But 
two reasons explain why these aspects historically receive only scant coverage in 
 analyst reports. First, balance sheets and income statements do not contain any 
direct information on prices. Granted, this information does appear occasionally in 
the comments in annual reports, but such statements follow no standard format and 
are therefore hard to compare across companies. Second, the very high importance 
of price for shareholder value may not be fully understood, not only per se but also 
relative to other factors which determine shareholder value, such as capital costs. 
 The most important drivers of a company’s value and its share price are profi t 
and growth. Companies which deliver strong consistent results in both areas year 
after year will create shareholder value and become popular among investors. 
During Jack Welch’s tenure as CEO from 1982 to 2001, General Electric ’s revenue 
increased from $27 million to $130 million. In the same period, profi t increase d 
sevenfold, with steady gains year after year. Adjusted for stock splits and dividends, 
GE’s share price rose from 53 cents to $27.95 over that 20-year period. That is an 
increase of 5,273 % … and not for some start-up, but rather for a company that has 
been a component of the DJIA since 1897. GE is the only company which can make 
that claim. For a time GE was the world’s most valuable company, later eclipsed by 
 Microsoft and Apple , two other companies with an amazingly long run of higher 
growth and higher profi ts. 
 One very compelling question is the following: How much does growth contribute to a company’s value, and how much comes from profi t? One would think that 
this question has been investigated thousands of times. But that is not the case. One 
of the few people to explore this question was the late investment banker Nathaniel 
J. Mass, who published his fi ndings in an article in Harvard Business Review in 
2005. 15 He developed an indicator which he called “relative value of growth” or 
RVG. The RVG showed how much 1 % of revenue growth contributed to shareholder value relative to 1 % of profi t growth. For example, an RVG of 2 means that 
15 Mass NJ (2005) The relative value of growth. Harvard Business Review, April 2005, 
pp. 102–112. 
10 What the CEO Needs to Do
207
revenue growth of 1 % would contribute twice as much to shareholder value as a 
1 % improvement in margins, which a company could achieve through higher prices 
or lower costs. But Mass did not explicitly study the role that price plays in shareholder value. If we want to understand that role, we need to break down growth into 
its constituent parts. 
 The term “growth” normally means revenue growth. But revenue growth comes 
about in many different ways. If volume rises by 5 % at constant prices, revenue 
will increase by 5 %. If prices increase by 5 % and volume remains constant, this 
also results in revenue growth of 5 %. Company reports rarely distinguish between 
these two fundamentally different forms of growth. As we know from Fig. 5.3, these 
two scenarios have sharply different effects on profi t and therefore on shareholder 
value . Using the example from Fig. 5.3, pure “price growth” results in profi t growth 
of 50 %, whereas pure “volume growth” increases profi t only by 20 %. In reality, 
these two growth drivers (volume and profi t) could come in any conceivable combination (i.e., both go up, one goes up, the other down). If volume and prices both 
rise, as they did for a time in the oil market, revenue and profi t will experience very 
strong growth. Revenue can grow when prices decline and unit sales grow disproportionately, and vice versa. 
 The study conducted by Mass did not distinguish between these different forms 
of growth. Implicit in his analysis, however, is the assumption that growth is purely 
 volume based. It would be more revealing to distinguish between volume growth 
and price growth, but unfortunately that is diffi cult. Annual reports and income 
statements do not provide any data to go on. Analysts should try to include more 
price-related data in their studies, similar to the equity report I cited earlier. It is 
urgently necessary to devote more research on the link between price and shareholder value . 
 Price and Private Equity Investors 
 The typical business model of private equity investors involves acquiring a company at a favorable price, and then trying to raise its profi ts as quickly as possible. 
The fi rst target of that effort is usually costs. Applying their experience, investors 
strive to achieve short-term improvements. In addition they typically tackle the 
topic of growth, usually focusing on entry into new segments or new markets, often 
foreign markets. In short the acquired company simply needs to move more units. 
 So we are talking here about volume growth. Private equity investors often shy 
away from trying to achieve profi table growth through higher prices. One reason is 
that the investors are often not very familiar with the markets the acquired company 
competes in, and therefore expend their energy on measures which are less risky than 
price moves. Furthermore, the people the private equity investors put in charge to 
oversee these changes normally have considerable experience with rationalization, 
but much less experience with marketing or trading up. The parking garage example 
earlier in this chapter proved, though, just how much potential lies in using price 
actions as a way to drive growth and profi t. Private equity investors do not always 
recognize this potential, because it is harder to quantify than the effects of cost cuts. 
 Price and Private Equity Investors
208
One other explanation is that price measures—similar to innovation processes—
require a longer term orientation. Often one doesn’t get to a desired price level with 
one big move, but rather with a series of smaller ones spread out over years. 
 Private equity investors should also take this untapped price potential into 
account in their due diligence phase. It is not always easy to assess that potential, 
especially prior to an acquisition, but price and pricing power nonetheless remain 
vital factors in determining the potential shareholder value . One must not forget the 
comment of Warren Buffett on pricing power. 
 The attitude of private equity investors has also begun to change, though. Texas 
Pacifi c Group , which ranks as one of the largest private equity fi rms with more than 
$50 billion invested, treats pricing with great care and has frequently hired SimonKucher & Partners as a consultant. More and more private equity fi rms are recognizing the profi t and value potential which pricing offers and have begun to examine 
it systematically. Particularly important to them is how stable and sustainable the 
price position is. 
 The Key Role of Top Management 
 Pricing belongs on the CEO ’s desk. That is clear, but reality looks much different. 
 Simon-Kucher & Partners investigated deals for one of the world’s largest automotive suppliers . In its negotiations with car companies, this supplier would usually 
set an internal minimum price or fl oor price at which a deal would still be accepted. 
We found out that nearly all of the contracts the supplier won came at the respective minimum price. As we showed these results to the supplier’s CEO, he went 
berserk. He didn’t know the details of the pricing process , especially the setting of 
a fl oor price. Otherwise he would not have been so surprised at hearing these 
fi ndings. 
 The CEO of an engineering company, who found it tiresome to go through a 
price “chess match” for every new project, laid down the following rule for his sales 
force: every project with a gross margin of less than 20 % requires his personal 
approval. That sounds rational, doesn’t it? He told me that one year later, his salespeople rarely submitted deals for his approval anymore. So far so good! Then I 
asked him what the margins on the deals looked like. “They are always at 20.1 
percent,” he said. “Before we had occasionally gross margins of 24 or 25 percent or 
even more. But not anymore.” That was the natural consequence of such a one-sided 
process rule. Why should a salesperson make his life more diffi cult in a negotiation 
with a customer by pursuing a margin of 25 %, when a margin of 20.1 % is perfectly 
fi ne with his own CEO? 
 If one asks top managers for certain details about prices, such as price gaps to 
competitors or across countries, the managers will often pass. Of course one cannot 
expect a top manager to know every price and the details behind it. But he or she 
should be informed about fundamental facts, processes, and results. 
 Should companies reward top managers with price-based incentives? In principle that is possible. Managers could receive such rewards for achieving price 
10 What the CEO Needs to Do
209
increase s, meeting or exceeding infl ation rates, adjusting to competitors’ prices, or 
reducing discounts. Sometimes companies formulate explicit price goals. Toyota 
uses a system of relative price s, under which they express their own prices relative 
to the average prices of the relevant competitive models. In some years, the company issued specifi c instructions on how managers should change these relative 
prices. Precise goals such as these can be good starting points to encourage and 
reward desired pricing behaviors. 
 Nonetheless, I generally advise against such incentives for top managers, 
although I do advocate them for salespeople. The business owner or the board which 
would grant these incentives generally does not know what price measures lend 
themselves best to increasing shareholder value . Companies should instead offer 
incentives based on increases in shareholder value and not on the individual instruments for achieving it, such as price. 
 The Toyota example leads to another insight, namely that creating a price metric 
for top managers to use can be very helpful. I consider relative price s to be a very 
meaningful indicator. One can calculate them not only at the individual product 
level, but also for product groups, for business units, for individual countries, or for 
the entire company. Using such “key pricing indicators,” top managers can make a 
fundamental assessment of their company’s price position and how it changes. 16
 My insistence that top managers devote more time and energy to pricing should 
not in any way imply that the CEO should involve himself or herself in all manner 
of price negotiation s. In some isolated cases such involvement might be necessary, 
but it also has its disadvantages. The CEO of a large logistics service provider made 
a habit of visiting the CEOs of his customers in the automotive industry once a year. 
These CEOs regularly brought up the topic of price and managed to extract additional price concession s from the logistic company’s CEO. These meetings undermined the months-long efforts of his sales teams. Simon-Kucher & Partners 
recommended that the CEO stop making these annual visits. He followed our 
advice, and his company’s margins improved. 
 Fortunately there are CEOs who do indeed pay a lot of attention to pricing. One 
of these was Wendelin Wiedeking during his years as CEO of Porsche . He personally involved himself in important price decisions and was fully versed in the 
details. Extremely professional price management , including CEO involvement, is 
one of the reasons Porsche has become the world’s most profi table automaker. In 
2013, Porsche achieved an operating return on sales of 18.0 %, up from 17.5 % in 
the prior year. The numbers of all other companies in the automotive industry pale 
in comparison. 
 Pricing at General Electric also enjoys the close attention of top management. In 
2001 GE installed Chief Pricing Offi cers in each of its divisions and had them report 
directly to the division leader. A few years later, CEO Jeff Immelt noted the positive 
effect these new positions had. Price discipline had tightened considerably, and the 
company did a better job of achieving its target prices. The Chief Pricing Offi cers 
16 Viele Preiskriege basieren auf Missverständnissen. Interview with Georg Tacke, Sales Business, 
January–February 2013, pp. 13–14. 
 The Key Role of Top Management
210
had also taken on an instructional role, ensuring much better preparation for price 
negotiation s. All in all, Immelt said that his expectations were exceeded by a wide 
margin. 
 Hidden Champions, relatively unknown world market leader s in their respective 
industries, are also characterized by heavy involvement of their CEOs in price questions. 17 Because of this focus, these executives know all the details of the business, 
which enables them to make qualifi ed judgments and take on a leading role in 
resolving price issues. The prices Hidden Champions charge are usually 10–15 % 
above market levels; yet the companies are global market leaders. Their returns 
likewise outpace industry averages by a factor of 2.4. 18 The involvement of the CEO 
in pricing plays no small role in this level of success. 
 The Global Pricing Study, which Simon-Kucher & Partners conducted in 2011 
and again in 2012, illuminated and confi rmed the critical role of top management in 
pricing. 19 The 2012 study, which included 2,713 managers from over 50 countries 
and a large cross section of industries, took a deep look at the role of top management in pricing. Companies whose top managers took a strong, personal interest in 
pricing stood out compared to companies whose senior executives did not take on 
such an active role, as the following results show. For companies with strong CEO 
involvement:
– The pricing power was 35 % higher. 
– The success rate for implementing price increase s was 18 % higher. 
– 26 % more achieved higher margins after the price increase s, which means that 
they were not just passing on higher costs to their customers. 
– 30 % had a special pricing department, which in turn had an additional positive 
effect on profi ts. 
 The study showed that companies with strong pricing power had 25 % higher 
returns than those who didn’t. One should always be careful about causality assumptions when interpreting these kinds of results. But these fi ndings do support the 
statement that higher profi ts are likely to result when the CEO gets involved in 
 pricing. To say it one more time: pricing belongs on the CEO’s desk!
